 Rax Restaurants Inc. said it expects to report a net loss of about $6.5 million for its fourth quarter ended July 31, mainly because of write-offs associated with past-due royalty discounts to franchisees.  For fiscal 1989, the Columbus, Ohio, quick-service restaurant operator expects to post a net loss of about $13.5 million.  In the year-earlier quarter, Rax earned $1.1 million, or 15 cents a share, on revenue of $31.7 million.  In fiscal 1988, it earned $2.5 million, or 35 cents a share, on revenue of $123.1 million.  Ira Hermann, Rax's president, said a royalty reduction program for its franchisees should help in "revitalizing" the company.  Under the plan, royalty payments will be reduced for stores with lackluster performance, incentives will be provided to franchisees to pay royalty obligations, and royalty rates will be reduced for new restaurant operators.  Mr. Hermann said the move is to provide immediate short-term financial relief and strategic long-term benefits to franchisees and the company, which owns about 150 restaurants and franchises an additional 365, mostly in the Midwest.  Vishay Intertechnology Inc. said the federal Defense Logistics Agency agreed not to debar or suspend the electronic and optical equipment maker's Dale Electronics Inc. subsidiary for misconduct.  Vishay, Malvern, Pa., will reimburse the agency $801,600 for administrative expenses and the cost of resistors that Dale recalled in 1986, before Dale was wholly owned by Vishay.  The company had established an $800,000 provision for the second quarter to cover the anticipated settlement of the employee misconduct charges.  As part of the settlement, William Gaines, Dale's president and chief executive officer, resigned his posts and was succeeded by Felix Sandman, Vishay's chairman and chief executive.  Mr. Gaines had been with Dale for 33 years.  A Vishay spokesman elaborated on the resignation: "The feeling was that if we had been in charge at the time this happened, it wouldn't have happened."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Vishay shares closed at $14.875, up 25 cents.  Petroleum futures rallied as oil markets shrugged off reports of rising production by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  Oil analysts generally attributed the higher prices to technical factors and to indications that petroleum markets appear to be absorbing the increased supplies from OPEC.  North Sea and Middle East crudes were flat to slightly lower on European spot markets.  But prices of crude oil as well as petroleum products strengthened in U.S. futures trading.  The futures price of West Texas Intermediate crude for October delivery broke through some important technical levels in trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange to settle at $18.83 a barrel, up 19 cents.  November and December crude contracts rose even more -- 24 cents and 23 cents a barrel, respectively.  Gasoline futures prices also were higher, although heating oil was by far the stronger fuel.  Unleaded gasoline for September delivery increased 0.39 cent to settle at 55 cents a gallon.  September heating oil was up 0.94 cent to 53.11 cents a gallon.  Few market participants were surprised by the higher fuels prices.  Traders noted that gasoline recently has been on a rebound and that the big season for heating oil is just around the corner.  "The products are the real story right now, but it looks like crude is following the products," said Eric Bolling of Edge Trading Corp.  Oil analysts have been watching for some buildup in world oil inventories as a result of OPEC's increased production to around 22 million barrels a day this month, the highest level for the year.  But so far no big oil surplus is showing up.  According to Oil Afloat, which tracks movements of oil tankers world-wide, there has, in fact, been a sharp fall in stocks of oil at sea after the second quarter's buildup.  "What this means for the supply-demand position is that on-land stock movements need some discounting for the changes which are going on out of sight, at sea," the British-based publication reports.  Inventories on land are beginning to rise some, but not abnormally so.  An increase of 2.1 million barrels in U.S. crude oil stocks to 337.316 million barrels last week, as reported by the American Petroleum Institute, had been expected and resulted in little alarm in the oil markets.  "Stocks are showing that the market is reasonably in balance," said Lawrence Goldstein, executive vice president of the Petroleum Industry Research Foundation.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  LIVESTOCK AND MEATS: Hog prices dropped sharply as traders appeared to focus once again on the crowded conditions in U.S. hog lots.  Keeping their sights down on the farm contrasted with the international outlook powering Tuesday's rally, when speculators ran October hog-futures prices up 1.05 cents a pound on the belief that the Bush administration might ship frozen pork bellies to Poland.  The National Pork Producers Council is promoting the exports as a way to support U.S. hog prices and help Poland's consumers.  U.S. supplies of frozen pork bellies, which are used to make bacon, hit their highest levels in 18 years this summer.  With the immediate outlook for such pork aid having dimmed, sellers knocked October hog-futures prices down .90 cent to 40.77 cents a pound.  Pork belly futures closed mixed.  COPPER: Futures prices recovered a little from Tuesday's tumble of more than seven cents.  The December contract was up 1.85 cents a pound to $1.256.  A news service report that Chilean copper miners had voted to strike and a drop in visible stocks influenced the rebound, but one analyst said: "The market looks tenuous, as if it still hasn't really recovered from the impact of Tuesday's plunge."  The news service report said miners at the Chile Copper Corp.'s Salvador mine had voted to strike as of tomorrow.  The mine produces 100,000 tons of refined copper annually, an analyst said.  Later, it was reported that union and copper company officials were talking in an effort to prevent the strike.  Michael Frawley, metals trader at PaineWebber, said little impact on the market from the strike was anticipated because it wasn't expected to last long.  "Copper futures at the moment are struggling from being overbought and the subsequent technical liquidation," he said.  He also noted that today was the first day in which notices to deliver copper against the September position will be issued.  "These are momentary depressants which could cause some additional weakness over the short term, but the market's fundamentals are still constructive.  World-wide stocks are low, and there continue to be production and labor problems, which could be price-supportive over the long-term," Mr. Frawley said.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices eased as the dollar strengthened.  December delivery gold was off $1.70 an ounce to $367.60.  December silver declined one cent an ounce to $5.21.  October platinum was down 40 cents an ounce to $479.20.  One analyst observed that the open interest -- the number of contracts that remain to be nullified by an opposite trade or fulfilled by delivery of the commodity -- in gold declined.  That meant, he said, Tuesday's price advance was caused mostly by traders buying back contracts they'd previously sold short in anticipation of price declines.  "That isn't good for the market," he said.  He also noted that December silver eased to a fresh life-of-contract low for the fourth consecutive session.  There continued to be a lack of demand for bullion, which is one reason why precious metals haven't been able to mount and sustain any gains, he said.  Another analyst, Jeffrey Nichols, president of American Precious Metals Advisors Canada, of Toronto, agreed there was very little in the market at the moment to attract traders to precious metals.  For one thing, he noted, the more active equity markets were drawing away investment funds.  "If precious metals don't have a post-Labor Day pickup, when activity usually increases, a vacuum could develop under the market that could cause prices to fall.  If the market can't rally, traders won't want to hold on to their positions," he said.  Despite a turnaround in soft-drink pricing, Coca-Cola Enterprises Inc. said it expects 1989 earnings to fall as much as 37%.  The giant Coca-Cola bottler said it expects to report per-share net income of 40 cents to 45 cents, compared with operating earnings of 71 cents a share in 1988.  The 1988 earnings exclude a gain from the sale of a bottler and a one-time restructuring charge.  For the second half, Coca-Cola Enterprises said that its operating cash flow, which it considers a key indicator, is expected to be about 10% below the prioryear results.  The news, released after the markets closed yesterday, is certain to disappoint some investors.  Many people expected an improved pricing environment to lead to higher results at Coca-Cola Enterprises, the nation's largest Coca-Cola bottler.  Some analysts have estimated a price increase of as little as 1% could add about 15 cents a share to Coca-Cola Enterprises' bottom line.  But Coca-Cola Enterprises, whose profit record has generally disappointed Wall Street since it went public three years ago, said its results for the second half will be hurt by lower-than-expected volume growth and higher marketing costs.  Many in the industry expected some degree of consumer shock as soft-drink bottlers tried to break out of the price-slashing, market share-building tactics of the past few years.  In fact, second-quarter volume growth slowed to 3% from a more typical 4% to 5% partly because of a decline in impulse buying brought on by higher prices, some analysts have said.  Lawrence Cowart, the company's chief financial officer, would say only that volume growth in July and August was "lower than expected."  In those two months, the company's soft-drink prices were 2% to 3% higher than in the same period a year earlier, he said.  "We're definitely getting some turnaround in price, and that's good news.  But we're seeing some volume impacts from that."  To try to get customers accustomed to higher prices, Coca-Cola Enterprises has increased its spending on trade and dealer incentives, couponing and consumer promotions.  With some 60% to 70% of soda in grocery stores sold with some form of discount over the past few years, consumers have become savvy soft-drink buyers.  As a result, the price increases the industry has tried to push through in recent months created a "hesitation" among consumers, said Mr. Cowart.  Commenting on the company's statements, Emanuel Goldman, an analyst at PaineWebber Inc., said, "We hadn't been looking for CCE to knock anybody's socks off this year, but these numbers are substantially lower than what we would have expected."  PaineWebber had been projecting a 1989 per-share figure of about 65 cents.  Mr. Goldman added, however, that he expects Coca-Cola Enterprises' pricing and marketing plans to work.  "They're prepared to spend what's necessary" to make the plans successful, he said.  Archer Communications Inc., which has been heavily traded because of its process for recording three-dimensional sound, said it reached a conditional licensing agreement with Nintendo Co. of Japan for use of the technology in home video games.  Lawrence Ryckman, the Calgary, Alberta-based technology concern's president and chief executive officer, said the pact would be the first licensing agreement for the QSound technology and would provide the company with its first operating revenue.  A spokeswoman for Nintendo's U.S. subsidiary, Nintendo of America Inc. confirmed that a conditional agreement had been reached.  Archer said that under the agreement Nintendo would pay a royalty on hardware and software using the QSound technology and make an initial advance royalty payment.  It said Nintendo also would get an option to acquire Archer common shares.  It said the non-exclusive license, which permits Archer to license other users, would last five years.  Union workers at Ameritech in five Midwest states began returning to work after Indiana Bell and Michigan Bell reached tentative agreements on new contracts with the Communications Workers of America, ending a 17-day strike.  The agreement between Michigan Bell and the CWA, reached shortly after 5 a.m. yesterday, was the last of six agreements negotiated by Ameritech units and the union.  The Indiana Bell pact was reached the night before.  The union had been waiting for all five Midwest telephone companies and Ameritech Services to sign tentative pacts before it called its members back to work.  The tentative agreements, which still must be ratified by union members, call for base-wage increases of about 9% over three years; improvements in profit sharing; pension increases; job-training programs and family care packages.  Union spokesmen had said the most contentious issue at Ameritech involved wage increases.  Health care wasn't a big factor in the strikes at Ameritech because the company and the unions in 1986 had negotiated cost-containment provisions, including establishing networks of preferred hospitals and physicians.  The CWA represents about 40,000 employees at Chicago-based Ameritech.  Besides Michigan and Indiana, Ameritech has telephone units in Illinois, Ohio and Wisconsin.  The strike began Aug. 13, a week after members of the CWA and International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers walked off their jobs at three other regional Bell telephone companies: Bell Atlantic Corp., Pacific Telesis Group and Nynex Corp.  At one point, nearly 200,000 phone workers were on strike.  CWA and IBEW negotiators held long negotiating sessions with Nynex bargainers, the first substantive talks since that strike began Aug. 6.  A company spokesman said talks with the IBEW ended yesterday afternoon and will resume today.  Talks with the CWA continued into the evening.  The CWA represents some 40,000 Nynex employees while the IBEW represents 20,000.  A company plan to shift some health-care costs to employees has been the most contentious issue.  Strikes have been settled at San Francisco-based Pacific Telesis and at most of Bell Atlantic's phone company units.  Philadelphia-based Bell Atlantic, however, is still negotiating with IBEW bargainers in New Jersey, and most CWA members there aren't crossing IBEW picket lines, company and union officials said.  Star Cablevision Group said it is exploring a possible sale or merger of a large portion of its cable television properties after receiving expressions of interest over the last year from various concerns.  Star, a closely held concern based in Fond du Lac, Wis., said it has retained New York brokerage firm Waller Capital Corp. to advise it about the sale of cable systems in four midwestern states serving about 165,000 subscribers.  At current prices of about $2,000 to $2,400 per subscriber, the company could receive as much as $400 million, depending on the location and quality of the systems.  Waller said it expects any sale to be a combination of stock and asset sales.  The company is exploring the option of selling the cable systems in clusters which range in size from 14,000 to 47,000 subscribers.  After spending most of the global trading day wallowing in the doldrums, the dollar rose nearly two pfennig in a sharp afternoon rally in New York.  A few traders tied the dollar's late advance to a news service report quoting unidentified sources as saying that the U.S. Treasury thinks it will be difficult to restrain the dollar as long as the economy continues its "soft landing" and the U.S. merchandise trade deficit shows improvement.  The Treasury wouldn't comment on the report.  But with volume thin and much of the activity centered on trading between currencies other than the dollar, many traders said the dollar's jump was linked initially to a temporary reversal on the busy yen-mark cross rate that prompted a quick retreat out of the German currency and indirectly boosted the dollar.  The mark met resistance just under 74.00 yen after rising most of the day, and it pulled back to around 73.65 yen before rebounding.  However, no single factor could explain the U.S. currency's advance.  "There was no implicit logic to the {dollar's} rally," said one trader in New York.  "But the market is very thin, and traders are looking for any excuse to make a move.  It could just as easily lose two pfennig again" today.  In late New York trading, the dollar was quoted at 1.9544 marks and 144.30 yen, up from 1.9360 marks and 142.95 yen late Tuesday in New York.  Sterling was trading at $1.5780, down from $1.5870.  In Tokyo Thursday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 144.33 yen, up from Wednesday's Tokyo close of 143.08 yen.  The U.K. currency drew support from news that Britain's narrow money supply, M-0, rose a seasonally adjusted 5.3% in the year to July, according to final figures from the Bank of England.  The rise outstripped the government's target range of 1% to 5% for growth in the year ending March 31, 1990, and tends to increase the possibility that British interest rates will firm in the near future to counter an anticipated rise in consumer spending.  M-0 consists of notes and coins in circulation plus banks' operational balances with the Bank of England.  Earlier yesterday, intervention-shy Tokyo bulls approached the dollar gingerly, in part because Bank of Japan sources said they expect representatives of the Group of Seven monetary nations, when they meet next month, to reaffirm the stance against a higher dollar that they took at their April meeting.  Finance ministers and central bankers of the G-7 nations meet informally every year when the delegates of the International Monetary Fund and World Bank gather in Washington in September.  Traders and analysts feel that the leading industrial countries currently have little policy leeway with which to temper the dollar's strength.  Given strong fundamentals in the U.S. and an unwillingness on the part of the G-7 to manipulate interest rates for the sole purpose of stabilizing exchange rates, the group is hogtied for the time being.  Robert Hormats, vice chairman of Goldman, Sachs & Co., shares the view that there is little evidence, given the rosy short-term outlook for the U.S. economy and the trade deficit, that the dollar will decline.  "And currency traders primarily base their judgment on near-term projections, not on economists' normative estimates of where the dollar should be to balance the trade and current accounts in the long term.  The dollar is on the rise, in fits and starts."  Mr. Hormats continued that "given that market psychology, there's not a lot the G7 can do at the next meeting."  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $361.80 an ounce, down $1.80.  Estimated volume was a light 2.1 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Thursday, gold was quoted at $360.15 an ounce.  Suppose Joan Collins were marooned on a deserted island.  What records would she want with her?  What single luxury couldn't she live without?  And what book would she take?  Wonder no longer.  Ms. Collins has answered those questions -- twice.  Back in 1961, as a rising Hollywood starlet, she wanted Harry Belafonte singing "Hava Nagila," a television set and a teach-yourself manual of foreign languages.  Now, at age 56, she wants Giacomo Puccini and Elvis Presley, skin moisturizer and Oscar Wilde's "The Picture of Dorian Gray."  When Britons crave tidbits like these, they don't turn to tabloid newspapers or TV shows.  They tune their radios to the august, state-owned British Broadcasting Corp. Millions of them listen every Sunday afternoon to "Desert Island Discs," one of the world's longest-running and quirkiest radio programs.  No mere celebrity chat show, "Discs" is an icon of British broadcasting, inspiring fanatical devotion despite a corny 47-year-old format.  It is also where the buttoned-up English loosen their collars.  The Archbishop of Canterbury confessed that he started going to church as a teen-ager only to meet a pretty girl named Betty -- not the woman he married.  Arthur Scargill, the combative leader of Britain's miners union, displayed a maudlin obsession with his mother and talked about his pet geese: Gadhafi, Gorbachev and Gromyko.  The androgynous pop star Boy George said he's dying to raise a child.  "It's an indirect way to find out what people are like," says Anthony Clare, the Irish host of "In the Psychiatrist's Chair," an equally odd BBC radio program in which celebrities submit to on-air analysis.  "There is something quintessentially British about it," Dr. Clare says.  Each episode of "Desert Island Discs" opens with a lazy old tune called "By the Sleepy Lagoon," complete with canned seagull calls.  A "castaway" -- the show's visitors are never called guests -- is introduced.  Castaways come with a list of eight records they would want to have if marooned on an island.  Between playing the records, they chat about their lives.  Forty minutes later, the climax: The castaway chooses one luxury item and one book to take along to the island.  They can't cop out by picking the Bible or the complete Shakespeare, which are already provided in order to elicit other revelations.  On this BBC fantasy island, there's room even for the semi-famous to parade their eccentricities.  Here you'll meet people like Alfred Wainwright, a reclusive author of best-selling hiking guides who advises leaping behind boulders to avoid greeting fellow walkers.  Or 80-year-old Miriam Rothschild, a celebrated conservationist who eschews leather and wore rubber boots to meet Queen Elizabeth.  As with any English game, there are detailed rules.  They are strictly but cheerfully enforced, particularly in the area of the vital luxury.  The BBC defines it as "an inanimate object which is purely for the senses," something "which is not going to help you to live."  So castaways who want pianos -- a popular request -- are allowed uprights but not grands, which conceivably could provide shelter.  Only single-volume books are permitted; encyclopedias and collected works are out.  The program, which has spawned several imitators in the U.S., is the brainchild of Roy Plomley, a free-lance broadcaster who intended to make just six episodes when he proposed the show to the BBC in 1942.  An immediate hit, it ran until 1946.  Five years later the BBC bowed to popular demand and brought it back and has run it weekly ever since.  Mr. Plomley was the host until his death in 1985.  The only notable rebuff came early on.  George Bernard Shaw returned Mr. Plomley's invitation with a note scribbled in the margin: "No.  Too busy with more important things.  G.B.S."  These days, the high and mighty seldom play hard to get.  Some even resort to a little discreet lobbying.  In 1978, shortly before Margaret Thatcher became prime minister, "she let it be known that she wanted to appear," says Derek Drescher, a former "Discs" producer.  During the show she never stepped out of character, choosing the triumphal march from Verdi's opera "Aida" among her music and a survival manual as her book.  (Maybe she wanted hints for surviving John Cleese.  Back in 1971, the comedian's chosen luxury was "a life-size papier-mache model of Margaret Thatcher, and a baseball bat.")  It is rare, in fact, to find a politician who doesn't want Verdi or Wagner; an actor who doesn't fancy Edith Piaf singing "Je ne regrette rien"; a writer who forgoes Mozart; or an athlete who can live without Elvis Presley.  A depressing number of celebrities choose their own work.  In 1980, director Otto Preminger asked only for soundtracks from his films and his autobiography.  Tenor Placido Domingo took a videocassette recorder and a tape of his own performances.  Field Marshal Bernard Montgomery wanted "The Battle Hymn of the Republic" and his own book, "The History of Warfare."  Others are less predictable.  Not one of Paul McCartney's choices was a Beatles number, though he did ask for "Beautiful Boy," a solo effort by John Lennon.  In 1961, Bob Hope selected "Jailhouse Rock."  Princess Margaret, the first member of the royal family to appear, predictably chose "Rule Britannia" but also wanted "Sixteen Tons."  John Kenneth Galbraith took "I Got Plenty of Nuttin'."  Diver Jacques Cousteau chose a stone from the stomach of a fossilized dinosaur.  Castaways choose their book, records and luxury item on their own, sending a list to the BBC several days before the recording session.  The advance notice is a recent concession to celebrity schedules.  In Mr. Plomley's day, guests perused the BBC's Gramophone Library for 90 minutes before doing the show.  Back then, not even the Americans rushed.  When Gregory Peck appeared in 1980, his agent informed Mr. Drescher that the actor could spare only an hour for the record library.  But once inside, Mr. Peck became engrossed.  "We were overrunning madly," recalls Mr. Drescher, the former "Discs" producer.  "Even on the way to the studio, he suddenly thought of another record, and I had to whiz back to the library."  On the air, rude questions are definitely out of order.  Mr. Plomley interviewed Princess Margaret without once mentioning her 1978 divorce from Lord Snowdon.  But such restraint doesn't prevent rude answers.  Norman Mailer sent the BBC into a tizzy when he chose "a stick of the best marijuana" as his luxury at a 1979 recording session.  BBC managers met to decide whether to ax the program.  They didn't, concluding that Mr. Plomley's reproof ("That's illegal talk, Mr. Mailer") served to demonstrate the proper attitude.  The developer of the $2.5 billion Times Square redevelopment project unveiled a new design for four office towers, in a move partly designed to blunt opposition to the controversial plan.  The project, bogged down by dozens of unsuccessful lawsuits and a shortage of major tenants, would replace Manhattan's colorful but seedy corridor along 42nd St. -- between Broadway and Eighth Avenue -- with a hotel, merchandise mart, renovated theaters and the offices.  The new plan, which like the original one was designed by the firm of architects John Burgee and Philip Johnson, envisions towers that conform with new city regulations requiring Times Square-area buildings to be adorned with lights and signs on their facades.  "These buildings are in the spirit of Times Square, more playful," said Rebecca Robertson, vice president of design for the 42nd St. Development Project Inc., the public body overseeing the plan.  "The old-design buildings were all the same and not keeping with Times Square."  The old buildings were derided by critics for their hulking uniformity; the new design envisions virtually the same sized buildings with colorful surfaces and flashing lights.  One tower will have a 27-story computerized sign up its side, in keeping with new city zoning regulations for the area.  The buildings will be built by a partnership of Park Tower Realty and Prudential Insurance Co. Though the project was approved by the city five years ago, the operator for a merchandise mart has not been selected.  State officials said operators for the theaters should be announced shortly.  Condemnation proceedings are scheduled to proceed as soon as appellate courts rule on the latest round of lawsuits meant to stop the plan.  While the new design may be more acceptable to project critics than the old one, it is not expected to mute opposition to the long-delayed project.  Most of the lawsuits pending against the development focus on the approval process and project finances, not the design.  Project critics were also frustrated that while the new design was unveiled at City Hall yesterday morning, they were told renderings would not be available until next week.  Brendan Gill, who writes the "Skyline" column for the New Yorker and has led some of the battles against the project, said his opposition had more to do with its scale, which he said would obliterate the theater district, than with the specific architecture.  Mr. Gill said that while he had not seen the new design, the size of the towers was "inimical" to the area.  Getty Petroleum Corp., Jericho, N.Y., said it purchased several convenience-store and gasoline-station chains and a propane-gas distributor for more than $25 million, to increase market share.  Getty, a large marketer of gasoline and petroleum products, bought RECO Petroleum Inc., a Reading, Pa., company that operates 27 convenience stores -- under the Mr. Food and Country Acres names -- and 60 gasoline stations in Pennsylvania, Virginia and West Virginia.  Getty also acquired Pensupreme, a chain of 65 Pennsylvania convenience stores, most of which sell petroleum products, from Penn Dairies Inc., Lancaster, Pa.  The other acquisition was Pioneer Bottle Gas Inc., a West Coxsackie, N.Y., propane supplier.  T. Boone Pickens said he won't run for governor of Texas because he needs to devote time to his Mesa Limited Partnership and his continuing battle with Koito Manufacturing Co., of Japan.  Mr. Pickens, in a speech yesterday to the Dallas Rotary Club, said he expects Mesa to post a third-quarter loss because of continuing low prices for natural gas.  Mr. Pickens said later he didn't have specific numbers on the expected loss.  In the third quarter of 1988, Mesa reported net income of $9.8 million, or 12 cents a share.  This year, Mesa posted a second-quarter loss of $13.4 million.  Mr. Pickens declined to answer questions about the effect of the continuing losses on Mesa's distribution to shareholders.  In March, Mr. Pickens said the usual $2-per-unit distribution would be cut 25% this year.  "Mesa will weather the tough times, but I have a responsibility to my employees and my shareholders to see this through," Mr. Pickens said.  The governorship of Texas "is a full-time job," he said.  "I can't make that commitment."  The announcement ended months of speculation about whether Mr. Pickens would enter the Republican primary for the governor's office.  He had planned to announce his intentions Aug. 15 but said that the announcement was delayed by his wrangling with Koito, an auto-parts supplier.  Mr. Pickens said yesterday he will boost his stake in Koito by an unspecified amount in an effort to gain a seat on the company's board.  Mr. Pickens, who already owns 20.2% of Koito through his merchant banking group, Boone Co., was denied a seat on the board in June.  In Japan, Koito officials declined to comment.  Mr. Pickens, 61 years old, said entering the 1994 gubernatorial race remains an option.  By declining to enter the 1990 race, Mr. Pickens may clear the way for the entry of Dallas lawyer Tom Luce, long-time counsel to H. Ross Perot.  Mr. Luce said yesterday he is testing the political waters around the state and his decision won't be based on Mr. Pickens's announcement.  "I think a decision on running is a personal decision," Mr. Luce said.  Republicans who have officially entered the 1990 primary race include Texas Railroad Commissioner Kent Hance, former Texas Secretary of State Jack Rains and Midland oil man Clayton Williams.  The only Democrat formally seeking the governor's office is the state treasurer, Ann Richards, but Texas Attorney General Jim Mattox is expected to enter the race.  Texas Gov. William P. Clements Jr., a Republican, has said he will not seek reelection in 1990.  The impact of the proposed merger of two Japanese banks reverberated through Tokyo financial markets, and regulators began antitrust and insider-trading inquiries into the plan.  Shares of the two banks, Mitsui Bank Ltd. and Taiyo Kobe Bank Ltd., soared yesterday on news that they plan to join forces next April 1.  The giant new bank, Mitsui Taiyo Kobe Bank, would be the world's second-largest, with assets of about 53 trillion yen (about $370 billion).  The largest is Japan's Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd.  By the close of trading on the Tokyo Stock Exchange, Taiyo Kobe's stock had scored the maximum possible single-session gain, climbing to 1,930 yen ($13.50), up 300 yen from its closing price Monday.  Mitsui's shares shot up 230 yen to 2,580 yen.  Both stocks had been suspended from trading Tuesday.  The all-stock merger -- in which Taiyo Kobe shareholders would get eight Mitsui shares for each 10 Taiyo Kobe shares they now own -- created huge demand for the two stocks.  About 4.4 million Mitsui Bank shares changed hands, partly on speculation that Mitsui Bank would have to issue free scrip to balance out its all-stock merger with Taiyo Kobe.  A Mitsui spokesman said he couldn't comment on the rumors, but he added that all the terms of the merger haven't been decided.  About 452,000 Taiyo Kobe shares were traded, but buy orders outstripped sell orders by so many that requests for nearly 55 million Taiyo Kobe shares were unmet.  The transaction also attracted immediate, though perhaps perfunctory, regulatory scrutiny.  Japan's Fair Trade Commission -- the country's chief antitrust watchdog -- said it would review the planned merger to ensure that it complies with antitrust regulations.  The powerful Finance Ministry already has approved the deal, so most industry analysts don't expect the government to interfere.  More significant, the Tokyo Stock Exchange launched an investigation into suspicious dealings in Taiyo Kobe shares ahead of the announcement.  A spokesman for the exchange said surveillance experts were conducting a "regular" examination of trading by a stock-brokerage house affiliated with Taiyo Kobe.  Officials at Taiyo Kobe denied that any information about the merger had been leaked beforehand.  "There is absolutely no truth to the idea that we leaked information," said a bank spokesman in Kobe.  Although stock-exchange officials say Shinei Ishino Securities Co. is the first target in the investigation, Kazuo Sekiya, head of Shinei Ishino's trading-surveillance department, denied that the firm was under investigation.  "We have heard absolutely nothing from the officials," he said.  He denied also that trading in Taiyo Kobe shares was based on any inside, privileged information.  Mr. Sekiya said Shinei Ishino's heavy purchases of Taiyo Kobe shares stemmed from buy orders by Taiyo Kobe's banking clients who wanted to purchase a stake in the bank.  He added that because the companies were part of the same business group, Shinei Ishino often handled orders for Taiyo Kobe shares.  Securities companies estimated that Shinei Ishino was a net buyer of 3.4 million Taiyo Kobe shares between June 29 and July 19.  Stanley A. Lybarger was named to the newly-created positions of president and chief operating officer of this bank holding company and its Bank of Oklahoma unit.  Mr. Lybarger previously was president of the unit's Oklahoma City regional office.  Merck & Co., the pharmaceutical giant, is adopting a no-smoking policy at all its U.S. sites tomorrow.  All 14,000 of the company's U.S. employees, as well as visitors and contractors, will be prohibited from smoking in all company facilities and property with the exception of some parking lots.  Smoking also will be banned at conference sites and meetings the company sponsors.  CHICKEN PRICES flap wildly despite tamer overall food inflation.  Second-quarter poultry prices soared an annualized 30%, government data say.  That's about a 7% hike from the first quarter.  Fish, until recently the pricier entree, stabilized, gaining only 1.1%.  "Demand is very high for chicken, and some of the effects of higher feed prices are still carrying over," says Frank Pankyo of the Food Institute. (About 70% of the cost of chicken is feed.) Fast-food firms' major push into chicken items swells demand, he adds.  But McDonald's says don't blame the McChicken sandwich.  The chain's poultry costs haven't changed since March, thanks to "vertically integrated suppliers."  Translating from McSpeak: McDonald's eyes its future needs and orders poultry (a lot) well in advance so suppliers can better control their costs.  But not every user can create its own supply and demand.  Prudential-Bache analyst Leslie Steppel says the average Kentucky Fried unit sees a 4% to 5% sales drop after raising prices at a time when the non-chicken competition is discounting menus.  But Tom Thumb supermarkets and others say shoppers don't squawk at higher poultry and egg prices.  THE PLAY'S THE THING, but just try getting it read, much less produced.  Playwriting competitions draw more interest, although production is still elusive.  Theatre Communications Group, publisher of Dramatists Sourcebook (the contest bible), raised the printing on the 1989-90 edition to 5,200 copies after last year's run of 4,200 books sold out.  Two contests that pay off partly in production are big draws: the Eugene O'Neill Center's National Playwrights Conference (1,200 entries) and the Young Playwrights Festival (800 entrants aged eight to 18).  Some specify themes, such as life in Hawaii or the South.  The Dramatists Guild notes that the very act of writing a play copyrights the work.  But if a fight arises, "you can't sue under federal copyright laws unless you have a registration number" from the U.S. Copyright Office, says the guild's Dana Singer.  David Johnson, editor of Show Business, notes that many authors gravitate toward film and TV.  "But everyone who is a writer has a dream of having a play produced."  S&L SALVAGE gets murkier for those seeking takeovers, workouts, investments.  Investment banks initially zoomed in on the troubled thrifts, often bunching them for resale in partnerships.  But the enthusiasm may cool since the bailout act calls for bank holding companies to indemnify the FDIC from failures by sister banks.  Salomon Brothers analyst Bruce Harting calls much of the buying of thrift stocks "indiscriminate."  And banks -- strapped for cash themselves -- are likely to offer securities instead of dollars in the takeovers.  Initial public offerings by mutual thrifts (and secondary issues of public ones) are expected to be rare.  Healthy S&Ls mull switching to state from federal charters to avoid losing dividends from their stock in the 10 regional Federal Home Loan Banks.  Under the bailout, the federal government gobbles up the payouts.  But a state-chartered thrift could sell the stock.  "We don't want to have to pay the price to bail out a bankrupt system," says Jack Morgan, chairman of American Savings Bank, which is switching charters.  Paine Webber and Essex Financial confirm plans for a fund to buy healthy Southeast S&Ls.  Goal: $75 million.  COMMA COPS say slow down: Fewer are probably better.  Grammar Group, a Chicago firm that picks up where your third-grade teacher left off, says the misplaced comma is the most common error in business writing.  For $5,000 a course, it instructs on commas and other fine points.  Pupils include Ford, Chrysler, GM, Harris Bank.  SMOKING MAY BE HAZARDOUS to your job prospects.  A survey by Robert Half International finds that one in four smokers will be rejected when competing with an equally qualified non-smoker for a post.  THE FIFTH ONE'S FREE at DePauw University.  It offers outstanding graduates a tuition-free year to broaden their liberal arts background.  The first recipient: Joseph Webster Jr., a Phi Beta Kappa chemistry grad who plans to take courses this fall in art, religion, music and political science.  DISTRUST COSTS minority suppliers and their mainstream customers.  Goods from minority vendors are more expensive partly because they have to prove themselves more, do their own costly research, and process bundles of red tape, says a report from Indiana University's School of Business and purchasing groups.  The study lists "atmosphere" as one of the major problems cited by both vendors and buyers.  "That's a euphemism for cultural or racial 'uncomfortableness,'" says the school's Marc J. Dollinger, study creator.  The report says minority suppliers often feel a "sense of powerlessness" -- possibly from "dealing with an apparently hostile environment."  And buyers sometimes blame poor supplier practices on race rather than on the haphazard way many small businesses sometimes operate.  But some minority vendors add to the mistrust by keeping mum about temporary problems.  Minority vendors who strike out on their own after working at a corporation find the most success, the groups say.  BRIEFS: The Old Homestead in New York plans to serve Japanese Kobe beef at $75 per steak. . . .  The pharmacist may be at lunch, but the computer never noshes: Care/Quest and Columbia School of Public Health will offer drugstores computers that can answer common health questions.  Exxon Corp. named marine scientist John H. Steele of Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution a director in response to demands that it appoint an environmentalist to its board.  Some environmental activists, who along with pension funds had extracted a promise from Exxon last spring to make such an appointment, expressed disappointment in Exxon's choice and vowed to fight Mr. Steele's re-election at next year's annual meeting.  The critics say they currently control proxies of more than 500,000 Exxon shares, almost one-half of which they say are owned by Ann Rockefeller Roberts, great-granddaughter of Exxon founder John D. Rockefeller.  That's only a tiny portion of the 1.3 billion Exxon shares outstanding, but they pledged to continue amassing votes against Mr. Steele in anticipation of next spring's meeting.  "Being a marine scientist doesn't mean he's an environmentalist," complained John Bell, an official representing 15 U.S. environmental organizations that had called for the election of former U.S. Senator Gaylord Nelson of the Wilderness Society.  Mr. Bell labeled Mr. Steele's election a "Bronx cheer" from the company demonstrating "that they don't really give a damn about the environment."  An obviously irritated Exxon spokeswoman responded: "An unfair prejudgment such as {that} doesn't warrant comment."  New York City Comptroller Harrison J. Goldin, who helped spearhead the campaign for an environmental director, defended Mr. Steele as "a brilliant and independent man."  Mr. Goldin hailed his selection as "a good day for the environment."  The election of Mr. Steele, who has also been appointed to the board's newly-formed public issues committee, increases the Exxon board to 15 members.  Mr. Steele, president of the corporation that runs Woods Hole, was one of more than 100 candidates that Exxon says it examined.  In an interview, the soft-spoken scientist said he expects as director "to learn about the scientific problems" that caused the Exxon tanker to dump almost 11 million gallons of oil into Alaskan waters last March, review the cleanup effort and attain an understanding of the long-term consequences of the spill.  The 62-year-old native of Scotland said he hasn't received any directives from Exxon.  "I've only been on the board for half an hour," he said in a soft burr.  Mr. Steele said he expects to take time while attending a scientific meeting in Alaska next month to learn first-hand what has happened to the marine environment there as a result of the spill.  The scientist said he doesn't know who selected him for the directorship.  Exxon Chairman Lawrence G. Rawl approached him about a month ago to determine his interest.  Following a long one-on-one session with the Exxon head and several follow-up phone conversations, Mr. Steele decided to throw his hat in the ring.  "I think the job will be fun," he said.  An academician, Mr. Steel's career has been spent mostly in positions at the Marine Laboratory in Aberdeen, Scotland, and at the Woods Hole institute investigating the marine environment.  "Scientists should interact with industry and I expect to be surprised if not shocked to see how a major company works and behaves," he said.  Mr. Steele said that one of his few demands of Exxon is that he not be asked to be the public spokesman on issues concerning the spill.  An avid sailor who plies the waters off Massachusetts on an 18-foot boat, Mr. Steele did much of his earlier fieldwork aboard research vessels on the open ocean.  He says his scientific passion is the study of ocean plant life and the use of satellite data to examine it.  He is a member of the board of the University Corporation for Atmospheric Research, the Arctic Research Commission, and the National Geographic Society's committee for research and exploration.  He is also the U.S. delegate to the International Council for Exploration of the Sea.  J.H. Whitney & Co. said a total of 61 million shares of Natick, Mass.-based Prime Computer Inc. had been tendered to its DR Acquisition Corp. in its offer to buy as many as 49.52 million shares of Prime.  As a result, Whitney said, shareholders who tendered stock will receive cash for 81.18% of the amount tendered.  The balance will be returned to shareholders.  At the completion of the merger, Whitney expects to acquire remaining stock for $22 face amount securities.  Unisys Corp. said Clydesdale Bank of Scotland placed a $24 million order for Unisys workstations and associated services.  The maker of commercial information systems and defense systems said it will install the workstations and bring them into operation over the next several months.  IntelliCorp Inc., a maker of software based on artificial-intelligence technology, said it signed a two-year distributor agreement with Hyundai Electronics Industries Co. of South Korea.  Under the agreement, Hyundai Electronics will sell, support and provide training for IntelliCorp's software products in South Korea.  IntelliCorp said it is expanding its international distribution.  It has representatives in Japan, Australia, Scandinavia, Italy and France.  The Canadian Aviation Safety Board deplored the failure of air crews of Delta Air Lines, Atlanta, and the Continental Airlines unit of Texas Air Corp., Houston, to report promptly to air-traffic controllers a near-collision of their two aircraft over the North Atlantic in July 1987.  This failure "put many people at risk for a longer than necessary" period, the board said in its final report on the incident.  The board attributed the mishap to an error in the navigation data entered by the Delta crew into the inertial navigation system of its Lockheed L-1011 aircraft.  The L-1011 flew 80 miles off course, passing within 100 feet of the Continental 747 jet.  The two westbound planes carried a total of almost 600 passengers.  Since the incident, U.S. and Canadian navigation procedures have been tightened, including new requirements for cross-checking and verifying navigation data supplied to planes' navigation systems.  The report said the near-collision wasn't reported to air-traffic controllers by the flight crews of either Delta or Continental, or by any one of more than 20 flight crews who were aware of it.  The agency said the Continental crew eventually reported the incident to a company official as the plane approached New York.  The board said that in a radio discussion among several aircraft soon after the near-collision, some crews suggested that it not be reported.  The identities of these crews weren't disclosed.  Janine, the frustrating, engaging 16-year-old heroine of "The Little Thief," can't afford the luxury of sentimentality or remorse.  She's as wily as any street tough, and capable of startling cruelty.  Yet she's also a movie-mad dreamer with a grin that's more a plea for love than an expression of either joy or defiance.  There's a brightness about this contradictory survivor that draws others to her, makes middle-class people want to "save" her, and then feel betrayed when she doesn't -- can't -- conform to their ideas of what she should be.  This marvelous, complex portrait of a teen-age girl was developed from Francois Truffaut's final movie treatment.  The film maker, who died of cancer at age 52 five years ago, left behind his ideas for the movie in the form of a 30-page synopsis he'd prepared with his collaborator, Claude de Givray.  Mr. Truffaut had been thinking about Janine for a long time.  He'd first created her in 1959, as the female counterpart for Antoine Doinel, the rebellious adolescent (and Truffaut alter-ego) of the autobiographical "The 400 Blows."  The Doinel character survived the next few Truffaut films; Janine, however, was cut from the script of "400 Blows," for space.  Happily she has been resuscitated with great skill by Claude Miller, a French film maker who for 10 years worked as Mr. Truffaut's assistant director.  Though Mr. Truffaut's name is being used in this country as the film's big selling point, Mr. Miller's accomplishment shouldn't be slighted.  "The Little Thief" certainly respects and pays homage to Mr. Truffaut's sensibility, but Mr. Miller's work here in his sixth film clearly demonstrates that he himself has become a sophisticated and passionate film maker.  With a script credited to his wife, Annie Miller, the director has realized Janine's character, and the post-World War II milieu that produced her, with eloquent piquancy.  The first thing he did that was absolutely right was to cast Charlotte Gainsbourg as Janine.  He'd used this startling young actress before, in his 1985 picture, "The Brazen One."  Gangly and freckled, she's able to seem like a pugnacious adolescent one minute, a fresh-faced coquette the next -- and always a heartbreaker.  Like Antoine of "The 400 Blows," Janine wants to exchange her dismal life for something better, something more like what she sees at the movies.  Like her would-have-been counterpart, she, too, lands in reform school.  Janine shouldn't be confused with the disaffected American kids popularized on film in recent years.  She isn't the product of too much, but too little.  The movie takes place in 1950, when all of France, including its kids, still feels the aftereffects of the war (the movie opens with film clips of returning soldiers and the vibrant sound of a youthful choir).  Her father apparently was never around; her mother ran off to Italy with a lover when Janine was much younger, leaving her to live with her bitter aunt and distracted uncle in a small town.  These worn working people see Janine as a pesky reminder of her mother, another romantic who doted on movies and men.  They aren't cruel to the girl, just insensitive to the yearning she feels for her romanticized mother.  Mr. Miller deftly captures the feel of this village, the kind of rustic place that's charming to tourists, claustrophobic to inhabitants with big ideas.  Nothing can happen secretly there, certainly not Janine's brazen but clumsy thievery.  She leaves for a bigger town and gets hired as a maid by a well-to-do young couple.  They don't seem to know much more about being bosses than Janine knows about being a maid.  Everyone's a little awkward.  When the wife becomes pregnant she gives Janine her clothes, and advice about birth control.  Janine takes what they give impassively; she doesn't build any false emotion into the relationship, the way her bourgeois boss does.  When the woman has a miscarriage, Janine looks at her pained face and tells her: "Don't worry.  I'll give you back your clothes."  This sounds hard, but Janine says it without cynicism.  Like a child, she thinks about things concretely.  The story follows her adventures, which are both delightful and sadly desperate: her affair with a sweet older man who wants her to improve herself by going to secretarial school and reading "Les Miserables"; her escape with a boy her own age, another lost soul who believes in instant gratification.  Nothing comes easily to Janine.  She pays over and over for her chaotic quest for something better.  Yet even without the picture's overly explicit coda, you'd feel hopeful for her, maybe because the thought that she won't make it in the world is just too sad.  ---  From Denmark comes another period piece about a feisty young girl, this one told as a lovely fairy tale for grown-ups.  "Emma's Shadow," set in the '30s, is the story of an 11-year-old, a poor little rich girl who decides to grab the attention of her indifferent parents by staging her own kidnapping (after she sees that news of the Lindbergh kidnapping shakes her mother out of her usual torpor).  Emma takes to the streets, and ends up living with a sewage worker called Malthe, a sweet simple soul who believes this daunting child when she tells him she's a White Russian being chased by Bolsheviks.  Their strangely enchanted relationship becomes entirely believable in the hands of director Soeren Kragh-Jacobsen and the actors Line Kruse as Emma and Borje Ahlstedt as Malthe.  ---  VIDEO TIP: Though "The Little Thief" leaves Janine's future open to speculation, you can see what happened to Truffaut's Antoine Doinel.  The film maker continued to chronicle Doinel's progress through life in four films, all starring Jean-Pierre Leaud.  Third in the series, "Stolen Kisses," is available on videocassette; watch for "Love at Twenty" and "Bed and Board."  Culturally speaking, this city has increasingly displayed its determination to found the sort of institutions that attract the esteem of Eastern urbanites.  It's appropriate to applaud these civilizing influences: gleaming new palaces of art, an opera company, a triannual arts festival.  But this imported culture at times seems a bit like an invading force, threatening to quicken the pace, lighten the suntans and irreversibly alter the self-image of a once laid-back citizenry.  Amid all this Easternization, two distinctly Western museums have arrived on the scene.  In celebrating the lifestyle of the hero-on-horseback, both reel and real, they help breathe renewed life into the myth of California and the Southwest as a cultural frontier.  It doesn't matter that this myth is about as genuine as the plot of a Tom Mix movie.  What counts is that exploration of the myth brings insight into the American psyche's strange -- and still potent -- attraction to this region.  The Gene Autry Western Heritage Museum, the larger and more easily reached of the two, is an especially enthusiastic celebrant of the frontier fable.  Inspired by its extensive collections of cowboy spurs, chaps, boots, hats, holsters and guns, you can plunk down $150 for a 10-gallon hat in its gift shop and feel as if you've won the West.  The $54 million facility was founded and partly financed by the sprightly 82-year-old former cowboy crooner, who made a fortune in real estate, radio stations and sports teams.  The Autry has bucked the recent trend of downtown museums to which Angelenos might actually walk, Eastern-style.  You need horsepower to reach the vaguely mission-style building of terra-cotta-colored stucco towering over the intersection of the Ventura and Golden State freeways.  By contrast, the General George S. Patton Memorial Museum is a tiny institution with a single paid staff member.  But its location at the infamous World War II training camp in the Mojave Desert -- where a larger-than-life cowboy and his men prepared for battles that would transform them into heroes -- makes it well worth a visit.  It's about a 2 1/2-hour drive southeast of the city, near the splendidly isolated Joshua Tree National Monument, out beyond the reach of smog and cellular mobile telephones.  Any historical museum has to come to grips with the conflict between the real and romanticized accounts of the same period.  This conflict is particularly problematic where the West is concerned, because Western fiction, beginning with Owen Wister's bestselling "The Virginian" in 1902 and continuing through decades of "horse operas," has taken an extraordinary degree of license in its portrayal of life on the range.  Historians have traced the rise of Western myth-making to the turn of the century, when the frontier began to shrink and farming, or "sodbusting," caused a vast decrease in the need for the ranch hand -- the itinerant, semi-literate, poorly paid worker who nonetheless enjoyed better scenery than blue-collar workers back East.  He was replaced by the mythical cowboy-hero, the embodiment of those idealistic, democratic values that were thought to be as endangered as the frontier itself: courage, self-reliance, fairness, love of the outdoors, imagination, optimism and respect for the rights of others.  The Autry has apparently decided against dwelling on this conflict, opting instead for what its curator calls "a blend of the historical and the mythical," apparently with the view that the "Western heritage" of its title is both real and imagined.  The museum elevates actors such as Roy Rogers to the level of individuals such as Annie Oakley and Wyatt Earp.  Its mission is entertainment, and the audio and video-laden exhibits in its seven permanent galleries were even designed by the division of Walt Disney Co. that creates attractions at the company's theme parks.  As such, the Autry is as much fun as a visit to Disneyland.  Its centerpiece gallery features decades of Hollywood's best-known cowboy shows and radio programs, beginning with Thomas Edison's one-reelers in 1898.  Celluloid stars from William S. Hart to Clint Eastwood are shown in a series of short videos, and display cases are filled with clothing, records, posters and guns from television shows such as "Have Gun, Will Travel" and "The Rifleman."  There are, thankfully, no videos of the urban cowboy, John Travolta, riding a mechanical bull.  But reverential treatment, without a hint of irony, is given to an equally silly phenomenon -- the singing cowboy.  This surely has nothing to do with the fact that the museum's patron, of "Back in the Saddle Again" fame, earned his spurs and the seeds of his fortune as a glamorous radio and television crooner.  The one truly humorous touch in this area is a snippet of that cowboy "di tutti" cowboys, John Wayne, making his off-key film debut in a musical Western.  The museum galleries do contain artifacts of true frontier life that, if viewed carefully, help the non-expert focus on the contrast between fact and fiction.  If you linger in the gallery devoted to homesteading, with its diorama of a campsite set against rugged mountains, you'll hear recorded readings from pioneer diaries that tell of fierce hardships mingled with hope.  A chuck-wagon exhibit includes recorded Western folk songs, simple, honest stuff mostly sung a cappella by non-commercial artists.  Follow this with a visit to the gallery devoted to rodeo performers such as the daring Ms. Oakley, and you can see the genesis of the mythical Western hero (or heroine).  And you won't want to miss the exhibit of seldom-seen oil paintings of 19th-century California from the state's historical society, on view through Nov. 19.  Western myths are inadequate to describe the true-life exploits of the suburban Los Angeles kid who went on to vanquish Hitler's Desert Rat in Africa and lead the Third Army to victory in Europe -- only to die from wounds suffered in an auto accident.  Shortly after the Pearl Harbor bombing, George S. Patton opened the Army's Desert Training Center in what was -- and still is -- the middle of nowhere.  He wrote at the time: "From October to the end of May, the weather in the desert is what babies cry for and old, rich people pay large sums of money to obtain."  What he didn't say was that the rest of the year the desert would be hell for men living in tents.  The Patton museum, a modest concrete building on the site of the training center's one-time headquarters, contains only replicas of Gen. Patton paraphernalia, the true articles having long ago been housed at Fort Knox.  But it has guns, tanks, a room-size, three-dimensional contour map of Southern California and possessions of a few of the more than one million men who endured a Bedouin-like six months here.  As word of the museum has spread, families of former camp mates have helped its curator build a rich trove of the everyday accouterments of war.  Visitors in four-wheel-drive vehicles can ride through the ruins of the camp, which in its heyday comprised 18,000 square miles, including parts of Arizona and Nevada.  The museum is so remote that it doesn't yet have a telephone.  But the nearby Chiriaco Summit truck stop, whose proprietor donated land for the facility, will give directions {call (619) 227-3227}.  Not to be missed is a video of life at the camp and reminiscences by officers who served under "Old Blood and Guts."  He is shown wearing his two pearl-handled pistols on his hips, gunslinger style.  ---  Ms. Read, a former Journal reporter, is a free-lance writer in Los Angeles.  Those people out there who know how much you earn and how much you borrowed to buy your house -- not to mention where you live and when your baby's due -- will soon know what you eat in the privacy of your own home.  They'll know because you, hoping to reduce your grocery bills, joined a frequent shopper program at your local supermarket.  In exchange for saving $100 or more a year, you agreed to allow your purchases to become part of an electronic data base on shoppers' grocery-buying habits.  A computer will keep track of how often you (name, address, phone number, household income) buy Ding Dongs and how often pork rinds.  That's information lots of companies will pay for.  A few discount-for-data programs are already up and running, and several more are scheduled to begin testing in supermarket chains this fall.  For the supermarkets, these programs supposedly encourage customer loyalty.  But for some manufacturers, retailers and direct marketers, the programs will create increasingly narrow consumer profiles to be used in target marketing.  "This is data that's never been captured before," says L. Norman Howe of L. Norman Howe Associates, developer of a supermarket discount-for-data system.  "You can't get this information from the census or regular mailing lists.  The consumer has to spit it out himself."  The programs, which have been made possible by electronic scanners at checkout counters, raise some troubling privacy issues about companies marketing personal information about people's grocery preferences.  The sponsors note that the programs are voluntary and that people who don't want others to know what they buy at the grocery store simply won't join.  But that means customers sensitive to privacy will, in effect, pay higher prices on some items than those who aren't.  The potential for abusing this kind of data exists, says Fred Milman, senior consultant at David Shepard Associates, a direct-marketing and data-base marketing consulting firm.  Hypothetically, he says, consumers could get "Big Brotherish" personal letters saying that they hadn't bought enough groceries lately or spent too much on their eggs last week.  But Mr. Milman believes the companies involved in these programs are reputable, and will be "as sensitive about their data as some credit bureaus are about theirs," he says.  "These aren't people on the fringe."  Next month, Advanced Promotion Technologies, a joint venture of Donnelley Marketing, CheckRobot and Procter & Gamble, will begin testing a discount-for-data program in Dahl's supermarkets in Des Moines.  Seven manufacturers, including Kraft, Campbell Soup, Del Monte, Ralston Purina, Procter & Gamble, General Foods and Oscar Mayer, are participating in a club, in which shoppers will accumulate points toward merchandise in exchange for letting the computer accumulate records of their grocery habits.  "We'll know that Jane Smith, a frequent shopper, buys diapers, so we know she has a baby," says Kathy Robinson, marketing communications coordinator for Advanced Promotion Technologies.  "Then we can target market to her."  Citicorp POS Information Services Inc., a unit of Citicorp, will also begin testing a frequent shopper program this fall.  Members will get cash rebates on certain products in exchange for allowing a computer to assemble data about them.  Among the participants is Pathmark, a unit of Supermarkets General.  Although these frequent-shopper programs are marketed to retailers as a way of increasing customer loyalty, Robert Wunderle, economist and vice president of public affairs for Supermarkets General, says they're actually "just another thing to complicate the running of our business."  Mr. Wunderle says Pathmark is testing the Citicorp system because "it's a marketing distinction, another way a customer can do better shopping with us."  For Citicorp, however, the system will provide a customer diary, which can be marketed in a variety of ways.  For instance, a dog food manufacturer could eliminate direct-mail promotions to the 50% of Americans who don't own pets.  "Direct marketing is a very expensive form if you're using it as mass advertising," says Mr. Howe.  "But when you eliminate all the people who aren't prospective customers, then it becomes very effective."  Jim Ukrop, president of Richmond, Va.-based Ukrop's Super Markets, another chain that will be testing the Citicorp program, says his store's arrangement with Citicorp is that customers' names can't be used, nor may the telephone be used for direct-marketing efforts.  But Ukrop's uses the 190,000 names and addresses it has collected in its own frequent-shopper program to send monthly newsletters, and occasionally personalized letters, to customers.  While most of these discount-for-data programs are electronic, Mr. Howe's system works through the mail.  Customers receive a catalog filled with rebate offers and advertising from manufacturers.  Included in the catalog is a market research survey with questions about spending habits, credit cards, annual household income and more than a dozen other questions.  When Mr. Howe's customers return evidence of their purchases, so they can collect their rebates, 90% of them complete the questionnaire.  Mr. Milman says the applications for data collected this way are almost limitless.  "The opportunities are mind-boggling," he says.  "With this kind of data, you're not mass communicating, you're individually communicating."  ---  Saturn-esque Sales Meeting  Hal Riney & Partners, the agency handling the launch of General Motors Corp.'s new Saturn car division, got quite a crowd this week when it invited media advertising sales representatives to "help Hal Riney spend $100,000,000."  The agency rented the auditorium at the Palace of Fine Arts in San Francisco and packed in some 600 ad sales people hungry for information about how Riney and Saturn will spend a huge wad of advertising cash.  Riney senior vice president Patrick Sherwood called Tuesday's gathering an "unprecedented" event in the advertising business.  But holding one meeting for 600 people, instead of hundreds of separate meetings, is "a very Saturn-esque way of doing business," Mr. Sherwood said.  Also Saturn-esque was a lack of specifics about Saturn's product -- a U.S.-designed and built compact car aimed at recapturing ground lost to Japanese auto makers -- and its marketing strategy.  Those attending didn't see any clear pictures of the car or learn much about how Saturn will position itself in its ads.  Such details are "premature, since the car will not be out until late fall next year," said Mr. Sherwood.  Instead, Saturn and Riney officials -- but not Mr. Riney himself -- urged the assembled media people to "think like they've never thought before" about how Saturn ads could be presented.  Meanwhile, Saturn and Riney are still puzzling over some basic questions, such as how closely should Saturn tie itself to GM in its ads.  Saturn's cars are supposed to woo Honda and Toyota buyers back to the domestic fold.  But, as Mr. Sherwood says, "GM and Ford don't have good reputations with that consumer."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNTS: Conforama, a French retailer, named DDB Needham France agency of record for its $50 million ad account.  DDB Needham is a unit of the Omnicom Group.  The account was previously handled by MGTB/Ayer.  McDonald's Corp., Oak Brook, Ill., awarded its estimated $8 million Hispanic ad account to Castor GS&B Advertising, New York.  The account had been handled by Conill Advertising, New York. . . .  Ipco Corp.'s Sterling Optical unit, Woodbury, N.Y., awarded its $6 million account to Saatchi & Saatchi Advertising, New York.  The account had been handled by Bloom Cos.' Bloom Agency, New York.  Get out your flask and your earmuffs.  The football season is upon us.  High schoolers are hard at practice.  Pros are playing exhibition games.  And the college season begins tonight when Notre Dame plays Virginia in something called the Kickoff Classic in East Rutherford, N.J.  The newspapers and magazines have come out with their special football sections, laden with schedules (Notre Dame's seems tough), odds (Iowa State, which my sons and I watch, has a one-in-8,000 chance of winning the Big Eight, USA TODAY tells me), statistics (Georgia Southern, the "team to watch" in Division I-AA, has 18 starters returning), and trivia (this year, place kickers in college games can't use the plastic tee on field-goal attempts).  But here are some statistics that are being overlooked: This year, about 377,000 of the million or so youngsters playing football at 15,000 American high schools will be injured.  Of those, about 60,000 -- yes, 60,000 -- will suffer major injuries, injuries so severe that the youths will miss a minimum of three weeks of practice.  Perhaps 15,000 of those will require surgery.  And two dozen young football players will suffer fatal or catastrophic injuries -- injuries that leave the survivors paralyzed or brain-damaged.  Most of those figures come from John W. Powell, an athletic-trainer-turned-scholar who is a researcher in orthopedic surgery at University of Iowa Hospitals in Iowa City.  He conducted a study on football injuries for the National Athletic Trainers Association.  What he found is appalling.  What he found is that there will be 552,000 reportable injuries in high-school football this year, that 377,000 players will be hurt, that half of those will be hurt more than once, that the number of major injuries -- the ones keeping youngsters out of play for at least three weeks -- is increasing and that fewer than a quarter of the nation's high schools employ a qualified athletic trainer.  Mr. Powell, whose 14-year-old son will be playing football this year as a freshman at Iowa City West, doesn't say football is a dumb sport.  Nor does he say that kids who choose to play it are dumb.  But he does say there are some dumb parents involved.  "The real travesty is when you just turn your kid over to the school and let him play," says Mr. Powell, who has been an athletic trainer at West Point and Penn State as well as at a high school in Michigan.  "Would you let your child go to a day-care center without thoroughly investigating how he'd be cared for?"  Of course not, he answers, yet many parents don't investigate high-school football programs.  "Football has an inherent risk.  We know kids are going to get hurt," he says.  So he advises parents to ask the schools: Do you buy the best type of equipment?  Do you hire coaches with sensitivity toward injury protection?  Do you offer good conditioning programs?  If a boy is hurt, what's the mechanism to get medical attention?  How does the ambulance get there?  Which hospital does he go to?  If a school has a good plan of action that demonstrates it is concerned about a boy's welfare, then it's "better that he play than be out on the streets," says Mr. Powell.  But is that the choice?  Not usually.  And in fact Mr. Powell is too kind.  While everything he says is right -- in short, don't send your son to slaughter -- his statistics add weight to what you have suspected all along: Football is a dumb sport.  Football does little for a youngster in high school or college.  It often teaches the wrong values -- hit, slash, cheat, win at any cost.  It messes up the body.  And it does nothing for the mind.  Further, it provides nothing for the rest of a youth's life except memories, and those often are bad.  Tennis, golf, running, biking, swimming, even softball and sometimes basketball -- those are lifetime sports, sports that you can partake in forever, sports that you can enjoy with your children and grandchildren, your neighbors and colleagues.  A 50-year-old man can shoot baskets with his sons, play tennis or golf with his wife, go swimming with his father, play softball with the men and women from the office, go running with a neighbor, take a long, solo bike ride to think through the problems of the office.  But what 50-year-old is going to round up 21 of his buddies to go out and beat each other's brains out on a Saturday morning?  No one in his right mind.  If a 16-year-old spent his football time taking up tennis or golf instead -- let alone studying, but as the father of three I know it's folly to suggest a 16-year-old study; 16-year-olds already know everything -- he'd be better off physically (those are probably the safest sports, Mr. Powell says) and he'd be better prepared to participate happily in a sport when he becomes an adult.  He'd also learn better values and more useful skills.  "I advise everybody I know not to play the game," says Bill Reichardt, once a football great at the University of Iowa (leading rusher in the Big 10 in 1951, Chicago Tribune's pick as the most valuable player in the league that year), later a player with the Green Bay Packers and now a Des Moines businessman who is outspoken in his warnings about football.  "Football brings out a sadistic characteristic in a person that's unhealthy. . . .  It's a game of violence," says Mr. Reichardt, who now plays tennis, golf and handball.  "I advise kids to play any roundball sports.  I don't even like track and swimming because they don't allow for much thinking.  It's hard to outthink somebody in the 100-meter."  There are some solutions.  You could try to reason with your son and explain to him the dangers -- mental and physical -- in football.  But that, of course, wouldn't work.  Boys are boys.  You could run for the school board on a platform calling for the replacement of football with soccer, a sport that is less dangerous, more interesting and more challenging.  But you'd lose.  So you could follow the advice of Mr. Powell and demand that your son's school have a qualified trainer, a coach who cares about more than winning, and proper procedures for dealing with the injuries that you know will come.  That might work.  Meantime, it's football season once again.  Enjoy it.  Get out the flask and the earmuffs.  And the splints.  ---  Mr. Gartner is editor and co-owner of the Daily Tribune in Ames, Iowa, and president of NBC News in New York.  If you believe Wall Street's sharply negative reaction this week, Lomas Financial must be hovering at death's door.  But the real-estate and financial-services company's imminent demise, as Mark Twain once noted, may have been greatly exaggerated.  When Lomas announced Monday that it didn't expect to complete its crucial senior-debt restructuring by tomorrow, when $145 million matures, stock traders started hanging black crepe.  By Tuesday, the company's stock price plunged 52% in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, closing at 2 7/8 on the Big Board (the stock recovered slightly yesterday, closing at 3 1/4 a share).  For the first time, the possibility of bankruptcy proceedings loomed.  Indeed, a person close to the negotiations says the company warned recalcitrant bankers yesterday that it might resort to a Chapter 11 bankruptcy filing if they don't bend a little.  Lomas "said that it has responsibilities to a number of constituencies in addition to its lenders, including shareholders, customers and employees and that it would take whatever actions are necessary to protect" them, the person said.  The sticking point, according to people familiar with the talks, is Lomas's insistence that the proposed new $1.45 billion credit facility cover any principal payments that might come due during the two-year life of the facility.  Of particular concern are some $200 million of liquid-yield option notes outstanding.  If holders exercise their option to cash out, Lomas would have to come up with $180 million next February -- something the cash-starved company would be hard pressed to do without help.  But some experts who follow the company contend that a wake is premature.  They view Lomas's bankruptcy-filing threat as more of a bargaining chip than a likelihood.  According to the person close to the negotiations, Lomas has already reached a "basic accord" with its lead banks, Chase Manhattan Bank and Bank of New York.  What's more, the company's investment banker, Merrill Lynch, has weighed in with some concessions that should ease the banks' worries.  The stock's free fall "appears to be a bit overdone," says Bruce G. Garrison, an analyst at Houston-based Lovett Mitchell Webb & Garrison.  Mr. Garrison puts the chance of a bankruptcy filing at just 30%, in part because the company's bankers are unsecured and therefore could stand to lose a lot in a Chapter 11 proceeding.  He is telling his gutsier clients to start buying if Lomas slips to 2 1/2 a share, and predicts that the stock will "probably rebound to the 4 or 5 level" in six months -- if, of course, the company and its bankers can reach an understanding.  Frank Anderson, an analyst with Stephens Inc., Little Rock, Ark., also thinks the market may have overreacted, perhaps because Lomas Financial is based in the heart of the American thrift industry's graveyard.  "I think you've got a psychology factor," he says, noting that some holders apparently decided to get out at any price.  "I think you had some real panic selling."  The bank-debt restructuring is the centerpiece of Lomas Financial's months-long effort to shrink its way back to profitability after two straight years of heavy losses.  Lomas, which began life as a mortgage banker in 1894, is trying to unload many of the financial-services businesses it acquired during its recent diversification binge, and thereby chop overall debt to about $2.1 billion from $5.6 billion.  It has already had some success: Earlier this month, Lomas sold its credit-card operations for $435 million in cash and $65 million in preferred stock to a group led by Merrill Lynch Capital Partners Inc.  The move, which will result in a gain of about $70 million during the first fiscal quarter, ending Sept. 30, also removed some $1.3 billion in debt from the books. (According to a Lomas official, Merrill Lynch has agreed to buy back Lomas's preferred stake and essentially put its own $40 million preferred stake in Lomas on an equal basis with bank debt, if the banks agree to the company's restructuring terms.)  But so far Lomas has come up empty-handed in its eight-month search for a buyer for its commercial-leasing subsidiary.  Company officials now concede their initial asking price was too optimistic.  "Early on in the process we received a bid that, if we had that bid today, we probably would take," says one official, who declines to disclose the price.  The company also stunned Wall Street in its fiscal fourth quarter by taking a massive, $253 million special charge, much of it connected to its vast real-estate holdings in the depressed Texas market and to problems in its core mortgage-banking business.  Jess Hay, Lomas Financial's chairman and chief executive, said that, with those charges behind it, the company will be "modestly profitable" in its operations this quarter, without giving effect to extraordinary items.  "I foresee that total recovery will require a couple years to fully manifest its results," he adds.  Meantime, Lomas Financial's problems may have unfairly tarred Lomas & Nettleton Mortgage Investors, a separately traded company in which Lomas Financial has a 2.3% interest.  Lomas & Nettleton shares rose sharply yesterday after Merrill Lynch analyst Thomas Kearns pointed out the difference and issued a report saying the stock is relatively cheap.  ---  Lomas Financial  (NYSE; Symbol: LFC)  Business: Financial services and real estate  Year ended June 30, 1989:  Revenue: $609.9 million  Net loss: $282.4 million vs. $56.4 million*  Average daily trading volume: 144,909 shares  Common shares outstanding: 30 million  *Latest week includes a $261.2 million charge vs. $93 million net charge in prior year.  United Airlines pilot union leaders completed their second day of meetings in New York without announcing any offer for UAL Corp.  Operating under an informal deadline set for today by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, who has made a $6.19 billion, $275-a-share bid for the company, the pilots planned to continue meeting today.  According to someone familiar with the talks, some of the issues outstanding included the percentage of the pilots' proposed ownership stake, and how the nation's second-largest airline company would be governed under a possible management-led buy-out.  United's board is expected to meet later this week to consider the Davis offer and any proposal generated by the pilots and UAL management.  The labor-management offer is expected to include participation by British Airways PLC, but details remain unknown.  West Germany is bracing for the possible influx of thousands of additional East German refugees who are expected to pass through the Austro-Hungarian border this weekend.  West German government spokesman Hans Klein confirmed yesterday that Bonn was preparing for the "rapid, sudden arrival of a very large number" of East German refugees in the next few days.  Earlier, West German press reports had said that Hungary will soon allow thousands of vacationing East Germans to leave that country, breaking a diplomatic standoff between the two German states over how to deal with the vacationers.  Mr. Klein declined to estimate how many additional refugees Bonn was anticipating.  But diplomatic sources estimate that perhaps as many as 10% of the 150,000 East Germans vacationing in Hungary will seek passage to the West.  An estimated 6,000 East German citizens have fled through Hungary since May, when the Hungarian government, in an unprecedented move, dismantled the barbed wire that marked its border with the West.  In all, East Germany is expected to lose at least 100,000 citizens this year as people flee a nation whose leaders continue to resist the democratic reforms introduced throughout much of the Soviet bloc.  The tide of refugees, who under West German law are eligible for automatic citizenship, has forced Bonn to open up new processing camps to handle the overflow.  To prepare for the latest influx, Mr. Klein said Bonn had requested that the state government in Bavaria prepare four additional tent camps there, each of which would handle 1,000 refugees.  For most of this summer, Bonn and East Berlin have been locked in a diplomatic standoff over how to resolve the crisis.  Diplomatic sources say, however, that the impasse probably will be broken this weekend, mainly through the intervention of the Hungarian government.  Because most of the vacation visas expire this weekend with the resumption of school in East Germany, those citizens wishing to emigrate will be forced to either return to their country or cross through the loosely controlled Austro-Hungarian border.  Once the vacationers have left the country, East Germany is expected to impose tougher restrictions to limit the number of its citizens traveling to Hungary.  Just how the new influx of East Germans might pass to the West is unclear.  The exodus has put the Hungarian government in a bind.  Although it wants to avoid mass defections to keep from further angering East Berlin, it also has pledged not to force the East Germans to go home.  In an effort to find a compromise, Hungarian Prime Minister Miklos Nemeth and his foreign minister, Gyula Horn, flew to Bonn last Friday for four hours of private talks with senior West German officials.  The Hungarian government yesterday issued a statement denying that it was opening its borders to all East German citizens who want to emigrate.  But Bonn officials are apparently convinced that while Budapest might not be prepared to issue exit visas, it may instruct its border guards to look the other way when emigres seek passage.  Meanwhile, the exodus has confronted the East German regime, led by its ailing and unyielding leader Erich Honecker, with a crisis unparalleled since the building of the Berlin Wall.  Mr. Honecker, who as security chief presided over the wall's construction in 1961, heads a ruling Politburo that is dominated by old, conservative and sickly men.  Mr. Honecker himself has been hospitalized twice this summer with a gallbladder ailment and wasn't seen publicly on his 77th birthday last Friday.  The Associated Press, quoting West German security officials, reported yesterday that a gallbladder operation on Mr. Honecker had failed, indicating that he remains seriously ill.  The communist leader won't attend the Leipzig trade fair, opening Sunday, as had been his custom, East German government sources said yesterday.  Two high-ranking deputies, Willi Stoph and Guenter Mittag, were also said to be sick and unable to attend the fair.  Mr. Honecker's prolonged absence has contributed to the impression of a government unable to cope with the crisis.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  DISPOSABLE DIAPERS WERE BORN IN 1961, a near-record baby-boom year, and soon threatened the safety pin and triangle fold.  That year the product still accounted for less than 1% of the 60 to 100 weekly changes on the 4.3 million babies born in the U.S.  The official baby-boom era was 1948-1964.  After World War II, a Swedish company had sold baby diapers with insertable pads, but they were inconvenient and leaked.  The pioneer of the idea for a truly disposable diaper reportedly was Vic Mills, the Procter & Gamble engineer who had made Ivory soap sudsier.  In late 1956, Mills suggested to a P&G group that a fluffy paper product applied to a baby's bottom would sell.  His proteges -- Robert C. Duncan and Norma L. Baker, two Procter & Gamble scientists -- developed the idea and filled a patent on Pampers on July 17, 1961; it was awarded in 1965.  Its test of Pampers (plastic over an absorbent pad) in Peoria, Ill., didn't play well because of the 10 cents-a-pad price.  A 1966 test in Sacramento, Calif., at six cents a pad was a success.  New competitors jumped in to fight for the market.  Kimberly-Clark's Kimbies came in 1968 with a more-absorbent pad and tape closures.  This company followed in 1978 with hourglass-shaped, elastic fit Huggies.  P&G responded in 1980 with "superabsorbent" Luvs, which had elastic gathers.  In between, Johnson & Johnson from 1971 to 1981 offered Chux.  Currently, disposables account for about 80% to 85% of the $3 billion-plus annual diaper market, with the balance held by cloth diaper services or those still using the pin and cloth.  There have been charges that disposables in landfills could be harmful to the public's health.  Kimberly-Clark, claiming that less than 1% of landfill is diapers, is seeking new materials degradable under the sun's rays.  And P&G is working on recycling ideas.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  RAY KROC WAS SELLING PAPER CUPS and soda-fountain multimixers when he met the McDonald brothers of California.  Impressed with their hamburger operation (and the size of their order for his mixers), Kroc took over their franchising and in 1961 bought them out for $2.7 million.  By that time, the golden arches were in place, sales had reached $37 million, and Kroc's Hamburger University in Chicago was handing out degrees in "hamburgerology" to its first graduating class.  By the time he went public in 1965, Kroc was counting his hamburgers by the billions and his french fries by the ton. (His potato supplier, Jack Simplot of Idaho, now ranks as one of the richest men in the U.S.) Kroc kept adding new touches.  First was a fish sandwich.  The Egg McMuffin (ham and egg on an English muffin) arrived in 1973; Chicken McNuggets appeared in 1983 and McDonald's was soon the second-largest chicken retailer in the world (topped only by Kentucky Fried Chicken).  The health craze made salads a McDonald's standard in 1987.  Today, hot dogs and pizza are on the fire.  Kroc crossed into Canada in 1967 and his 3,000th store, in 1974, was in Great Britain.  Now the golden arches are global -- Oxford Street in London, The Champs Elysees in Paris, the Ginza in Tokyo, Pizza d'Espagna in Rome.  Next year, 20 McDonald's are planned in Moscow.  The McDonald's chain in now 75% franchised, the rest company-owned.  The parent owns the sites and the store shells of all 10,700 outlets, though the local operators have leeway in decorating and other areas.  Ronald McDonald, for example, the clown mascot whose first portrayer was the Today Show's Willard Scott, was a creation of a Philadelphia franchiser.  Ray Kroc died in 1984 but his hand is still evident.  McDonald's chairman, Fred Turner, was Kroc's man-at-the-grill in Des Plaines, Ill., in 1955.  And like the founder, Turner concentrates at the ground level.  McDonald's, he insists, "is a multilocal company, not a multinational]"  Dr. Joseph C. Allegra will become president and chief operating officer of this healthcare concern on Oct. 1.  Dr. Allegra, chairman of the Department of Medicine at the University of Louisville School of Medicine, will succeed Tommy H. Carter, who had asked to reduce his responsibilities with the company.  Mr. Carter will remain on the company's board.  Rozanne L. Ridgway was elected to the board of this consumer products concern.  The election of Mrs. Ridgway, a former U.S. assistant secretary of state for European and Canadian affairs, increases the total board membership to 13 from 12.  Joseph A. Verderber, formerly vice president, corporate business development, at this graphics equipment concern, was named president of the new specialty products unit, and Ger Middendorp, formerly executive vice president, international, was named to the new post of vice president and general manager, Europe, which includes six international divisions.  Robert E. Tallon, president of this holding company's Florida Power & Light Co. subsidiary, and Marshall M. Criser, a lawyer, have been elected to its board.  Messrs.  Tallon, 63 years old, and Criser, 60, will succeed FPL Group Chairman John J. Hudiburg, and director John D. Macomber.  Both are members of the utility subsidiary's board.  Cigna Corp., Philadelphia, said it completed the sale of its Horace Mann Cos. insurance unit for about $484 million.  The business was bought by an investor group that includes several members of the unit's senior management and Gibbons, Green van Amerongen, a New York investment banking firm that specializes in leveraged buy-outs, in which a small group of investors acquires a company largely with debt that ultimately is paid with funds generated by the acquired company.  The sale, announced in August 1988, reflects an increased effort by Cigna to concentrate on wholesale insurance and investment products.  Cigna said the sale doesn't include Horace Mann's California property-casualty business, which has a book value of about $15 million.  When Horace Mann was put up for sale in summer 1987, Cigna carried the unit on its books at a value of $340 million.  The new majority stockholder of Newport Electronics Inc. filed a class action suit in a federal court in California to block the company's management from paying a "bust-up" fee to a prior suitor.  According to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, shareholder Milton B. Hollander seeks to void an agreement between Newport and a unit of Sensor Control Corp. Sensor, a Sunnyvale, Calif., maker of pressure sensors and gauges, had made a tender offer for Newport, a Santa Ana, Calif.-based maker of electronic measuring devices.  Newport canceled an accord to be acquired by Sensor when a higher bid came in from High Technology Holding Co. of Stamford, Conn., which is owned by Mr. Hollander.  Newport had previously agreed to pay a $400,000 fee to Sensor if the transaction didn't go through.  It is this agreement that Mr. Hollander, who now owns 48% of Newport, charges is illegal.  Newport director Norman E. Gray said the company was still planning to pay the fee and had no comment on the suit.  Diodes Inc. of Chatsworth, Calif., said it renewed merger discussions with Willas Co.  In 1986, the two companies agreed in principle for Diodes to acquire the closely held Willas, but the agreement was never implemented and the matter was later suspended.  Willas, based in Hong Kong, sells electronic parts and semiconductor products in the Asian market.  It reported revenue for the fiscal year ended March 31 of $26 million.  Diodes supplies semiconductor rectifiers with sales concentrated primarily in the U.S.  The company also maintains engineering, manufacturing, purchasing and sales facilities in Taipei, Taiwan.  Diodes noted that none of the essential terms of a merger or consolidation pact have been agreed upon at this time, but the company said it hopes to decide the feasibility of such a transaction "in the near future."  New York-based Unitel Video Inc., which provides studio and mobile production facilities for television, said it definitively agreed to be acquired by a new affiliate of closely held Kenmare Capital Corp., a New York investment firm, for $15 a share, or about $33.6 million.  The pact is subject to availability of financing, Unitel said.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Unitel shares closed at $14, unchanged.  Unitel previously announced a definitive agreement to be acquired for $14 a share, or $31.3 million, by an affiliate of U.E.I. PLC, a British maker of video and audio equipment.  Unitel said U.E.I. participated in the talks with Kenmare and approved the agreement.  U.E.I. holds 28% of Unitel and has an option on another 28%.  Unitel said the merger accord between it and U.E.I. will be dropped if the transaction is completed with Kenmare, which controls Compact Video Group, a post-production concern for television and film.  Unitel had net income for the nine months ended May 31 of $1.3 million, or 57 cents a share, on sales of $28.1 million.  Sea Containers Ltd. said it has held discussions concerning the acquisition of an unidentified concern's business.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Sea Containers said no agreement has been reached and there are "no assurances that any such agreement will be reached" or recommended to the board.  It added that the other firm's business would complement part of its operations.  The filing said that such a purchase is not part of the current recapitalization being developed by Sea Containers.  According to the filing, Sea Containers doesn't plan to disclose the party or possible terms relating to the potential purchase "unless or until" an agreement is reached.  A spokesman for Sea Containers, based in Hamilton, Bermuda, wouldn't comment beyond the SEC filing.  The company provides marine cargo services.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Sea Containers closed yesterday at $64.875, down $1.125.  An attempt by two ousted directors of Staar Surgical Co. to place the company under bankruptcy-law protection was thrown out by a federal judge.  Granting of the motion to dismiss the Chapter 11 petition clears the way for Thomas R. Waggoner, Staar's president, to proceed with an $11 million sales and leasing agreement with Chiron Opthalmics Inc., the Monrovia, Calif., company said.  It was that agreement to which the directors had objected.  During the dispute, Mr. Waggoner fired everyone on the board.  The four directors responded by seeking to fire Mr. Waggoner and they locked him out of Staar's buildings.  Two weeks ago, Mr. Waggoner obtained a temporary restraining order in state court prohibiting the former directors from doing business under the Staar name.  A hearing on the preliminary injunction is scheduled for Sept. 5.  Attorneys for the two directors involved in the Chapter 11 bid didn't return calls.  Centel Corp. said its Central Telephone Co. unit agreed to refund $2 million to Illinois customers under a pact reached with a consumer group.  If state regulators approve the agreement, the Chicago communications concern said, about 134,000 Illinois customers of the unit will receive the $2 million in the form of credits on their future phone bills.  A Centel spokesman said the agreement will have "no impact" on earnings because the company previously set aside reserves for the matter.  The settlement with the consumer group, Citizens Utility Board, revolves around lower tax levels Central Telephone paid under tax-law changes that were legislated in 1986.  Upon approval by the Illinois Commerce Commission, the telephone unit will additionally trim its billings to Illinois customers by $1 million annually.  Anadarko Petroleum Corp., an energy exploration and development concern, said it completed the $25.3 million purchase of a 95% working interest in certain oil producing properties in West Texas from Parker & Parsley Development Partners L.P., an energy concern, and related parties.  Anadarko has agreed to purchase the remaining 5% working interest in the properties.  General Microelectronics Corp. said that it changed its name to Supercomputing Solutions Inc. and that its Nasdaq trading symbol was changed to SUPR from GMIC.  The company makes supercomputers, minisupercomputers and software for the aerospace, defense and electronics industries.  MAIL BOXES ETC., San Diego, declared a 3-for-2 common stock split, payable Oct. 16 to holders of record Sept. 18.  The franchiser of postal, business and communication service centers said the split will boost the number of shares outstanding to 3,817,675 from 2,545,117.  VIRCO MANUFACTURING Corp., Los Angeles, declared a 10% stock dividend on its common stock, payable Oct. 1 to shareholders of record Sept. 7.  The concern, which makes furniture for educational and contract markets and produces juvenile furniture, has paid a 10% stock dividend for the past eight years.  West German construction companies received 10.4% more orders in real, or price-adjusted, terms in the 1989 first half than a year earlier, the Construction Industry Federation said.  In June, orders rose 16.4% to 8.7 billion marks ($4.43 billion), or, in real terms, increased 13.1%, compared with a year earlier, the federation said.  First-half business construction orders jumped 14.3% in real terms.  Construction permits for new multifamily houses also rose sharply, the federation said.  The federation cautioned that, despite the overall increase in orders, employment in the construction industry remains problematic in certain parts of West Germany.  Amertek Inc., which designs and makes specialty vehicles, said it was awarded a contract to supply the U.S. Navy with 74 fire-fighting vehicles, and an option for an additional 44 vehicles, for a total value of 20.5 million Canadian dollars (US$17.5 million).  Amertek said it expects the options to be exercised within six months.  Japan's index of leading indicators fell in June to 36.4, below the boom-or-bust line of 50, but the Economic Planning Agency attributed the decline to temporary distortions and insisted the economy is still growing briskly.  The agency said the leading indicators fell back from a revised 75 in May, largely because a number of components, with values measured against March, fell into the minus column as the March figures were driven higher by the impending introduction of a consumption tax on April 1.  An agency spokesman said that, for example, shipments of consumer durables shot up, just ahead of the tax's introduction, on strong demand for goods before the levy drove prices up.  This component was one of four that fell into the minus column from the plus column in the previous month.  Of the 13 components, seven registered minus in June, four plus, and two neutral.  Japan's major retailers registered sales of 1.887 trillion yen ($13.06 billion) in July, up 8.7% from a year earlier, the Ministry of International Trade and Industry said.  The pace of growth, after being hurt by wild swings just before and after the introduction of a sales tax in April, has returned to levels in line with those of early this year.  Just before the tax was imposed, sales soared 25% on a year-to-year basis, as consumers rushed to buy before the retail stores began boosting prices to reflect the 3% tax.  After the tax was introduced, the buying spree came to an abrupt halt and sales were essentially flat, compared with the year-earlier month.  Japanese consumer demand has been supported by rapidly rising wages in recent months, a trend that should stay in place, as the labor supply is tight.  The prime minister's office said that payrolls in July posted the largest increase since November 1973, rising by 1.35 million persons from a year earlier.  Japan's seasonally adjusted jobless rate stood at 2.2% in the month.  Howard Wetston, a 42-year-old government lawyer, was named to be Canada's top antitrust official, effective Oct. 30.  He will succeed Calvin Goldman as director of investigation and research at the Bureau of Competition Policy.  Mr. Wetston is the bureau's senior deputy director of investigation and research.  Mr. Goldman, a lawyer, will return to the private sector, his office said.  He has held the antitrust post since May 1986.  Wicor Inc., a utility holding company, said its board adopted an anti-takeover measure involving the distribution of common-stock purchase rights to shareholders.  The company said that it isn't aware of any effort to acquire it, and that the plan wasn't adopted as a response to any takeover effort.  Under the plan, in certain circumstances, each right entitles the holder to buy stock in Wicor or the surviving company at half price.  One right for each common share held will be distributed Sept. 14 and expire 10 years later.  Rockingham Bancorp said shareholders approved Eastern Bancorp's acquisition of Rockingham for $17.75 a share, or about $21.1 million.  Eastern Bancorp is based in Burlington, Vt.  Stoneridge Resources Inc. said it won an auction for Acceptance Insurance Holdings Inc. and will buy the property and casualty insurance firm in a cash transaction that could total about $35.1 million.  If the plan wins regulatory and shareholder approvals, Acceptance will become Stoneridge's only 100%-owned operating unit that has both cash flow and earnings, a Stoneridge spokeswoman said.  Stoneridge is a holding company that owns 50.4% of Orange-co, Inc., a Florida citrus grower, 28.8% of Radice Corp., a Florida land-development company, and 25.3% of Major Realty Corp., a Florida real estate company.  Trading in Acceptance and Stoneridge stocks was halted yesterday prior to the announcement of the transaction.  When trading resumed, Acceptance shares jumped $1.75 to $20.75 in national over-the-counter trading, closing at that level.  Stoneridge shares closed at $9.125, unchanged, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Stoneridge is offering $22.45 for each Acceptance share, and will add as much as 32 cents a share, depending on "the resolution of certain contingencies" in the acquisition agreement.  Stoneridge already owns 148,700 Acceptance shares, or about 8.8% of the 1.7 million shares outstanding.  Its offer for the remaining Acceptance shares gives the transaction an indicated value of about $34.6 million.  If Stoneridge kicks in the additional cash, it will add about $494,000 to the purchase price, making the final value about $35.1 million.  Stoneridge had made several previous offers to buy Acceptance, but was turned down.  Acceptance then conducted a sealed-bid auction, and declared Stoneridge the winner, the Stoneridge spokeswoman said.  Imperial Corp. of America, parent of Imperial Savings Association, said it intends to replace Arthur Young & Co. with Touche Ross & Co. as the institution's independent public accountants.  The action is subject to regulatory review.  The thrift holding company, based here, said Arthur Young resigned as Imperial's accounting firm because of a conflict of interest that resulted from Arthur Young's recent merger with Ernst & Whinney.  Imperial has a lawsuit pending against Ernst & Whinney.  Basf AG said it is buying Aurolin, a closely held Mexican paint maker, to boost its presence in Mexico.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The West German chemicals group said Aurolin, one of Mexico's largest paint companies, has capacity to make about 17,000 tons of paint a year at four production sites.  Aurolin, which employs 400 people, had 1988 sales of $22 million.  Superior Industries International Inc. said it received a contract to supply aluminum road wheels to Mazda Motor Corp. of Japan.  The amount of the contract wasn't disclosed.  Mazda will use the wheels on its 4x2 mini-pickup, Superior said.  Mazda will work on the program in collaboration with Topy Industries Ltd., the largest wheel maker in Japan.  Superior supplies cast aluminum wheels for Ford Motor Co. and General Motors Corp., along with other products, and also serves the national automotive aftermarket with a broad range of accessory and recreational-vehicle products.  France's seasonally adjusted foreign trade deficit bulged to 7.48 billion francs ($1.13 billion) in July from a revised 3.1 billion francs in June, the National Customs Office said.  The July deficit was significantly wider than expectations, which had been for little change from the previously estimated June deficit of 2.8 billion francs.  But French bond and currency markets showed little or no immediate reaction to the figures.  The latest monthly result left the adjusted deficit for the first seven months of the year at 24.74 billion francs, compared with a year-earlier deficit of 13.39 billion.  On an unadjusted basis, the July deficit was 3.26 billion francs, little changed from the revised June gap of 3.18 billion francs but wider than the 1.07 billion franc deficit in July 1988.  July's erosion of the adjusted trade account was led by a 6.1% drop in exports to 91.57 billion francs from 97.5 billion in June.  Part of this drop reflected a decline in shipments of Airbus commercial jets to four in July from 14 the previous month.  Imports eased by 1.5% in July to 99.06 billion francs from 100.6 billion.  The July deficit in manufactured goods widened to 9.31 billion francs from 3.39 billion in June.  This erosion partly reflected the drop in Airbus exports.  An economist at one Paris bank said of the markets' lack of reaction, "The consensus seems to be that it is largely due to the erratic nature of seasonal correction factors, which we've seen previously during the summer months."  She pointed out that there was little change in the unadjusted July figures from the previous month.  Andrew J. Oliver was named president of Conning International Inc., a new post at the London affiliate of this investment company that specializes in the insurance industry.  Mr. Oliver, 42 years old, had been a senior vice president of Conning & Co.  Frank A. Ehmann, 55-year-old president and chief operating officer, resigned to pursue personal interests, effective Sept. 18.  The office products wholesaler said its chairman and chief executive officer, Joel D. Spungin, 51, will succeed Mr. Ehmann.  United Stationers said Mr. Ehmann will continue with the company as a consultant, but will no longer serve as a board member.  Donald C. McVearry, 45-year-old senior auditor at this diversified bank holding company, was named an executive vice president.  International Dairy Queen Inc. said it will introduce soft frozen yogurt in early 1990 after successfully test marketing the product in 300 Dairy Queen stores.  Participating Dairy Queen stores will offer nonfat yogurt in cones or cups served with fruit, nuts, candy and other toppings.  Dairy Queen also will sell yogurt blended with toppings.  "Yogurt has found a special place in the dessert market," said Michael P. Sullivan, the company's president.  A spokeswoman said, however, that soft frozen yogurt wouldn't be a required product for Dairy Queen franchises.  There are more than 5,100 Dairy Queen stores in the U.S. and other countries.  Pantera's Corp., which is in a liquidity crunch, said it had completed the sale of its Branch Cheese Co. unit to International Cheese Co., Hinesburg, Vt.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The Pizza Inn owner said proceeds would be used to reduce debt, including about $6.5 million in secured indebtedness.  The company missed a $4.7 million principal-and-interest payment due to banks Aug. 1 but has received waivers for 30 days from any default.  Colorado National Bankshares Inc. said it had authorized the purchase of as much as $15 million of its 11 7/8% notes due Feb. 1, 1993, at prices based on market conditions.  This is in addition to the about $15 million of 11 7/8% notes bought back in accordance with a previous authorization late last month, the company said.  New York investor Frank J.A. Cilluffo rejected an Amdura Corp. proposal to end his efforts to unseat the company's board of directors.  The Denver-based hardware and automotive distributor and specialty manufacturer said yesterday that it had offered Mr. Cilluffo the right to nominate two persons to serve on its board, provided that he end his efforts to unseat all current directors.  Under the proposal, Mr. Cilluffo, the principal of Cilluffo Associates L.P., would also have to agree not to try to unseat the board or engage in proxy contests before the company's 1991 annual meeting.  But in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission later in the day, Mr. Cilluffo said his group continues to believe that the interests of the company's stockholders would be best served by the current board with Cilluffo designees.  He added that his efforts to solicit written consents from Amdura shareholders would continue.  Cilluffo Associates owns an 18.1% stake in Amdura.  If successful in replacing the board, Cilluffo Associates has said it would try to hire a new chief executive officer and dispose of certain Amdura assets.  In previous SEC filings, Mr. Cilluffo has expressed concern that shareholder equity would be diluted by Amdura's efforts to refinance a $40 million bridge loan used to acquire CoastAmerica Corp. in 1988.  The bridge loan is scheduled to come due Sept. 27, but Amdura said yesterday that it had received a proposal from its banker, Continental Illinois Corp., to extend the loan to Oct. 31, 1990 and to provide additional working capital if the dispute with Mr. Cilluffo is settled.  The company also said it has received proposals from three other banks for repaying the bridge loan and other debts.  But all of those proposals also depend on Mr. Cilluffo's cooperation.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Amdura closed yesterday at $14.125, down 37.5 cents.  The economy grew far faster in the second quarter than the government initially believed, the Commerce Department said.  The real gross national product -- the value of the nation's output of goods and services, adjusted for inflation -- expanded at a 2.7% annual rate over April, May and June, the department said.  That's a full percentage point faster than the agency originally reported.  Most of the revision stemmed from new data showing considerably greater spending by individual Americans than earlier information indicated.  The government also spent more.  But business inventories were slimmer than the government first calculated.  While many economists said the revision confirms that the economy is safe from imminent recession, they said it also means interest rates are unlikely to decline significantly for the time being.  In June, after data suggested economic activity was slackening substantially, the Federal Reserve Board began nudging interest rates down for the first time in more than a year in an effort to steer the economy clear of recession.  "These numbers assure that the danger of a recession is sufficiently small that we can forget about it," said Lyle Gramley, chief economist at the Mortgage Bankers Association and a former member of the Reserve Board.  He also said the report "means there's no urgency for the Fed to ease at the moment."  The second-quarter growth compared with a first-quarter expansion at an annual rate of 3.7%.  But the government attributed 2.2 percentage points of the first-quarter pace to a return to normal farm production after last year's ruinous drought -- a one-time increase.  The GNP report did contain a troubling figure.  After-tax profits of U.S. corporations plummeted 5.4% in the second quarter to a seasonally adjusted annual rate of $164.3 billion.  That was the steepest drop since corporate profits tumbled 16.5% in the first quarter of 1986, the department said.  In the first quarter of this year, profits slipped 1.1%.  But in a sign that falling interest rates may be starting to spur economic activity, the Commerce Department said in a separate report that sales of newly built single-family homes shot up 14.4% in July to a 739,000 annual rate.  The home sales figure, which is subject to large revisions, was unchanged in June; the June figure was originally reported as a 5.5% increase.  And even though economic activity in the second quarter was greater than the government thought, inflation was slightly less.  The annual rate of inflation based on a fixed basket of goods and services in the GNP inched down to 5.1% from the government's first calculation of 5.2%.  Part of the price rise -- which followed a 4.8% annual rate of increase in the first quarter -- came from higher energy costs, which have since headed downward.  Overall, the GNP report "suggests that we are continuing to have moderate or respectable economic growth while inflation pressures stay intact," said Samuel D. Kahan, chief financial economist at Kleinwort Benson Government Securities in Chicago.  He added, "The inflation situation, though high, is not at a politically intolerable level."  The new estimates also increase the possibility that the Bush administration could realize its 2.9% forecast for economic growth this year -- and thus generate enough tax revenue to bring the budget deficit within targets set by federal law.  "It looks increasingly as though the administration's economic forecast is reachable for calendar '89," Mr. Gramley said.  The administration had been growing increasingly distressed by the economy's pace -- so much so that Richard Darman, the White House budget director, recently called publicly for the Fed to ease its clamp on interest rates.  Some Fed policy makers, too, had been unnerved by the Commerce Department's initial calculation last month that the economy grew at an annual rate of 1.7% in the second quarter, the poorest performance in three years.  But yesterday's revision was largely expected by economists and the financial markets, because the government recently reported substantial upward revisions to a number of economic indicators used in calculating the GNP.  Overall, the economy's output equaled a $5.204 trillion annual rate in the second quarter, or $4.134 trillion after adjusting for inflation.  Iraq's second oil export pipeline across Saudi Arabia will begin operations next month, Iraqi Oil Minister Issam Abdul-Rahim al Chalabi told the Saudi paper al-Yaum.  The pipeline will boost Iraq's crude export capacity from the Saudi port of Yanbu to 1.65 million barrels a day from the current 500,000 barrels a day.  Regarding oil exploration, the minister said recent discoveries have lifted Iraq's crude oil reserves above the 100 billion barrels estimated in January 1988.  However, he said, the discoveries require further study before a new reserve figure is published.  The Interstate Commerce Commission said it suspended conflicting tariffs filed by CSX Corp. and Guilford Transportation Industries Inc. that could have derailed $32 million of yearly freight shipments between the two railroads.  The suspension will last until Jan. 31, 1990, while the agency investigates the tariff filings.  The tariffs had been scheduled to take effect today.  The filings involve freight charge payments between CSX, Richmond, Va., and Guilford's Maine Central Railroad Co. unit.  Shippers had vigorously protested the filings, which they said could have stalled freight shipments between the two railroads if both tariffs were allowed to take effect.  Earlier this month CSX said it would stop interchanging freight with the Maine Central unless CSX collects all charges from freight shippers and receivers.  CSX said it was concerned about late payments from the Maine Central.  Closely held Guilford, North Billerica, Mass., then said it would insist on collecting all charges on shipments between the two railroads.  Pitney Bowes Inc., the business equipment and financial services company, agreed to pay $12 million of common stock for Vocam Systems Inc., a Bloomington, Minn., designer of software under the Shiptrac'r name.  Shiptrac'r is used for shipping transportation management functions, as well as for order processing, customer service and inventory management functions.  The accord is subject to a definitive agreement and approval by Vocam's holders.  A seat on the Chicago Board of Trade was sold for $215,000, up $3,000 from the previous sale on Aug. 15.  Seats currently are quoted at $190,000 bid, $240,000 asked.  The record price for a full membership on the exchange is $275,000, set Aug. 30, 1988.  Geodyne Resources Inc. said it signed agreements to purchase interests in producing oil and gas properties for $35.5 million from Mesa Operating Limited Partnership and Mesa Mid-Continent Limited Partnership, both units of Mesa Limited Partnership.  The company said the interests were purchased on behalf of partnerships it sponsors through the PaineWebber/Geodyne Energy Income Programs and includes portions of properties in Louisiana, Oklahoma and Wyoming.  Kellogg Co. today is expected to fuel the controversy over health claims for foods.  The Battle Creek, Mich.-based company will unveil a cereal called Heartwise, which contains husks of psyllium, a grain reputedly beneficial in lowering blood cholesterol.  General Mills Inc., Minneapolis, ballyhooed the grain's properties in recently introducing its Benefit cereal, which contains psyllium fiber.  Texas and Procter & Gamble Co. have raised questions about some health claims made by General Mills.  P&G's Metamucil laxative contains psyllium, but so far the FDA hasn't allowed the company to advertise the fiber's cholesterol-lowering properties.  Right now, the only use of psyllium the agency has approved is as an ingredient in frozen desserts, in very limited quantity.  Kellogg, as part of today's announcement, is expected to spell out its policy on the relationship of foods and health claims.  In recent months the company had to modify advertisements implying that vitamins in Rice Krispies enhanced physical vigor.  Referring to Heartwise, Prudential-Bache food analyst John McMillin said he believes that Kellogg will "sell this new product in the context of an overall diet.  They're going to say, eat psyllium and live your life right and you'll have lower cholesterol levels."  A former accountant with the Department of Housing and Urban Development was indicted by a federal grand jury in Denver for allegedly embezzling about $1 million from a federal program designed to help poor families obtain housing, the Justice Department said.  The six-count indictment charges that the former employee in HUD's Denver regional office, Douglas Turner, embezzled the money from December 1988 through May 1989 and diverted some of it to a Denver company that he set up, called Green View Developers Inc. Mr. Turner couldn't be reached for comment.  In a companion civil suit that seeks to recover the allegedly embezzled money, the Justice Department earlier this month charged that Mr. Turner used the funds to purchase real estate in the Denver suburb of Littleton, Colo., to pay a contractor to build a house on the property and to buy a car.  Government investigators have already recovered money, securities and property totaling $481,000 traced from HUD funds allegedly embezzled by Mr. Turner, the Justice Department said.  The Washington Public Power Supply System and Chemical Bank said they reached an agreement that will allow the sale of $450 million of WPPSS bonds to proceed during the week of Sept. 11.  The agreement resolves a dispute concerning a claim by Chemical Bank that it had rights to a portion of the proceeds from a proposed sale of revenue refunding bonds for WPPSS Nos. 1 and 3 power plant projects.  Chemical, as trustee for investors who hold defaulted WPPSS bonds sold to finance Nos. 4 and 5 power plant projects, had threatened to try to grab proceeds from the sale.  WPPSS defaulted on about $2.5 billion of project Nos. 4 and 5 bonds in 1983, in the largest municipal bond default ever.  Chemical claimed some costs for the WPPSS 1, 2 and 3 projects were actually allocated to WPPSS 4 and 5 projects, and has been attempting to recover any costs misallocated to projects 4 and 5.  The way was cleared for the bond sale after Chemical agreed that it wouldn't pursue a claim against the bond proceeds.  In return, Bonneville Power Authority, the power agency that is backing the WPPSS bonds, agreed that any final judgment for misallocated costs would be paid out of other funds.  The $450 million bond sale will be lead-managed by Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. Chemical is a unit of Chemical Banking Corp.  Your Aug 14 article "Director's Insurance: How Good a Shield?" portrays an unpredictability in liability coverage that need not produce such angst among directors, officers, actuaries and underwriters.  Read closely, it's instructive: Read, compare and understand the policy up front; rather than plain-vanilla policy language, insist on targeting your corporate and industry risks in your language; explore with your broker and carrier the removal of regulatory exclusions and question the need for others; insist on payment of legal defense costs on a current basis; negotiate more generous coverage for individual directors' personal loss, apart from the corporation.  Stephen J. Sills  Director of Underwriting  Executive Risk  Management Associates  Simsbury, Conn.  Tuesday, August 29, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 13/16% low, 8 13/16% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.775% 30 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.77% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.29% three months; 8.25% six months; 8.22% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.77% 30 days; 8.67% 60 days; 8.60% 90 days; 8.50% 120 days; 8.45% 150 days; 8.38% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9 1/16% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 8 15/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 28, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94% 13 weeks; 7.88% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.28%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.19%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.15%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.03%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  First Banc Securities Inc. said it let expire a letter of intent to be acquired by Huntington Bancshares Inc. of Columbus, Ohio, for about $85 million in stock so that it could consider other offers.  The Morgantown, W. Va., bank said the board decided to explore other options after receiving an offer of $31 a share, or about $94 million, from Integra Financial Corp. of Pittsburgh on Aug. 14.  Huntington had offered $28 a share a week earlier.  Integra Financial, which operates seven banks and has assets of about $6.5 billion, said it holds more than 100,000 shares of First Banc common.  First Banc, with assets of $520.2 million, operates 12 banking offices in West Virginia and western Pennsylvania.  Huntington, with $10.4 billion of assets, operates banks in Ohio, Kentucky, Indiana and Michigan.  Lindley H. Clark Jr., in his Aug. 10 editoral-page article "In Chile, Even a Dictator Plays Populist," misinforms the reader about the development of the Chilean economy.  He indicates that due to a collapse of monetarist and free-market policies implemented by the Pinochet government "tariffs and quotas are back" (to the levels prior to the implementation of these policies) and "inflation went back to the point where the adventure started."  The true story is that tariffs in Chile have moved from a level of only 10% to 15% (compared with levels over 100% prior to the implementation of these policies).  Inflation "started" in 1973 from a level of 500% a year.  During the past eight years it has kept falling to an average annual rate of 20%, far from where it started.  Mr. Clark ends by indicating that "in 1988 the government more or less suspended all efforts to check inflation."  The truth is that last year the inflation rate was the second-lowest since 1962.  Henry Rudnick  Ph.D.  Student  Graduate School of Business  University of Chicago  Chicago  CPY PARTNERS L.P. acquired 68% of Charles P. Young Co. from Service Resources Corp. in January.  Institutional investors hold the remaining 32%.  Century Partners has no ownership interest in Charles P. Young as reported in an earlier edition.  Richard Hokin, managing partner of Century Partners, is vice chairman of Charles P. Young.  (See: "Business Brief -- Sorg Inc.: Financial Printer Files for Chapter 11 Protection" -- WSJ Aug. 9, 1989)  The first emperor of China was the bastard son of a merchant and a whore.  A brilliant general, he conquered half a dozen warring states and unified China by 220 B.C.  He conscripted 700,000 slaves to finish the Great Wall.  He kept 3,000 concubines.  Qin Shihuang died in a big way too, ordering up 8,000 life-sized terra cotta warriors, each with a unique face, to fill his tomb.  All of this seemed like a great subject for a movie to director Tony Ianzelo of the National Film Board of Canada when the emperor's tomb was discovered in 1974.  Not the Cecil B. De Mille type, Mr. Ianzelo envisioned a documentary for the museum circuit, heavy on archeology.  With the help of China's Xian Film Studio and several scholars, Mr. Ianzelo shot for five months in China last winter, interspersing footage of the continuing excavation of the emperor's tomb with re-created battles and other milestones from the ruler's life.  He wound up with a modest $6.5 million docudrama.  He also wound up creating a controversy.  "The First Emperor" is playing in several Canadian museums, but its opening was delayed in that country and the movie's only New York booking was abruptly canceled by the American Museum of Natural History.  The museum feared that showing the film would attract Chinese protesters.  But, as it turns out, there may be protests from Chinese upset that the film isn't being shown.  Nobody says the film makers got their history wrong; the problem is that history repeated itself and this innocuous movie about ancient events became a bizarre victim of China's current brutal crackdown.  You see, the infamous Emperor Qin (pronounced "chin") burned books and killed scholars to quash dissent.  Supposedly, 460 scholars were buried alive.  To the Chinese, these ancient events are familiar enough.  "He burned the books and buried the scholars" is the catch phrase Chinese schoolchildren learn about Emperor Qin.  To the hundreds of young recruits in the People's Liberation Army who pretended to be Emperor Qin's ruthless warriors in Mr. Ianzelo's film, the incident was as familiar as Paul Revere's ride is to Americans.  But recent events put this history in a different light.  In early June, just a month before the film's scheduled U.S. premiere, the current Chinese government also killed dissident scholars when it broke up pro-democracy demonstrations in Beijing's Tiananmen Square.  It has since arrested thousands more and fettered the media.  The Museum of Natural History is used to dealing with more parochial controversies, such as the one that broke out recently when it announced it had outfitted its 66-foot-long brontosaurus with the wrong head.  When it became clear that the museum might hit a sensitive nerve in the Chinese community by showing the new film, its administrators quickly retreated.  "Some of the depictions in the film were much too similar to the violent events going on in China and would only heighten the anguish of the Chinese community," says a spokesman for the museum.  "Besides, when the Chinese government got nasty in Tiananmen Square, there began to be mass demonstrations here in New York.  We thought we could become the focus of a mass demonstration."  Commercial movie theaters might welcome protesters -- anything to boost ticket sales.  But regular movie houses couldn't book "The First Emperor" if they wanted to; it was made with 70-millimeter film that produces negatives 10 times larger than 35-millimeter film.  This so-called Imax technology can be seen on only 65 immense screens around the world.  Most of them are in museums, and the Museum of Natural History has the only screen in New York.  "The First Emperor" caused a furor in Canada too, even though it was co-produced by the government-run National Film Board and Ottawa's new Canadian Museum of Civilization.  The movie was supposed to make its world premiere June 29 to celebrate the opening of the new museum's Imax theater.  At the last minute, the museum substituted a movie about Canada geese.  But the museum agreed to consult the Chinese community in Canada, which argued that Western eyes really ought to be allowed to see the frightening parallels between Emperor Qin's reign and the current Chinese regime.  The Ottawa museum opened "The First Emperor" on July 4 and has been selling out since, even after expanding its showings of the 40-minute feature to 13 a day from 11.  "I must say when you get to that sequence where they bury the scholars, you can feel a ripple run through the audience," says George MacDonald, director of the Canadian Museum of Civilization.  "People gasp.  There is that moment of recognition where the past suddenly rushes up and touches the present."  Political content aside, chances of the film being shown in China are slim: Discussions about building an Imax theater in Beijing have been abandoned.  At the Film Board, Margaret Wong, associate producer of "The First Emperor," isn't as worried about the fate of the film as she is about the fate of her counterparts in China at the Xian Film Studio.  The studio, located in northwestern China, is known for its experimental films and for outspoken directors like Wu Tianming, who heads it.  Indeed, Mr. Wu, who came to Canada for the opening but is now apparently lying low in the U.S., is said to be named on lists in China as an intellectual wanted by the government.  "The First Emperor" eventually will be seen in the U.S. San Diego's science museum has booked the movie for January, and the film is expected to be shown at museums in Chicago and Boston.  Other museums will get a chance to preview and order the movie at an Imax convention in New York this week.  In France, it will open New Year's Day at the huge Science and Industry Museum outside Paris.  Several groups are still trying to change administrators' minds at New York's Museum of Natural History.  Steven Schragis, whose Birch Lane Press published a coffee-table book on the emperor in cooperation with the Film Board, has been pushing the museum to reschedule the movie.  And the Chinese American Art Council is mobilizing the Chinese community to protest the film's cancellation.  "This movie won't offend the Chinese," says Alan Chow, the council's executive director.  "People should see for themselves the misery of history and ask what lesson we can learn."  Your Aug. 16 article on litigation brought by California hospitals against the watchdog company PCC/Drug Data Systems Inc. contains a common, yet outrageous, excuse for high hospital charges, such as $6 aspirin tablets and enormous markups on drugs in general:  "Besides paying part of the hospital's overhead for equipment, nursing and administration, each patient must share the burden of providing free treatment to needy people, according to Michael D. Stephens, president and chief executive of Hoag Memorial Hospital Presbyterian."  Yes, the costs of providing treatment to the needy must be recouped.  But where is it written that this be the burden of heretofore-not-needy patients to the exclusion (for the most part) of the rest of society?  If insurance coverage were universal, and if insurance companies were to pay all hospital costs, and if the premiums were high enough to permit this to be done, and if enough people could afford those premiums, then we would have an approximation of equitable distribution of these costs.  Of course, this cannot happen without comprehensive national health insurance combined with effective costs controls.  And it looks like that will never happen.  Over time, a greater portion of our population will consist of needy persons, with fewer non-needy having to subsidize continually increasing costs.  George V. Steiner  Maitland, Fla.  Arguing over who is going to pay the skyrocketing cost of health benefits ("Facing Off Over Health Care Benefits," Aug. 11) seems to me counterproductive, to say the least.  The problem is the inability of the nation's medical community to get costs under control, and the willingness of public and private insurance systems to perpetuate the system.  And turning over the entire system to the federal government, as certain of the unions and companies are advocating, is digging an even deeper hole.  The only thing worse than the present system is one run by the federal government.  Perhaps the day is coming when corporate America cuts loose from an unworkable medical-benefits system and American workers are forced to negotiate their health care with the medical community rather than with their company.  If tens of millions of Americans dealt directly with hospitals and doctors, health costs would drop like a rock.  William O. Beck  Duluth, Minn.  In your Aug. 16 page-one story "On the Great Plains, Life Becomes a Fight for Water and Survival," you quote an article by Frank and Deborah Popper of Rutgers University in which these apparently serious academics suggest our nation's breadbasket be turned into a "Buffalo Commons," a national park of natural prairie grassland and free-roaming bison.  I question whether the Poppers and others quoted in the article have considered what might happen if their recommendations were taken seriously.  I can only conclude their suggestions were in jest.  There is no doubt that the plains communities have their share of problems, but much work is being done to help them adapt to changing ecological and economic conditions.  Having grown up in a small town on the Great Plains, I can say that we have faced trying times before, and we will face them again, but we always have, and always will, overcome them.  Our state is currently focusing its efforts on assisting our rural communities through economic development.  The industrious and hard-working people of the plains are especially attractive to industry.  We also are studying the use of alternate crops and new irrigation methods that will allow our farmers to keep producing to fulfill our nation's needs.  What cannot help, however, are doomsday suggestions that we close down a fifth of the land area of the contiguous states so that bison may roam free.  The Poppers comments make about as much sense as suggesting that we seal off our declining urban areas and preserve them as museums of 20th-century architecture.  The Great Plains region is not the Sahara; its soil provides much of the grain and meat that feeds the world.  It is rich with natural gas, oil and other minerals.  Its people will continue to provide for the needs of a growing global economy.  Mike Hayden  Governor  State of Kansas  Topeka  ---  What is happening in the fertile agricultural areas of Illinois and in other states is that prime crop-producing land is being subdivided into lots and homes, shopping malls and other buildings, and streets and parking lots are being built on the rest.  When I took a ride from Joliet to Elgin, then to De Kalb, and back to Joliet, it was heart-rending.  At least one-third of the farm land in that triangle has been subdivided in the last 30 years.  I also noticed that the closer I was to Chicago, the smaller the corn was.  The old farmers tell me this is due to air pollution.  Judging by what has happened in other countries, the ground water will be used up before we make the change, the change will be painful, and if we ever need greater food production for short periods of time, it will be too late to do so.  When the ground water can no longer be economically used for irrigation, the Great Plains will revert to a more original state, our food prices will go up, and we may no longer be a food exporter.  Too late, we'll realize that we should have spent more time saving the prime farm land for food production.  John J. Balek  Coordinator  Morton College  Joliet, Ill.  ---  At last] The Poppers have hit upon a plan for saving we plains-dwellers from our misery.  Tonight I offered up thanks for the Poppers' plan for the entire five minutes it took me to drive from my office to my home, and all the while I jogged down safe streets and breathed clear, clean air and gazed at trees and plants untouched by acid rain.  My kind thoughts for the Popper plan continued as I cooked a juicy steak and black-eyed peas on a grill fired by the nation's least expensive natural gas, and later as I took in the symphony and saw up-to-the-minute programming on our local college PBS station.  Yes, Drs.  Popper, save us from this misery.  John Huffaker  Attorney  Amarillo, Texas  Regarding your Aug. 10 Centennial Journal item on Malcolm McLean.  I was vice president and chief financial officer of U.S. Lines from 1974 to 1981.  U.S. Lines was sold to Mr. McLean for $110 million, not $360 million (Mr.  McLean sold Sealand to Reynolds for $360 million).  His comment that he would build the E Cono Ships and "do the same thing again" must send another shudder through the hearts of all the unemployed long-term employees of U.S. Lines unable to find another job in the shrinking American Merchant Marine.  Richard E. Madigan  Montclair, N.J.  Selling the Census  To Minority Groups  AD AGENCIES specializing in minorities are on the rise, and now the Census Bureau is seeking their help.  To get a better measure of minorities -- traditionally the "hard-to-count" segment of the population -- the bureau for the first time has hired three minority agencies to carry out campaigns targeting blacks, Hispanics and Asian Americans for the 1990 census.  Mingo Group of New York is handling the black account; Castor GS&B Advertising, also of New York, is focusing on Hispanics; and Muse Cordero Chen, a Los Angeles agency, will tailor ads for Asian Americans.  WPP Group's Ogilvy & Mather unit remains the lead agency for general census advertising.  Each of the agencies is working on ad campaigns that will run from January to May.  The census begins in March.  "We're hoping to do better counting these people than we've done in the past," says Peter Bounpane, assistant director of the Census Bureau.  He says the undercount rate for the total population in 1980 was 1.4%.  By contrast, the undercount rate for blacks was 5% or 6%.  The rate was similarly high for other minority groups.  Mr. Bounpane says he hopes the minority communications experts will be able to drive home the point that census results are entirely confidential.  Officials speculate that minorities avoid being counted out of unfounded fears that government authorities have access to the data.  Illegal aliens, for instance, worry their names will be passed to immigration officials.  The Census Bureau isn't the only group struggling with this issue.  The American Marketing Association in Chicago sponsored a case-study competition among college students on the problems of persuading minorities to take part in the census.  Winning teams from Carnegie Mellon University and the University of Virginia in Charlottesville suggested for one that community leaders should be enlisted to promote the fact that census reporting is crucial for proper political representation.  Sales Cheer the Makers  Of 'Occasionless' Cards  GREETING CARDS aren't just for birthdays or holidays anymore.  Alternative cards, those not tied to any specific occasion, are booming -- even to the surprise of manufacturers.  According to Packaged Facts Inc., the alternative-card segment of the greeting card market grew 25% last year.  It also accounted for most of the industry's overall 5% growth, the New York-based research firm says.  Alternative cards include blank cards and cards with everyday jokes, such as those featuring the Ziggy comic strip character or drawings by Gary Larson, the Far Side cartoonist.  "We had no idea the market would turn out to be this big," says John Sullivan, general manager of Hallmark Cards Inc.'s alternative card division.  He says Hallmark, based in Kansas City, Mo., is readying a "major" new line of alternative cards that will be introduced later this year.  Industry executives point to a younger, more impulsive card buyer as a reason for the jump.  Another factor is increased distribution of alternative cards at grocery stores, drug stores and mass merchandisers.  "The size of the greeting card department in food stores has tripled in the last 10 years," says Ed Fruchtenbaum, vice president at American Greetings Corp. in Cleveland.  For the industry, it's a great bonus that the alternative segment isn't cyclical or seasonal.  Alternative cards are less dependent on holiday sales and offer more opportunity for growth.  Says Mr. Fruchtenbaum: "There's a fixed number of birthdays in the world."  One Man's Luxury Is  Another Man's Waste  MORE THAN 75% of Americans think that it's a waste of money to buy a luxury car costing $40,000 or more, to gamble at a casino and to own a car phone, according to a study by Bruskin Associates, a New Brunswick, N.J., market research firm.  The study -- based on interviews with 1,000 men and women -- suggests not too surprisingly that household income is a key factor in the way many people rate the value of purchases and activities.  For example, 38% of those with annual family income under $40,000 said that taking vacations in foreign countries is a waste of money; only 19% of those with family incomes greater than $40,000 felt that way.  Perhaps more surprising were some large differences of opinion even when the so-called luxury item costs just a bit more than simpler versions of the same product or service.  A full 71% of families making $40,000 or less said imported beer is a waste of money; 59% of those making over $40,000 felt that way.  Many respondents, but especially those with higher incomes, believe seeing Broadway shows, investing in the stock market or dining at expensive restaurants are worthwhile expenses.  Odds and Ends  THE SEVEN most common prefixes and suffixes in U.S. company names are Ameri, Nat, Mark, Star, Uni, Lead and Inter, according to Delano Goldman & Young Inc., a New York naming specialist that conducted a broad search of business names and trademarks. . . .  Word of mouth will have to sell Gentleman Jack, a new super-premium whiskey.  The product, Brown-Forman Corp.'s first new whiskey since Jack Daniels was introduced 100 years ago, won't be supported by advertising.  Officials hope the news will spread among patrons of fancy restaurants and selected liquor stores.  Amid indictments and federal probes of dishonest trading, commodity futures markets in Chicago and New York have never had a worse reputation for corruption.  On the cramped, dirty trading floor of one of New York's major futures exchanges, the Commodity Exchange, a new president and chief executive officer is making the rounds, vowing change.  He says he'll improve the Comex's trading supervision.  He may even move to institute a dress code.  He bristles at the futures industry's reputation as a gambling den.  "I don't want to be known as the CEO of a crap shoot," vows the new Comex head, Arnold F. Staloff.  A former Philadelphia Stock Exchange official and securities regulator, Mr. Staloff this month became the first new head of a U.S. futures exchange since the federal commodity trading investigations surfaced early this year.  His success or failure may be a sign of whether the futures industry is serious about cleaning up its act, say outsiders who work with the futures exchanges.  "I think he knows what he's in for.  I think he knows it's going to be difficult," says Thomas Russo, a partner at Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft who worked with Mr. Staloff at the Securities and Exchange Commission.  While Mr. Staloff may run into roadblocks, Christopher Lovell, a New York lawyer for both investors and some Comex brokers, says, "I think he has an excellent opportunity, based on his reputation, to make a difference there."  The 44-year-old Mr. Staloff is taking the reins of Comex, the world's major gold, silver and copper futures exchange, at a critical time.  The Comex, which ranks second to the rival New York Mercantile Exchange and is much smaller than the big Chicago exchanges, has had its share of problems over the years.  The Hunt brothers' silver-trading crisis and the collapse of Volume Investors Corp., a major trade-processing firm, got the most publicity.  There has been tension between the staff members running the exchange and the tough floor traders who own it.  But some industry officials see a changing of the guard with Mr. Staloff's arrival.  "I think he's the right man at the right time," says Mr. Russo.  "Comex has to make changes.  They need new products.  They need someone with a lot of integrity."  The Comex still dominates trading in precious metals, but it has stumbled in concocting new products.  That's Mr. Staloff's specialty.  Besides currency options, he was instrumental at the Philadelphia exchange in developing the new stock "basket" products that have since led to a battle between the SEC and Commodity Futures Trading Commission over which agency should regulate them.  Though he makes a 1 1/2-hour commute from his Cherry Hill, N.J., home each day, Mr. Staloff vows to visit the exchange floor at the World Trade Center first thing each morning and hear the traders' beefs.  Mr. Staloff's predecessor, Alan J. Brody, was sometimes accused of being inaccessible, but Mr. Staloff says he prefers confronting people face to face.  "I hate it when people talk behind my back," he says.  Mr. Staloff says the idea of his to have a dress code might appear "silly" to some people, but it's the kind of thing that might reinforce to the public that futures exchanges are honest and well-run businesses.  He concedes that a dress code might not be feasible until the Comex and other New York exchanges move to better-ventilated quarters, perhaps not for some years.  More important, says Mr. Staloff, is his priority to improve the 56-year-old exchange's "audit trail" -- the system by which exchanges monitor for possible trading abuses.  Critics have always complained about the potential for abuse on the chaotic futures exchange floors, where brokers and traders manually record the time of each transaction.  By improving their computers and their reporting requirements, exchanges can theoretically do a better job of policing what happens on the floor.  Mr. Staloff says he remembers when the foreign-currency options he developed on the Philadelphia exchange were just starting out in 1982.  Reluctant investors were won over by promises that the auditing system would be sufficient to protect them.  "Unless we have the best audit trail {at Comex}, we're going to be second best, and I don't want that," Mr. Staloff says.  A reflection of the kind of enforcement an exchange can take on its own came just last week, when the Comex levied its biggest-ever fine against one of its brokers.  It fined the broker, Preston H. Semel, and his firm $550,000 for allegedly "fraudulent conduct" and improper trading.  Mr. Semel is appealing the finding.  As is customary, the exchange didn't release many details about the Semel case, partly because it's being appealed.  But Mr. Staloff says he recognizes that futures exchanges can no longer shy from airing such dirty laundry.  "The more we open our window, the more we allow people to see us, the more they'll respect us," he says.  Traders gave stock prices and the dollar a thrashing but bid bond prices up a bit.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average took a 16.73-point dive to close at 2726.63 in active trading.  A midafternoon round of program trading knocked stock prices down sharply; the industrials were off almost 30 points for a brief time.  Traders said the programs were triggered when the premium on index futures fell far enough to allow arbitragers to profit by buying the futures and selling the underlying stocks.  The programs' price-depressing effect was amplified by otherwise lackluster trading.  The dollar tumbled against both the German mark and the Japanese yen as the Bank of Japan sold dollars heavily and West Germany's central bank raised a minor interest rate.  The early intervention in Japan set the tone for the currency market, which had bid the dollar up sharply in recent trading.  The Bundesbank's surprise rate increase sparked speculation that other German rates might be raised later, which would lessen the attraction of dollar-denominated investments to foreigners.  The dollar failed to respond to news of a sharp upward revision in the U.S. second-quarter gross national product to 2.7% from 1.7%.  Yet long-term bond prices managed to eke out modest gains, though trading was listless as investors awaited Friday's August employment report.  That will be the first glimpse at how the economy fared in August.  The number of jobs created in August is expected to be low by usual standards because of the telephone industry strike.  The Labor Department said the reported figures Friday should be adjusted upward about 108,000 to account for striking telephone-industry workers.  In major market activity:  Stock prices tumbled in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 175.2 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers 869 to 640.  Bond prices rose modestly.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose more than a quarter point, or about $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield fell to 8.20%.  The dollar fell against major currencies.  In late New York trading the dollar was quoted at 1.9360 marks and 142.95 yen compared with 1.9633 marks and 144.55 yen Monday.  The Chinese leaders claim that business is back to normal, and in a sense they are right.  But should we be surprised, really?  What was normal about doing business in China?  Was it normal to negotiate for three weeks when the same deal can be negotiated in Taiwan in three days?  Was it normal to staff offices in Beijing with several expatriates, when the same company's office in South Korea has one expatriate handling more business?  The extraordinary goodwill foreigners always showed the Chinese was the most abnormal thing of all.  After nearly five years living in Beijing, I still cannot comprehend the ease with which the Chinese side extracted the extra discount, the extra week of negotiations, the extra favor.  When it came to China, people threw away the book.  There are reasons, of course.  Foreigners were captivated, and so were many Chinese, by the evidence of change everywhere.  Then consider China's economic growth since 1978, truly astonishing for a nation of one billion people, and it is easy to see why so many companies treated China differently.  But as with everything in China, normalcy is not necessarily returning through the front door, but through the back door.  The official version of normalcy is that all foreign companies have returned, and business is back to normal -- with the usual big discounts.  According to the back-door version of normalcy, company executives have returned, but mainly to set about weeding the garden.  Many more local and expatriate staff will never return to their offices in Beijing.  So while the office remains, the office manager is more than likely to be living in Hong Kong.  The real change, though, is in how China looks.  From America, China looked good.  The numbers looked amazingly good; industrial growth rates above 10% per year -- year after year.  And after a temporary downturn in the next couple of years, the numbers probably will go back up.  Where else in the Third World is there so much energy and progress as in China?  But if things look so good, why are so many foreigners dismayed after they arrive?  They have done their homework.  They know China is a vibrant, flexible economy growing like Topsy.  But then they go to their first meeting, and find themselves talking across the table to the same tired old men who can't make a factory work.  What's gone wrong?  They hear absolutely idiotic statements.  Nobody thinks or sounds like the type of modern individual they expect to find in the flourishing PRC.  Take the ministry officials who kept asking about packing.  "Our machinery is very well packed," we assured them.  They insisted, "But can it be stored for several years?"  We asked why they bothered to buy if it was going to be indefinitely stored and were told, "This is the last money we can expect to get for a while in our planned economy."  Indeed, the China foreigners read about from afar, and the China they see, are two countries, and both are real.  The Chinese call it the "Jihua nei/wai" phenomenon, the part of the economy inside/outside the state plan.  According to the World Bank, the big enterprises in China's state plan limp along and contribute very little to the economy.  Their main role is negative -- of gobbling up a large share of China's foreign exchange and high-tech imports, not to mention subsidies, leaving less money for the independent state factories, medium and small factories, and private and collective plants that together are creating the fabulous output statistics that executives read about back home.  In the long run, the June 4 crackdown may have helped to correct our image of China.  From ground zero, it seems clear that Beijing's senior leaders never felt comfortable with foreign firms in their country -- except as sources of technology for the state sector; that is, the state bureaucracy and Soviet-style enterprises that are directly under Beijing's thumb.  Call it China 1.  It's the first place the government wants you to do a joint venture.  They will demand your latest technology, but can't absorb it and don't know how to sell it.  And if you don't go along, you're not a real friend.  It all becomes a huge matter of face.  Basically, the crowd you meet at state banquets that wants your technology, wants it now, and can't pay for it -- that's China 1.  By 1986 it had become equally clear, however, that all the action was in China 2; that is, the medium and small factories, the coastal areas in the south, the economic zones, especially in Tianjin and Shenzhen, and the independent state enterprises that no longer listened to Beijing very much.  In the early years, though, few foreign firms could really do business with China 2.  It had little money, and factories were small.  But as state factories decentralized, and small factories won export orders, management improved and a process of rapid capital accumulation got under way.  Today virtually every company doing business in China has one foot in each China; though it's a bit like jogging with one foot in a sneaker and the other in an army boot.  For roughly six months prior to the June 4 crackdown, Beijing put up a terrific fight to reverse the movement of raw materials, renminbi, foreign exchange, and especially authority, from China 1 to China 2.  In the name of fighting inflation, Beijing pulled every lever and string still at the disposal of China's decrepit planning bureaucracy, to wrest the economy back into Beijing's orbit.  The attempt to roll back decentralization made local managers and officials defiant.  Some have become outspokenly critical in a way I had never seen before, saying things to foreigners about the Beijing leadership that would have made a Tiananmen student blanch.  Hence, China 2 seems to be expanding as ever.  The principal reason is that Beijing wasted the past 10 years by failing to implement any modern tax, banking or fiscal institutions that could control economic activity outside the state sector.  If Beijing had the means, it could say, Damn their defiance] Today it has little choice, and less clout.  So normalcy has returned.  Foreigners are back, and negotiating with the Chinese will be as tough as ever.  That's fine.  I remember in 1986 my first negotiation with local factory people, and my shock at how different it was from negotiating with officials in China's foreign-trade corporations.  Sure they were tough.  They got excited, and even shouted.  They obviously cared more about signing a contract than they did about manners.  It was the first time I ever met any Chinese who wanted a project to go through as much as we did.  The Chinese factory received a big discount and good price, by the way.  As business in China normalizes, more and more foreign firms will realize what Chinese business people have known for years: The country's prosperity lies with China 2.  Those aged, tired leaders who masterminded the June 4 crackdown will have their normalcy all right.  ---  Mr. Stepanek was until recently resident director of an American multinational in Beijing.  With its leading technology stocks continuing to trade erratically and financial stocks weaker, the Nasdaq over-the-counter market remained rudderless and finished slightly lower.  The revised gross national product for the second quarter, which suggested that the economy is more robust than previously indicated, added to the muddle in the OTC market, according to Len Hefter, head of Jefferies & Co.'s OTC desk in Dallas.  The Nasdaq Composite Index closed at 466.57, down 0.62.  Among bigger stocks, the Nasdaq 100 Index of industrial and technology stocks dropped 2.32 to 440.60.  The Nasdaq Financial Index eased 0.13 to 462.97.  Mr. Hefter noted that the biggest technology stocks failed to follow up on Monday's gains.  Yesterday, MCI Communications, Apple Computer, Intel, Lotus Development and Sun Microsystems all were lower.  The group's inability to mount a sustained advance is holding back the overall OTC market, he believes.  "They continue to react very badly to news and can't seem to hold together," Mr. Hefter complained.  "They're weak, and the market needs them to provide leadership."  Many financial stocks, particularly insurance stocks, didn't fare well, either.  Mr. Hefter speculated that investors, figuring that a strong economy means interest rates won't fall anytime soon, lost interest in the group yesterday.  Those issues tend to perform well during periods of declining interest rates.  The Nasdaq Insurance Index slipped 0.45 to 534.74.  The Bank Index declined 0.34 to 489.85; but the Other Finance Index, which includes savings and loan issues, added 0.95 to 553.72.  Among insurance stocks, Safeco lost 1/4 to 33 1/8; St. Paul Cos. was off 1/4 to 59 3/4, and Twentieth Century Industries declined 1/8 to 22 1/8.  Ohio Casualty was unchanged at 49 1/4.  First Executive rose 1/4 to 11 1/2.  Shares of Flight International Group, which has said it might report a loss for its fiscal first quarter, lost 1 3/4 to 5.  Troubled Lone Star Technologies eased 1/8 to 4 3/4 on volume of more than a million shares.  The company, which posted a $14.5 million second-quarter loss, recently postponed about $4 million in interest payments on some of its debentures.  LifeCore Biomedical slid 7/8 to 4, in part because Dain Bosworth Inc. cut its rating on the stock to "hold" from "accumulate," Dow Jones Professional Investor Report said.  Oregon Metallurgical added 1/2 to 26 1/4 after Montgomery Securities initiated coverage yesterday with a buy rating, Professional Investor Report said.  The company produces titanium alloy used by the aerospace industry.  First Financial Management gained 1 1/4 to 35 3/4.  Hambrecht & Quist repeated a longstanding buy recommendation on the Atlanta company, according to Professional Investor Report.  Highflying Summit Technology lost 1/2 to 12 3/4 bid.  The laser maker has soared 132% since July 26.  The company, which makes laser devices to help treat severe eye and heart disorders, has projected revenue of $4 million to $4.5 million for 1989, up from $1.1 million in 1988.  On Monday it said the Food and Drug Administration has permitted it to begin clinical trials of a device for clearing blocked arteries.  Earlier this month, Summit won a patent for its disposable corneal mask used in an experimental laser surgery procedure to correct nearsightedness, farsightedness and astigmatism.  The company competes with Visx and Taunton Technologies in developing ophthalmological laser surgery procedures.  Visx closed unchanged at 12 bid; Taunton Technologies slipped 1 1/2 to 19 1/2 bid.  Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood analyst Edward Mutsch said it is too early to know where Summit will peak.  "If (the vision) treatment lives up to its early promise and if the company is successful in providing this yet-to-be-proven treatment, then the stock could be worth a multiple of its present value three or four years down the line," he said.  "But the stock is going to be volatile until then."  For now, he rates Summit, Visx and Taunton as "speculative buys."  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  American General Corp, filed a shelf offering of up to $300 million of its debt securities.  Anheuser-Busch Cos., filed a proposed issuance of $300 million of senior debentures, to be sold only to the company's wholesalers.  Citicorp, filed a shelf offering for $1 billion in notes and warrants to purchase notes via Citicorp.  First Interstate Bancorp, filed a shelf offering of up to $1 billion of its debt securities.  First Wachovia Corp., filed with the SEC for a shelf offering of up to 300 million subordinated debt securities.  Hotelecopy Inc., filed an initial public offering of 860,000 common shares, via Josephthal & Co. and Emmett A. Larkin Co.  Joy Technologies Inc., filed a registration statement for a proposed offering of $120 million of notes via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Old Spaghetti Warehouse Inc., filed an amendment to reduce a previously announced common stock offering to 560,000 shares from 680,000 shares.  Sears Receivables Financing Group Inc., a subsidiary of Sears, Roebuck & Co., filed for the sale of $500 million of Sears Credit Account Trust 1989 C Pass-Through Certificates, via Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., Goldman Sachs and Salomon Brothers Inc.  The Washington Water Power Co., filed a shelf offering of up to $100 million of notes, via Goldman Sachs and Kidder, Peabody & Co.  Westvaco Corp, filed a shelf offering of up to $200 million of debt securities, via Goldman Sachs and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Last year witnessed the "Vietnam of forest fires," brought live via the nightly news into millions of living rooms around the world, says Betty Knight, a Yellowstone National Park naturalist.  All that was missing most days as fire raged across huge sections of Yellowstone and several Western states was the thump-thump of helicopter blades and a Doors soundtrack.  Ms. Knight and other National Park Service employees fought back by working throughout the winter to mount a fire exhibit here.  They hope to counter the image of total destruction -- left by miles of video tape and doom-laden pronouncements from New York anchor desks -- with information conveying the message that fire isn't good or bad, it's simply part of a forest's natural life.  It's an uphill battle.  The resulting special exhibit, "Yellowstone and Fire," is a rush job, created in six months on a shoestring budget.  What's more, it's tucked away in the small Grant Village information center on the eastern shore of Yellowstone Lake, a site visited by only about one in seven of those touring the park.  The main exhibit is supplemented by several roadside displays near burned areas, but they are limited to a few paragraphs and a picture or two.  The roadside exhibits also aren't identified so that a driver can tell them apart from others focusing on the park's plant and animal life, or geology.  And so well do the wood-mounted panels blend into their surroundings that you may not even spot them all; the map showing their location, handed out to visitors when they enter the park, is pretty sketchy. (Along with the map, each car also receives a Yellowstone Today newspaper containing a special fire supplement.)  This is too bad, because Yellowstone's roads are where the battle for the hearts and minds of the Disney-generation crowding station wagon back seats is being fought.  The moment for the park service to make its case -- either through use of guides or more eye-catching graphics -- is when the kids shout "awesome]" "rad]" or "gross]" as the first fire-touched hillside swings into view.  But for now the bulk of the informational firepower is back at Grant Village.  The exhibit there gets off to a strong start by fighting fire video with fire video.  Every 15 minutes or so a small viewing room off one side of the central information area shows a film of forest-fire highlights that recently kept an audience of 40 sitting in awed silence, kids and all.  A sonorous male voice describes the combination of persistent drought, lightning strikes and hurricane-force winds last summer that quickly fanned the fires out of control.  Most viewers seem to come away from the video agreeing that the fires of '88 weren't the park service's "fault," regardless of the natural burn policy that initially allowed some lightning-caused fires to burn freely. (All fires are being suppressed this year while the fire policy is under review.) The video also gives firefighters credit for heroic, and successful, efforts to save most park structures, including the Old Faithful Inn and buildings in Grant Village, where fire came within a few feet of employee dormitories.  The main exhibit next door leads off by confronting visitors with the parched conditions that turned Yellowstone into a tinder box last year.  A small, scorched lodgepole pine tree leans over a chart tracing the minuscule amount of rain that fell last summer, a period during which more than twice the average number of lightning strikes were also recorded.  For instance this Aug. 10 more rain -- three to five inches -- fell on parts of the park in a single hour than during all of last summer.  Large color photo panels and supporting text describe the role fire plays in the lives of park plants and animals, with special attention paid to the lodgepole pine, the park's dominant evergreen species.  Many of the lodgepole's cones are covered with a gluey tar that prevents the cone from dropping its tiny seeds until it's cooked to at least 113 degrees Fahrenheit by a passing blaze.  The seeds are then fertilized by the ash of the burned parent trees, and the lodgepole life cycle continues.  Animals fared relatively well.  Only a few hundred elk out of several thousand died in the fires.  Those that perished provided a feast for the park's endangered grizzlies, who retired later than usual to their dens last winter, fat and happy.  A collection of firefighting gear, including a graffiti-inscribed helmet reading, "Bambi is Alive," and a mural with press clippings about the fire, especially several from the Pulitzer Prize-nominated coverage of the Billings (Montana) Gazette, add a human dimension to the show.  As a supplement to the exhibit, ranger-led walks through burn areas ought to be on any visitor's must-do list, yet they aren't given any special prominence among the hodgepodge of announcements cluttering Yellowstone Today's pages.  The park service plans a handful of self-guided walking and driving tours through burned areas, but they aren't expected to be open to the public before next July 1.  ----  Mr. McMurray is a Chicago-based Journal reporter who covered the fire last fall.  It is a new summer in Yellowstone Park.  The meadows are deep green and rich and the high grass moves in the wind like water on a lake.  On the burned forest floor, fuchsia fireweed, bright yellow arnica and 20 species of grass form gorgeous wild gardens.  Even in the most intensely burned areas, where the earth and trees are charred black, there are clumps of new grass and brilliantly colored flowers.  A year ago, I spent five days on horseback with a group from the Yellowstone Institute led by outfitter and botanist Richard Clark.  Because the route we were supposed to take was on fire, we rode another to the west of it.  This year, eager to get into the heart of last summer's burns to see how the land looks now, I registered for the same trip.  This year it went where it was supposed to go.  I have come away in awe.  Both years we started out up the Pelican Valley.  Untouched by fire, its broad, long expanse looks as primeval as it always has.  A couple of miles into the valley the two routes veer.  Last summer we turned north to ride west of the Mirror Plateau, while the Mist Creek fire burned east of us, its smoke a constant reminder of its presence.  This year we headed northeast, bound for Mist Creek, Miller Creek and the Lamar River.  In the valley we rode through tall grass that almost hid the bones of winter-killed bison, whose meat provided a fat, easy spring for bears, coyotes and eagles.  In May, on my way to Old Faithful for the Greater Yellowstone Coalition Annual Meeting and Scientific Conference, which this time focused on the ecological consequences of the Yellowstone fires, I saw a sleek, fat coyote, his coat glistening with health, feeding on an elk carcass.  How clear it seemed to me in that moment that nature wastes nothing.  Last winter, a season of thick snow cover and deep cold on top of several drought years, food was scarce for elk and bison.  A fair number of them didn't make it to spring.  Some people, outraged at what they regarded as the "useless" dying of elk and bison, simply ignored the extraordinary opportunity those deaths provided for life for other animals.  We were not long on the trail before rain began.  When it let up for a while wisps of cloud hovered above the ridges, mimicking last summer's smoke.  As we approached a small rise, Richard signaled us to hurry.  There, in the draw below us, 200 elk were running.  Moving as one, they surged forward like some swift brown river, a soft urgency flowing through the land.  The largest bull, running near the rear of the herd, stopped, turned back, lifted his head in a call even the hunters in our group had never heard, and ran on.  Rounding behind a rise in what had seemed to us a flat landscape, the herd simply disappeared.  The valley was still again.  Only the grass moved, and we, on our horses, moved across it, and now the rain moved down hard upon us.  We could see hillsides of burned trees at the valley's edges, but it was not until we entered the forest that we encountered, intimately, the varieties of burn.  Where the fire had been less hot, the floor is strewn with brown pine needles, while the trees stand brown-red, some still with brown needles clinging to them.  Brown trees are interspersed with occasional green ones.  New trees already are sprouting, but at about an inch and a half tall, are too small to be seen over the other new growth, the fireweed, arnica and grass carpeting the forest floor.  They will top it in a few years.  In 10 to 12 years they will be three to four feet tall.  Thirty to 50 years from now, they will shade the forest floor.  Park biologists counted 50,000 to 1 million lodgepole-pine seeds per acre when the fires stopped.  Some of these won't make it, but within five years there will be about a thousand seedlings per acre.  Where the fire was hottest, everything is black.  Yet, here, too, are mats of fireweed and arnica and clumps of green grass.  The colors are amazing -- vivid, luminous, splendid against the black earth; the greens more intense than any green I have ever seen, greener than spring, greener than dreams.  In the black forest the rain, which had become hard enough in the valley to begin dropping in small waterfalls from my hat brim, lessened to a gentle mist, became as soft as the forest itself.  Standing trunks and fallen and the earth are all the same soft color, a velvet charcoal black.  A place of immense silence, of wonder, I felt it as mystical.  Maybe even holy.  Death became a celebration of rebirth; nature, the repository of faith.  The rain ended before dawn.  In brilliant sun now free to penetrate the forest depths, the deep, soft black of the wood glistened like silver.  We rode to the confluence of Mist Creek and the Lamar River, then along the Lamar to turn east on Miller Creek, where we camped our last two nights.  Here, surrounded by mature forest, we had an interesting view of how trees die.  Many were red-brown, but their color was as much as product of disease and fungus as of the fire, which had been quite selective in this area.  This is a forest ready to burn, yet, somehow, much of it escaped last summer.  Along all our trails we could see the paths of fire on distant hillsides, the mosaic formed by burned and unburned trees, the burns winding in swaths of varying widths through green trees.  We saw whole slopes of fallen trees, lying like giant pickup sticks.  At a distance, the standing trees seem shadows of the still green trees above or below them.  On the ridgetops the burned trees rise like feathery skeletons of trees against the sky.  Everywhere we rode there were flowers -- the arnica and fireweed that are most prevalent in the burned forests, wild geraniums, Indian paintbrush, harebells, salsify, dandelions, Queen Anne's lace, yarrow, goldenrod, asters, lupin and others whose names I do not know.  Richard Clark, who teaches botany when he's not guiding pack trips, commented that this summer was an unusual one.  "The first of August would normally be brown," he said, "but this year it's so green, and there are all the flowers.  The forage is better than ever.  The horses just sit out there and burp."  One day we made a long ride from camp to 10,203-foot Parker Peak near the park's east boundary.  From our stopping point below the summit we had a 360-degree view of all the country around -- the park, the Asaroka Range, what seemed the whole of the Earth.  We could see burns from there, but we could also see the great wild eternity of this landscape that has always encompassed change.  Fire, earthquake, glacier, volcano, season to season, night to day.  It will be a while before the burned trees of '88 are no longer part of the view but, in the meantime, we have choices about how we look at them.  We cannot measure nature by our own lifetimes, although we can use our lifetimes to celebrate the astonishing life its changing holds.  ---  A revised topographic map of the park, showing burned areas, is available from park visitor centers for $5.95.  For park information, contact Yellowstone National Park, Wyo. 82190. (307) 344-7381.  For information about the Yellowstone Institute, contact The Yellowstone Association, P.O. Box 117, Yellowstone National Park, Wyo. 82190. (307) 344-7381, ext. 2384.  ---  Ms. Rudner is a free-lance writer based in Bozeman, Mont.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Midlantic Corp. -- $100 million of 9 1/4% notes, due Sept. 1, 1999, priced at 99.50 to yield 9.328%.  The notes are non-callable and were priced at 105 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  Rated single-A-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-A-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Morgan Stanley & Co.  @ MUNICIPALS  Alabama -- $351.5 million of general obligation refunding capital appreciation bonds, 1989 Series, due 2000-2008, tentatively priced by a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group to yield to maturity from 7.20% in 2000 to 7.40% in 2003-2008.  The bonds are rated double-A by both Moody's and S&P.  The bonds are callable on Aug. 31, 1999.  Illinois -- $70 million of Build Illinois sales tax revenue bonds, Series J, due 1990-2009 and 2014, via First Chicago Capital Markets Inc. group with a bid setting the true interest cost at 7.147%.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and triple-A by S&P, were priced to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.25% in 2014.  There are about $14 million 7.20% term bonds due in 2014, priced to yield 7.25%.  @ EUROBONDS  Bandai Corp. (Japan) -- $100 million of bonds due Sept. 21, 1993 with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par, via Daiwa Europe Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct 5, 1989 through Sept 8, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Sept 4.  Fees 2 1/4.  Bacob Overseas Ltd. (Belgian parent) -- 75 million European currency units of 9% bonds due Sept. 25, 1992, and priced at 101 3/4 to yield 8.85% after full fees, via Merrill Lynch International & Co. Guaranteed by Bacob Savings Bank.  Fees 1 3/8.  Industrial Bank of Japan Ltd. (Japan) -- 500 million French francs of 8 3/4% bonds due Oct 4, 1994, priced at 101.30 to yield 8.90 less full fees, via Societe Generale.  Fees 1 7/8.  Finance for Danish Industry (Denmark) -- 350 million Swedish kroner of 11 1/8% bonds due Oct. 4, 1994, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 11.16% less full fees, via Privatbanken.  Fees 1 7/8.  GMAC Continental (U.S. parent) -- 200 million Swedish kroner of 11 1/4% bonds due Sept. 28, 1992, priced at 101 1/2 to yield 11.19% less full fees, via Bankers Trust International.  Guaranteed by General Motors Acceptance Corp. Fees 1 3/8.  Nationwide Anglia Building Society (U.K.) -- #75 million of subordinated floating rate notes due September 2004, and priced at par, via Credit Suisse First Boston.  Notes pay three-month London Interbank Offered Rate plus 3/8 point for the first 10 years and three-month Libor plus one point thereafter.  Average life 13 years.  Callable at par from 1994, subject to Building Society Commission approval.  Yamatane Corp. (Japan) -- 150 million Deutsche marks of bonds with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 1 1/2% coupon due Sept. 21, 1993 at par, via Nomura Europe.  Guaranteed by Mitsubishi Bank of Japan.  Each 5,000 mark bond carries five warrants, exercisable from Sept. 25, 1989 through Sept. 14, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% above the closing share price when prices are fixed Sept. 14.  Each 50,000 mark bond carries one certificate for 50 warrants with the same terms.  Japanese Finance Corp. for Municipal Enterprises (Japan) -- 150 million Deutsche marks of bonds with a 6 7/8% coupon due Sept. 20, 1999, at 101.75 to yield 6.88%, via Deutsche Bank.  Guaranteed by the Goverment of Japan.  Niigata Rinko Kariku Unso Co. (Japan) -- 30 million Swiss francs of 5 7/8% privately placed notes due Sept. 13, 1994 priced at 100 1/8 to yield 5.87% via Industrial Bank of Japan (Schweiz).  Guaranteed by Industrial Bank of Japan.  Viva Home Co. (Japan) -- 200 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Aug. 31, 1994, with an indicated 1/2% coupon at par via Nomura Bank Switzerland.  Put option on Feb. 29, 1992 at an indicated 109 1/4 to yield 4.13%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Oct. 7, 1989 to Aug. 17, 1994 at 5% premium over the closing share price Sept. 4, when terms are fixed.  Komatsu Seiren Co. (Japan) -- 70 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1994, with a fixed 1/2% coupon at par via Credit Suisse.  Put option fixed on Sept. 30, 1991 at 106 7/8 to yield 3.79%.  Final terms fixed on Sept. 2.  Denis P. Coleman Jr., a top executive at Bear, Stearns & Co., said he resigned after 25 years with the Wall Street investment bank to devote more time to charities and his family.  Mr. Coleman, who is 43 years old and a multimillionaire, was one of the top 10 officials at Bear Stearns and one of its highest paid, people at Bear Stearns said.  They estimated Mr. Coleman's net worth at about $50 million.  Mr. Coleman became a partner at Bear Stearns in 1975 and reaped huge profits from his stake in the firm when it became public under a holding company, Bear Stearns Cos., in 1986.  Mr. Coleman, who started with the firm on a part-time basis, was an executive vice president and senior managing director in the government bond and mortgage department.  He also served on the firm's executive committee and its board of directors.  He will remain affiliated with the firm as a special associate director, Bear Stearns said.  "I'm very lucky," said Mr. Coleman.  "I've been affiliated with the firm for 25 years -- it's the only job I've had -- and it gave me many opportunities.  It's tough to make a decision like this."  Now, "I'd like to step up my activities with a number of charitable organizations and spend more time with my family."  Mr. Coleman is on the board of Covenant House, a home for runaways in midtown Manhattan.  The coming-of-age novel is one of the mainstays of the genre, particularly appealing to young authors writing in the first person, creating what at times seem to be only thinly veiled accounts of their own circumstances.  Echoes of the voices of Huck Finn and Holden Caulfield seem virtually inescapable in such books, but this doesn't prevent them from being interesting in their own right.  David Lipsky's "Three Thousand Dollars" (Summit, 203 pages, $18.95) is a collection of stories that hangs together like fragments of a novel, with the same or similar characters reappearing throughout.  Some of the best stories are seen through the eyes of a young man who lives on the Upper West Side of Manhattan with his divorced mother, an unsuccessful artist who is struggling to make economic and psychological ends meet.  In the title story, Richard has misspent his $3,000 college tuition money on "books and things, movies," and is called to account by his father in California and his mother at home, each in their tellingly different way.  In "Shh," the teen-aged Richard helps navigate his mother through the treacherous waters of yet another opening at her former gallery.  This touching story includes a sly and amusing take on the New York art scene, as well as a moving portrait of Richard's plucky but increasingly desperate mother.  Mr. Lipsky's first book is a promising debut.  Although he is not much of a prose stylist, and not much actually happens in most of the stories, he has a nice straightforward way of dealing with people and events and is a keen and sympathetic observer.  Best of all, this book radiates a warm humanity and is full of believable, interesting characters.  You find yourself turning the pages with pleasure to find out what is going to happen to them.  Holly Uyemoto, on the other hand, has a fine musical ear and a very distinctive authorial voice.  This 19-year-old author's first novel, "Rebel Without a Clue" (Crown, 192 pages, $17.95), boasts a surprising technical finish for someone so young.  Her narrator, Christian Delon, is whiling away the summer between high school and college in Marin County with his best friend, the celebrated Thomas Bainbridge, who is touted as the highest-paid male model in the world.  A good deal of energy is spent partying and trying to be cool, but eventually Christian is struck dumb by Thomas's revelation that he has contracted AIDS, and by Thomas's irresponsible behavior in the wake of this discovery.  Although Ms. Uyemoto obviously has a good deal of raw talent, most readers might want to wait to sample it until after she has had a chance to let it simmer a bit more.  Though she writes with energy, her self-conscious, slang-filled narrative is peppered with rather too many sophomoric banalities.  Example:  "'Cool it, honeybunch,' Flo the hairdresser snapped between chomps on the enormous wad of gum that had probably been surgically implanted in her mouth at birth."  Paul Watkins also has a fine ear, and his second novel, "Calm at Sunset, Calm at Dawn" (Houghton Mifflin, 280 pages, $17.95), is written with a sure, firm command of language.  In it, 19-year-old James Pfeiffer, who comes from a seafaring Rhode Island family, has been kicked out of college for punching a classmate who stole his camera.  Against his family's wishes -- his father wants his sons to find "a way out of fishing" -- James decides to prove himself by going to sea.  The scenes of shipboard life and the hardships suffered there are especially vivid, and the writing is lyrical without being strained.  Mr. Watkins, however, is better at describing places and things than at evoking people, and the book suffers from a lack of narrative tension.  Despite the strength of the writing, one eventually gets impatient with the way the story, like the sea, seems to go on and on.  Margaret Diehl's "Men" (Washington Square Press, 282 pages, $7.95), published in hardcover last year and now out in a quality paperback format, is a most clever combination of a coming-of-age novel with a picaresque recounting of one man's sexual adventures.  Except in this case, it is one woman's sexual adventures.  At the beginning of the book, Stella Smith and her lazy, rich, alcoholic boyfriend, Teo, drop out of college and go to live together in his family's empty Park Avenue apartment.  As Teo's drinking becomes all-consuming, he loses interest in everything else, especially sex.  "It's so repetitive," he tells Stella.  And when she answers that so is getting drunk, he counters: "But I don't remember it.  So it's not really repetition.  It's more like -- the Eternal Now."  Out of boredom, and driven by an impulse that she doesn't quite understand, Stella begins to pick up strangers for one-night stands.  Most of these encounters are not very interesting, either from a human or purely prurient perspective.  To make matters worse, when Stella leaves for California at around page 50, she leaves behind Teo, who turns out to be the most interesting character in the book.  The rest of the story continues Stella's sexual adventures, and relates her attempts to come to grips with having been abandoned by her parents as a child and to find true love.  Toward the end, as Stella strains toward happiness, the plot takes so many unlikely twists and turns that it becomes even more unbelievable than the two-dimensional characters that fill the book.  Which is too bad, since at her best Ms. Diehl writes with verve and intelligence.  Traders named by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange in an alleged $1 million trading scheme offered to settle exchange charges after concluding there is no way out of being hit with stiff penalties.  At a closed hearing that began Monday afternoon before a special panel of the Merc's board, the traders presented settlement offers.  The Merc is expected to make public its sanctions as early as this week, people involved in the case said.  Terms of the settlement offers couldn't be learned, nor could it be learned whether the Merc panel accepted the offers or plans to impose harsher penalties.  Albert "Bud" Furman III and Patrick J. Shannon are the two main targets of the Merc case.  Peter Shannon and Sidney L. Rabin face lesser charges.  The sources expect the two main targets could receive fines of as much as $500,000 and be banned from trading, which the traders hope to avoid with settlement offers.  Mr. Furman has already paid $252,500 as partial settlement of the charges against him.  "Everybody made pitches" to the board panel, a person involved in the case said.  Such settlements typically entail neither an admission nor denial of charges.  As reported, the Merc members face prearranged trading charges for big trades made the week of the October 1987 stock market crash in which customers were allegedly cheated, according to internal Merc documents.  The trades occurred in the Merc's Standard & Poor's 500 stock index pit.  The traders had little choice but to try to settle.  The Merc, in the wake of a broader federal investigation of futures trading pits, was expected to hand out tough sanctions regardless of the traders' defense.  What's more, any effort to fight the charges could have required the traders to testify, which may have led to self-incrimination in any subsequent federal probe into the trades.  "In this climate," an attorney familiar with the case said, "a lawyer who allowed his client to talk should put his malpractice carrier on notice."  Federal law-enforcement officials probing futures pit trading at the Merc and Chicago Board of Trade are reviewing exchange disciplinary cases for possible prosecution, including this one, a person familiar with the federal probe said.  Meanwhile, the Merc's outside counsel disputed assertions made in a Wall Street Journal article published yesterday that the Merc was preparing to make an example of these traders in order to look tough in the face of federal indictments of 24 Merc traders earlier this month.  "I don't think new pressure {resulting from the federal probe} stiffened the {Merc's approach to this} disciplinary case," Jerrold Salzman said.  "That conclusion was wrong.  But I don't think anybody will believe that.  I'm sure the defendants in this case believe that whatever happens to them is too much."  In turn, Mr. Salzman said, the Merc's compliance department staff would probably like stiffer penalties than the Merc will hand out.  He wouldn't discuss any specifics of the case, nor of the exchange's handling of it.  As reported, after the exchange and the public learned of the broader federal investigation, the Merc: brought additional charges against Mr. Furman and Patrick Shannon; moved the case from a routine disciplinary committee of members to a special panel of the board, the only Merc body that can expel members; and made clear to the traders involved that sanctions would be tougher than originally expected, according to people involved in the case.  Elements of Surprise  The weather forecaster's prediction  Went exactly according to norm:  The predicted clear skies appearing  After the unpredicted storm.  -- Arnold J. Zarett.  ---  High-Tech Tots  We worry too much about today's kids.  They may not be able to tell time, but they can set digital watches.  -- Ivern Ball.  ---  Over and Out  These days, doing something beyond the call of duty means turning off the beeper-pager.  -- Gil Stern.  The U.S. International Trade Commission approved an order to restrict temporarily imports of certain cellular telephones from South Korea and Finland.  Pending a final ITC decision on a trade complaint filed by Motorola Inc. of Schaumburg, Ill., the commission approved a "temporary exclusion order" to halt imports of cellular telephones that infringe on Motorola's U.S. patents for such communication equipment.  But an ITC official said that pending the outcome of the case, the defendants will be permitted to continue shipping the Finnish and Korean-made cellular telephones to the U.S. if they post bond equal to 25% of the declared value of the imported products.  The defendants include Nokia Corp. of Finland, Tandy Mobira Communications Corp. of South Korea, Tandy Corp. of Fort Worth, Texas, and other companies related to Nokia and Tandy.  Kenneth Mason, a senior ITC official, said the government trade panel also decided to require Motorola to post a bond with U.S. Customs.  Under the 1988 trade act, the ITC can require the posting of bonds by both defendants and the petitioner.  Mr. Mason said this was the first time that a bond will be required from a petitioner.  Motorola's request for "permanent relief" from the alleged infringement of seven of its patents covering cellular telephones is expected to be heard by the six-member ITC next December.  A final ITC decision is due by next March.  Motorola issued a statement calling the ITC action an "important victory" for U.S. manufacturers, which "spend a lot of time and money developing technical innovations," only to find later that foreign companies are infringing on their patents in the production of competing products.  Just when a number of snags seem likely to cause near-term turbulence for British Airways, the company is further perplexing some analysts by considering a stake in UAL.  Such a stake could dilute British Air's earnings and is unnecessary in view of the carrier's current traffic-sharing marketing agreement with UAL, these analysts argue.  British Air is considering buying as much as 25% of UAL -- the maximum allowed a foreign airline under U.S. Department of Transportation rules.  The purchase probably would be made as part of a UAL management-led buy-out that also would include the Chicago-based airline's pilots union and, possibly, Morgan Stanley's LBO fund.  Such a package would be designed to compete with the $275-a-share, or $6.19 billion, bid by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis that put UAL in play earlier this month.  But some analysts on British Air's home turf here aren't happy.  Already they are worried about a leveling off in British Air's passenger-traffic figures, late deliveries of new aircraft and the prospects of an expensive labor settlement around year end.  Now these analysts reckon that for a 25% stake in UAL, British Air would have to pay at least #1 billion ($1.59 billion), and probably more.  They predict that the ante could rise to $300 a share if a UAL-British Air combination sought to top the Davis bid.  "That seems a fairly high price to be paying for maintaining a marketing agreement," says Andy Chambers of Nomura Research Institute in London.  "It isn't positive in the short term.  British Air has no particular need to take 25%.  They have a good relationship with UAL as it is.  So why do it?"  Adds Chris Tarry of Kleinwort Benson Securities: "If an interest in UAL is going to cost British Air a lot of money, it won't be overly enthusiastically received by the markets.  If British Air can retain the marketing agreement without spending any money, it should do so."  A cash investment in UAL by British Air could dilute the latter's earnings, worries Bob Bucknell of Smith New Court Securities.  His best-case financing scenario to avoid dilution is a delicately choreographed arrangement whereby British Air would raise half the money through loans in the U.S. and the rest through a United Kingdom issue of 7 1/2% convertible preferred shares.  The drawback, he says, is that such a preferred offering would have to be "one of the largest ever of its kind.  It would all be pretty hairy, I can tell you."  And British Air "would still have a problem with the arrangement.  They wouldn't have control, and there would be no cash flow; UAL doesn't pay a dividend.  That isn't an ideal position to be in."  Even allowing for UAL's relatively secure financial position, Mr. Bucknell, who classified British Air shares as a "buy" last May, says, "I'm not as strong a buyer as I was."  But he urges purchasing the stock when it slips below 200 pence, or about $31.75 per American depositary receipt on the New York Stock Exchange.  The ADRs -- each worth 10 shares -- closed yesterday at 34 1/4 on the Big Board.  British Air's short-term uncertainties have prompted analysts to predict a relatively modest rise in pretax earnings for the fiscal year ending March 31.  Estimates run #280 million to #310 million, up 4% to 16% from #268 million last fiscal year.  Most of the expected gain was achieved in the fiscal first quarter.  British Air consistently has declined to say what it might do with a UAL stake.  Analysts tend to view the move as a pre-emptive strike aimed at edging out any other foreign airline with eyes on the U.S. carrier.  Market professionals don't rule out a foreign carrier joining the Davis bidding camp.  Even some skeptics about British Air's short-term tactics are sanguine about the long-term possibilities of a tie with UAL. Mr. Bucknell says that if a non-dilutive financing can be arranged and other problems overcome, the pair would make "such a good marriage."  UAL's strengths are in North America and the Pacific while British Air's are in the North Atlantic and Europe, he says: "If you did an overlay of their route structures, you couldn't get a better match."  Highly enthusiastic about a British Air-UAL tie is John Pincavage of New York-based Transportation Group Ltd.  "If the game is to be a global megacarrier," he says, "then, as a survivor, you clearly are going to have to have a strong partner in the U.S."  Current restrictions on foreign ownership of U.S. carriers may change one day, he says.  And as for British Air-UAL: "If you think on a 10- to 15-year scale, who in the world is going to beat them?  From the long-term structural standpoint, it makes good sense."  ---  British Airways  (NYSE; Symbol: BAB)  Business: Airline  Year ended March 31, 1989:  Revenue: $6.74 billion  Net Income: $277.2 million  First quarter, June 30, 1989:  ADR earnings: $1.36 vs. $1.17  Average daily trading volume:  129,932 ADRs  ADRs outstanding: 72 million  NOTE: Figures are translated into U.S. dollars based on current exchange rate for British pound.  One ADR is equal to 10 U.K. shares.  Leading department stores say their newspaper-advertising spending will be flat this fall, bad news for publishers who have been hurt by a slowdown in retail-ad expenditures that has lasted more than a year.  The dreary prognosis is doubly disappointing because some observers have been expecting that recent strength in apparel sales and aggressive back-to-school merchandising would boost retail-ad spending.  However, doubts about the economy, coupled with cost-cutting strategies now in place in many retail chains, have dimmed those hopes.  "There's no life out there," says John Reidy, an analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "We thought we'd see some gains in terms of retail linage, but it just isn't happening.  The stores are becoming as cautious as their customers."  Mr. Reidy notes that while the profit picture for newspapers remains bright because of lower newsprint costs, owners are eager to see an increase in retail-ad spending, which accounts for half their annual revenue.  "It seemed to many analysts that we would see some ups, but the ups aren't very vigorous, and surveys show they aren't likely to be vigorous," adds Mr. Reidy.  In order to entice advertisers in this dismal business climate, the Star Tribune (Minneapolis-St.Paul) has gone to unusual lengths for a metropolitan daily.  For the first time in recent memory, it has allowed the sale of its entire third page, traditionally one of the most visible and essential news platforms in a newspaper; the page was bought on a six-day-a-week basis by the Dayton Hudson Department Store Co. division of Dayton Hudson Corp.  "The minute a reader opens the Star Tribune he sees our ad," says Stewart Widdess, senior vice president, marketing, at Dayton Hudson.  "It's a big investment for us.  But it's also great exposure."  But even though Dayton Hudson is increasing its newspaper-ad spending in Minneapolis, Mr. Widdess says the chain's newspaper expenditures will be flat in other markets this fall.  Moreover, the company's total ad spending also won't increase.  Joel Kramer, executive editor at the Star Tribune, says the newspaper agreed to let Dayton Hudson have page three because the store gave up some space on page two.  "This gave us an opportunity to introduce a half page news summary on page two, something we wanted to do," Mr. Kramer says.  Even special promotions don't necessarily mean more ad spending.  In Chicago, Marshall Field & Co. is launching a four-month tribute to the culture and design skills of France with a four-color, two-page spread scheduled to appear Sept. 10 in the Chicago Tribune.  But despite the retailer's enthusiasm for the promotion, it hasn't boosted its ad budget this year.  "The newspapers have raised their rates in Chicago, so we'll actually be getting less space than last fall," says Janet Garrott, director of advertising for the 24-store chain.  Although retailers traditionally spend from 0.05% to 7% of sales on advertising, Ms. Garrott says many are now trying to increase profits by cutting expenses.  "It's an industry trend now," she says.  Ms. Garrott notes that even though Marshall Field is holding the line on ad spending, it still outspends Bloomingdale's in Chicago by "$3 to one."  Bloomingdale's, a division of Campeau Corp.'s Federated Department Stores, says total ad spending for the 18-store chain is running about the same as last year.  In metropolitan New York, however, the store boosted its advertising 10% to 15% for the first nine months because management believes it is gaining market share.  "We may not continue the double-digit increases for the rest of the year, but we will show an increase over 1988," says Gordon Cooke, executive vice president, sales promotions.  "You develop a gut instinct for what works, and right now we think newspaper advertising is helping us gain market in the New York area."  Sometimes newspapers reflect, as well as report, the changes in their communities.  Such is the case here.  Many attribute the lackluster market for retail-newspaper advertising to the mergers that have rearranged the biggest department-store chains in the country.  "Advertising isn't growing as fast as in past years, reflecting the acquisitions which have changed the retail industry," says Craig Standen, president of Newspaper Advertising Bureau Inc., whose 900 newspaper members account for 85% of the daily-newspaper advertising business.  "Retailers which have consolidated or refinanced have greater need for cash flow, which means discretionary expenses like advertising are cut."  Last year, the 1,600 dailies nationwide and 7,000 nondailies divided about $31.2 billion in advertising revenue, including inserts, Mr. Standen says.  Retail advertising is the single largest category, followed by classifieds.  At least one publisher, Knight-Ridder Inc., is reporting a small increase in retail-ad spending.  Jerome Tilis, vice president, marketing, for the newspaper chain, says his retail-ad dollars this year are up almost 5% and he expects to continue those gains through the end of the year.  "The first wave of consolidations in retailing is over," says Mr. Tilis.  "Fall l989 will be the first season in two years that merchants will be trying to move goods across the counter as opposed to organizing balance sheets."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: California Federal Bank, Los Angeles, awarded its $15 million account to Della Femina, McNamee WCRS, Los Angeles.  The account previously had been handled by two agencies, Bozell and WPP Group's Ogilvy & Mather, both Los Angeles.  Yields on certificates of deposit continued their slow climb upward this week, although they remain well below late-April highs.  A six-month CD of less than $50,000, perhaps the most popular among individual investors, yielded an average of 7.99% at major banks in the week ended Tuesday, up from 7.94% a week earlier.  The average yield on a one-year CD of less than $50,000, another popular investment, rose to 7.95% from 7.90%, according to Banxquote Money Markets, an information service based here.  This week's small increases are "a reflection of price stability and a calm market," said Norberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote.  Interest rates in general have remained fairly stable in recent weeks, after declining for about three months and then moving up slightly.  The yield on six-month Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction rose fractionally from the previous week to 8.32%, while the yield on three-month T-bills slipped slightly to 8.21%.  Bankers typically look to T-bill auction results when setting CD rates.  CD yields are fairly flat across the board, with denominations of less than $50,000 yielding just under 8%, on average, in all maturities, and large denominations, generally more than $90,000, yielding about a quarter percentage point more.  A three-month CD of less than $50,000 was yielding an average of 7.95% in the latest week, according to Banxquote, while a five-year CD had an average yield of 7.93%.  For denominations of more than $90,000, the average yield on a three-month CD was 8.24%.  For a five-year deposit, the average yield was 8.23%.  Although yields have been inching upward for three weeks, for the most part they're at least a full percentage point below where they stood in late April.  A six-month CD of less than $50,000, for example, yielded an average of 9.10% four months ago; on deposits of more than $90,000 the average was 9.36%.  On bank money-market accounts, the average yield rose in the latest week to 7.00% from 6.99% on deposits of less than $50,000 and to 7.49% from 7.48% on more than $90,000.  Avery Inc. definitively agreed to sell its Uniroyal Chemical Holding Co. unit to a management-led group for $227.5 million cash and $12.5 million in securities.  Separately, Avery said a loss from discontinued operations of $4.4 million made its net loss $5.4 million for the third quarter ended June 30.  The management group, led by Uniroyal President Robert Mazaika, had planned to pay $240 million cash.  The terms were changed to complete financing for the transaction, Avery said.  Uniroyal Chemical Holding, Middlebury, Conn., is the parent of Uniroyal Chemical Co., a maker of pesticides, rubber additives, and other chemical products.  The company's controversial apple-growth regulator, Alar, was withdrawn from the market earlier this year.  Avery has said that when it sells Uniroyal Chemical, it expects to have $20 million to $25 million in cash and no other material assets or liabilities.  It plans to use the profit from the sale to make an acquisition.  The leveraged buy-out, expected to close Sept. 29, will be submitted to Avery's stockholders for a vote at the annual meeting Sept. 21.  Avery, which started out as a coal company in 1984, bought Uniroyal Chemical from Uniroyal Inc. in October 1986 for $710 million, an acquisition it financed through $910 million of high-yield, high-risk junk bonds.  In last year's third quarter, a loss from discontinued operations of $8.9 million and a gain of $2.1 million from early extinguishment of debt resulted in a net loss of $7.1 million.  The loss from continuing operations widened to $1 million in the quarter from $238,000 a year earlier.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Avery shares closed at $1.25, unchanged.  A federal judge in Manhattan will review classified information collected by the U.S. in its electronic surveillance of Imelda Marcos to determine whether the information should be disclosed to her.  Federal officials eavesdropped on some of Mrs. Marcos's conversations under the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Act, according to a memorandum prepared by the U.S. Attorney's office in Manhattan.  Mark Hellerer, an assistant U.S. attorney who helped prepare the memorandum, declined to say when or where the conversations occurred.  Mrs. Marcos and her husband, Ferdinand, the ousted president of the Philippines, have been charged with embezzling $100 million from the Philippines and using much of the money to buy real estate in Manhattan.  Mrs. Marcos had asked U.S. Judge John F. Keenan to order the U.S. to turn over the information, claiming it is relevant to her defense.  Mrs. Marcos's attorney, Richard A. Hibey, couldn't be reached to comment on the judge's decision.  U.S. Attorney General Richard Thornburgh and the U.S. Attorney's office in Manhattan asked Judge Keenan not to release the information, claiming the disclosure would damage national security.  In an affidavit filed with the court, Mr. Thornburgh said the information sought "contains sensitive information concerning U.S. intelligence sources and methods."  The U.S. Attorney's office said it doesn't intend to use the surveillance information at Mrs. Marcos's trial.  Mr. Hellerer wouldn't say whether the information helped the U.S. obtain the indictments last year.  Judge Keenan said in his opinion that he had reviewed the affidavits and court orders authorizing the electronic eavesdropping and concluded that the surveillance was lawful.  The government had claimed that the information shouldn't be disclosed if the judge found that the surveillance was legal.  A federal appeals court upheld the Army's random drug testing of certain civilian workers, including airplane pilots, armed guards and drug-rehabilitation counselors.  But the three-judge panel here said the Army improperly tests laboratory employees who process urine samples to detect drug use.  It also sent the case back to district court to decide whether the Army should be permitted to test technicians, research chemists and others who work in chemical and nuclear operations.  The decision was the second concerning drug testing in about a month by a federal appeals court that stemmed from two Supreme Court decisions last March.  The high court ruled the government may require drug testing of some workers in sensitive or safety-related jobs, but the decisions left open questions about the constitutionality of broad, random testing.  The Supreme Court decisions covered tests for Customs Service workers who seek promotions to jobs involving intercepting drug traffic or carrying firearms, and Transportation Department rules requiring testing after major train accidents or safety violations.  An appeals court last month also ruled in favor of Education Department testing of motor-vehicle drivers and certain workers with top-secret clearances, but agreed with a lower court that tests of computer operators and data-entry clerks aren't justified.  In yesterday's unanimous decision by Chief Judge Patricia Wald and Judges Abner Mikva and David Sentelle, the court overturned the lower-court decision which upheld opposition by two unions.  The appeals court rejected the argument of the unions that random testing ordered by the Army in 1986, as part of a general testing program, constituted unreasonable search in violation of the Fourth Amendment.  John Sturdivant, president of the American Federation of Government Employees, one of the two unions, said he was "very disappointed" in the court ruling, saying that evidence showed "no serious drug-abuse problem" in the federal work force.  The court said that while the random nature of the Army testing is "relevant," that doesn't require "a fundamentally different analysis" from that used by the Supreme Court.  In the case of Army civilians who fly or service planes and helicopters, or control air traffic, the court noted that the high court's Customs Service decision hinged on possible impaired judgment of people who may use "deadly force" in their jobs.  "Compelling as the government's interest" in promoting Customs officers, "it pales in comparison with the quintessential risk of destruction to life and property posed by aviation," Judge Sentelle said in writing the decision.  He also said that Army civilian police and guards with access to or using dangerous weapons should be subject to random drug tests and that drug counselors might be unsympathetic in their jobs if they were drug users.  A power plant partly owned by the federal government is to blame for much of the air pollution that obscures views of the Grand Canyon in the winter, the Environmental Protection Agency said.  The preliminary report, issued after an environmental group sued the EPA, is the first government move toward improving visibility at national parks.  It could lead to orders to install expensive air-pollution devices at the Navajo Generating Station, one of the largest coal-fired plants in the West and situated 12 miles from the northern rim of the Arizona canyon.  But the EPA's conclusion is already being challenged by the group of utility companies that own 76% of the plant.  They question the accuracy of the research that put tracer chemicals in the plant's three smokestacks and tracked the plumes to the Grand Canyon.  The EPA's report also poses a conflict for the federal government, which is involved in polluting the Grand Canyon and in charge of cleaning it up.  Environmentalists see it as a further test of the environmental commitment of the Bush administration and particularly of Interior Secretary Manuel Lujan Jr.  A branch of the Interior Department, the Bureau of Reclamation, owns 24% of the power plant.  It uses the electricity to pump water for an irrigation project.  If anti-pollution devices are required, at a cost the plant's operator says could be $1 billion, almost a quarter of the bill would have to be paid out of the Interior Department's budget and, thus, out of U.S. taxpayers' pockets.  The federal government considers the Grand Canyon to have the worst air pollution problem of all the national parks.  A bright white layer of haze obscures the canyon's scenic vistas periodically both in summer and winter, though the sources of pollution vary because of seasonal weather patterns.  "On some days, it gets so bad you can't see across the canyon," says Robert Yuhnke, a lawyer with the Environmental Defense Fund, the group that sued the EPA.  The EPA finding doesn't address pollution during the summer caused by Los Angeles smog and copper smelters in Arizona and Mexico, which currently are reducing their emissions.  But in a move hailed by environmentalists, the agency relied on a National Park Service study that blamed sulfur-dioxide emissions from the Navajo plant for an average of 40% and as much as 70% of winter haze over the canyon.  The 2,250-megawatt power plant is the largest coal-fired utility in the West to operate without modern emission-reduction controls, environmentalists say.  The height of its three 775-foot smokestacks allow it to meet local air standards because it spews its emissions miles away.  Larry Crittenden, a spokesman for Salt River Project in Phoenix, Ariz., the operator and part-owner of the plant, concedes that pollutants from Navajo reach the Grand Canyon but says that canyon observers as long ago as 1882 reported the same sort of haze.  He said a more accurate study is needed to pinpoint Navajo's contribution to the haze and determine whether installing expensive scrubbers would make a significant difference.  Other utilities that own interests in the plant are Arizona Public Service Co., Los Angeles Department of Water and Power, Nevada Power Co. and Tucson Electric Power Co.  Interior Department spokesman Steven Goldstein said Mr. Lujan is committed to "a Grand Canyon unspoiled by man-made visibility problems."  But refusing to accept the finding by its own National Park Service branch and the EPA, the Interior Department called for a new study by the National Academy of Sciences to double-check how much of the canyon's problem is a result of the Navajo plant and how best to reduce pollution from the plant.  Mr. Yuhnke, the environmental lawyer, said Mr. Lujan's stance "raises some serious questions about his commitment to carry out his responsibilities as chief protector of the nation's parks."  The EPA will accept public comment for 60 days on its finding that Navajo is a major polluter at the Grand Canyon.  By Feb. 1, it is to propose how extensively the plant must cut emissions, leaving it up to the utilities to choose the emission-reduction technology.  While the plant's operators say scrubbers would cost $1 billion to install, a preliminary EPA estimate puts cleanup costs at about $330 million.  Syntech International Inc. said a subsidiary was ordered to pay more than $2.3 million in a dispute over rights for one of the unit's products.  The company also said that it was seeking a waiver from financial covenants from a major lender and shareholder.  The maker of transaction processing systems used in state lotteries said an arbitrator found against its Multigame Ventures Inc. unit in a long-running dispute with TPS Partners Ltd., a private partnership based in New York and New Jersey.  TPS had given the unit the licensing rights to an early version of one of its player-activated-terminal gaming systems; the unit discontinued monthly payments under the pact in November 1987, drawing the arbitration claim from TPS.  A Syntech spokesman said the total amount due includes the $2.3 million award, along with interest, arbitration costs and certain attorneys' fees and a requirement that it return all TPS property.  The spokesman said the company hadn't yet figured what the total financial impact would be.  Syntech also said it began talks on a possible waiver of minimum net worth requirements in a loan agreement with International Game Technology Inc., which holds $8.6 million in Syntech notes and owns 9.8% of its common stock.  The notes give International Game the right to accelerate payments due on the debt if Syntech's net worth falls below $8.5 million for two consecutive quarters.  Syntech failed to meet the standard for the first time in the quarter ended June 30.  The spokesman declined to speculate on the outcome of the talks.  In Syntech, recently buffeted by the loss of a major contract in Michigan, had a net loss of $5.7 million for the fiscal nine months ended June 30, on a 56% drop in revenue, compared with a year-earlier profit of $3.1 million, or 26 cents a share, on revenue of $18.2 million.  One of the hottest-selling mutual fund products of the decade is proving to be a dud.  These "government-plus" bond funds have raked in more than $50 billion from conservative investors in recent years by promising fatter payouts than ordinary Treasury bonds.  But their razzle-dazzle strategy -- which called for some tricky options trading -- backfired and left investors poorly rewarded.  Many of these funds were pitched to elderly people as money-market fund equivalents, offering double-digit yields even though the funds were loaded with low-risk government securities.  Sales literature typically included pictures of the Treasury, the flag and a family.  But investors very quickly are finding out the price of these big payouts.  When the funds fail to earn the distributions they have promised to investors, some simply take investors' principal and hand it back to them as part of the payout.  The result: The kitty that investors hold in the fund shrinks -- no matter how attractive the payouts appear.  The total return -- a fund's share value plus interest income -- can suffer.  "You're going to have to give up something down the line for this fat distribution check," says Catherine Gillis, an analyst at Mutual Fund Values, a Chicago publication that tracks mutual funds.  "And what you end up doing is giving up your principal."  The experience of government-plus funds has soured many first-time fund investors, some analysts say.  That is because in many cases the funds were used to lure people out of safer savings accounts.  Some fund executives even suggest that the funds were aimed at elderly people craving steady income who wouldn't notice any drops in principal.  The funds' predicament shows how investors can get hurt when they pay too much attention to yield, and not enough to total return.  It also underscores how aggressive marketing can backfire when investors find out they have been misled: Assets in many of these funds have plunged in the past year or two.  The Securities and Exchange Commission has gotten into the act.  Responding to investor complaints, the SEC now is scrutinizing the way government-plus funds have been marketed and sold; the agency is considering requiring more disclosure about how they maintain their high payouts, SEC staffers say.  The SEC already has cracked down on the way these funds advertise.  Rules that went into effect last year prevent funds from calculating options premiums in computing yield.  But the rules haven't helped all that much, because most of these funds aren't sold by ads, but through brokers who often tell investors about much higher "distribution rates."  The government-plus funds offered by Putnam Cos. and Massachusetts Financial Services, for instance, say they pay out annual distributions of more than 11%.  But the yield on the Treasury and mortgage-backed bonds they hold is far less.  How do they make up the difference?  Their idea was to generate income from writing -- that is, selling -- call options on the bonds the funds owned. {Calls give a buyer the right to buy the bonds at a certain price by a future date.}  But for fund investors, the strategy doesn't add up all that well.  In a rising bond market, the written options eat into the gains of the underlying bond portfolio as option holders call away the bonds, forcing the fund to buy new ones that pay less interest.  In a slumping bond market, the premiums a fund gets for writing options provide too small a cushion to offset the bonds' price drop.  The only time, it seems, when the strategy can work is in a flat market -- and that doesn't happen very often these days.  "It's a wonderful concept in flat markets -- but they don't exist," says John Kallis, manager of the $1.3 billion MetLife State Street Government Income Fund.  The fund, which currently hasn't any options written against its portfolio, uses options only to hedge, and not to generate income, Mr. Kallis says.  Officials at Putnam's $8.3 billion High Income Government Trust, the biggest "government-plus" fund and the one most criticized for giving back investors' principal, declined to comment.  Other funds were more forthright.  Massachusetts Financial Services's Government Securities High Yield Trust "is a fund whose sole objective is distribution," says manager Patricia Zlotin.  "If I have to {cut into the fund's principal} to do that, I will," she says.  The fund maintains an annual payout of about 12.65%; its SEC-mandated yield, however, stands at 6.99%.  Ms. Zlotin currently writes options on about half the portfolio of both the Government Securities High Yield Trust and the MFS Lifetime Government Income Plus Trust.  "You can't be much less than 50% (written) and meet your distribution," she says.  Investors more interested in total return can buy other MFS government bond funds, adds Ms. Zlotin.  She says that she herself invests in both the firm's government-plus and regular Treasury funds.  The options writing can hurt.  When bond prices rallied strongly from May through July, for instance, the funds' bonds on which options were written were yanked away, eroding gains at a time when other government funds were thriving.  "When the market spiked, obviously that hurt total return," Ms. Zlotin says.  "But we've gotten back in the hunt now."  The best time to write options is when the market is stuck in a narrow trading range, she says, adding that the current environment is one of those times.  As for government-plus funds in general, Ms. Zlotin says: "The concept isn't necessarily flawed, but misunderstood."  Many government-plus fund managers nonetheless have pulled back from the heavy options writing of years past.  The $4.9 billion American Capital Government Securities Fund currently has written options on only about 9% of its underlying bond portfolio -- down from 75% a couple of years back.  The bond-market volatility of recent years was an "awakening," says Ladell Graham, portfolio manager.  Mr. Graham says the fund doesn't pay out income generated from options writing; a recent cut in the fund's dividend "took the pressure off" to generate excessively high payouts, he says.  Kemper Corp.'s $6.2 billion Investment Portfolios Government Plus Fund currently doesn't have any options written on its portfolio, compared with 30% a few years back.  "We can still do options, but we decided to just run this fund for total return," maintains Frank Collecchia, portfolio manager.  But the fund cut its dividend earlier this year, and may soon have to cut it further to prevent a return of principal.  "We're getting close to where we'd have to make that decision," Mr. Collecchia says.  Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.'s $3.8 billion Government Plus Fund recently pared its covered options writing in half, to 12% of the portfolio, because of bond market volatility.  "We tend to be a little more cautious than some," says fund manager Helen Diktaban.  "We're not going to get a home run every time," she says, adding that her goal is to generate high total return.  Still, Ms. Diktaban doesn't rule out jacking up her options position.  Although she says the fund tries to pay out only what it earns, she concedes: "You can't always be perfect, unfortunately."  Other fund managers play down their options writing.  Colonial Group Inc. Vice President Leslie Finnemore said the options writing on the $2.8 billion Colonial Government Securities Plus Trust has recently been cut in half.  She declines to be specific.  More important, Ms. Finnemore maintains, is the portfolio's duration, or measure of a bond's sensitivity to interest-rate changes.  The fund's current six-year duration level suggests a fairly aggressive bet on rising bond prices, she says, and is altered depending on the outlook for the bond market. ---  Christopher J. Chipello in Boston contributed to this article.  ---  @ How Big Government-Plus Funds Have Fared  @ ASSETS* TOTAL RETURN**  @ FUND (ADVISER) (In billions) YEAR TO DATE***  @ Putnam High Income  @ Government $8.3 8.94%  @ Investment Portfolios:  @ Government Plus (Kemper) 6.2 7.14  @ American Capital Government  @ Securities 4.9 10.33  @ Prudential-Bache  @ Government Plus 3.8 7.23  @ MFS Lifetime Government  @ Incorporated  @ (Mass Fin.  Svcs.) 3.4 7.13  @ Colonial Government  @ Securities Plus 2.8 7.64  @ SLH Inv.: Government Securities  @ (Shearson Lehman) 2.4 10.04  @ Dean Witter  @ Government Plus 1.9 9.53  @ Government Income Securities  @ (Federated) 1.4 9.33  @ MFS Government Securities  @ High Yield (Mass Fin.  Svcs.) 1.3 8.28  @ LONG-TERM TREASURYS  @ (Shearson Lehman Hutton index) 13.57%  *As of June 30, 1989  **Price change, plus interest income  ***Through Aug. 24  Source: Lipper Analytical Services Inc.  The quintessential '80s couple, they had it all: two homes, six mortgages, two Jags, two Picassos and two cents.  One morning as he prepared to leave for Wall Street, Mona's health-conscious husband, Warner, offered an inspiring sermon: "Mona, having it all means not having to say, 'I'm hungry.' You owe it to me, our adorable infants, their nanny and yourself to trim away those extra pounds.  Before I leave to finish the man-sized job you couldn't, I have two words of advice: oat bran, Mona, oat bran.  "Sweetheart," Mona gushed, "your wish is my command."  At precisely 8:30 a.m. Mona Little, a chic suburban Scarsdale mommy-tracker with a bottomless appetite, entered her sleek Euro-kitchen.  After combining a small portion of plain yogurt with four ounces of cholesterol-zapping wheat bran fortified with pure niacin, the generously proportioned Georgette Mosbacher lookalike inserted a spoonful of the elixir into her mouth.  Almost immediately, she was choking to death.  Terror stricken, the former investment banker grabbed her cordless phone and dialed 1-800-IMDYING.  "Good morning.  You have reached the Bad Samaritan Hospital Emergency Rescue Service.  If you have a rotary phone, you'll expire shortly and we regret the inconvenience.  If you are phoning from a Touch-Tone device, please carefully follow my recorded instructions and press:  1 If you have no medical insurance.  2 If you have no pulse.  3 If you can't breathe.  4 If you can't speak.  5 If you are drowning.  6 If you are in a coma.  7 If you were bitten by a rabid stockbroker.  8 If you have just dined in a Red Lobster.  9 If you have swallowed the kitchen sink.  10 If you have fallen off the wagon.  11 None of the above.  Half-dead, Mona briefly revived and complied.  "Thank you for selecting 11.  You have reached the None of the Above Service of Bad Samaritan Hospital.  If you are still alive and honestly believe that you require medical assistance, please press:  1 If your HMO declared bankruptcy.  2 If you have decided that having kids, doing dishes and washing clothes may beat rendering advice to over-leveraged foreign corporate raiders who want to control a slew of overrated entertainment empires.  3 If you are a hypochondriac.  4 If you are anxious over the destruction of the rain forest, diaper pollution or Fortress Europe 1992.  5 If you are choking.  Three-quarters dead, Mona summoned the extra strength to affix her manicured finger to the proper button.  Thank you for calling the Choke Hotline at Bad Samaritan Hospital.  Our crack triage team currently is overwhelmed with a staggering array of insurance forms.  However, if you're convinced that your symptoms cannot be relieved by a good old-fashioned shopping spree, press:  1 If you have ever choked before.  2 If you secretly enjoy choking.  3 If choking to you is missing a lay-up in a NBA championship play-off game.  4 If you are mad as hell and aren't going to take this anymore.  Just when it appeared that Mona had drooled over Home Bargain Network's dazzling summer extravaganza, "Zircons to Die For," for the last time, fate intervened.  Warner, her normally supportive and nurturing husband, arrived home to tidy the house and prepare a nourishing meal for the brats.  "Mona, I'm home.  Three more weeks and I take paternity leave.  Think the economy will survive?  I'm going upstairs to change into my jogging outfit.  I'll be down in a flash and we'll cut out today's all-important Henry Kravis and Carolyne Roehm gossip-column clips for our dual-career, power-couple scrapbook."  Moments later, Warner bounced into the kitchen, found Mona, who was on the floor and a deep, mind-numbing shade of navy blue, and fumed: "Mona, if I've told you once, I've told you 1,000 times: Wheat bran contains mainly insoluble fiber and is not a suitable substitute for oat bran."  Mona, one foot in a trendy Euro-mausoleum, rolled onto her back and motioned toward her throat.  Warner, following the instructions affixed to the kitchen wall, applied the life-saving Heimlich maneuver.  Bouncing back with a burst of unbridled enthusiasm, Mona released an adrenaline-charged whine: "Oh my God, I'm alive.  I hope I haven't missed one of those garbled radio bulletins from Tangier."  At that moment, their attention was diverted toward a faint noise coming from their phone.  "Congratulations.  Thank you for dialing the pre-recorded, interactive, quick-response, fast-acting BS Quick Billing Hotline.  Please press:  1 If you were satisfied with our new phone service.  2 If you don't mind otherwise unemployable attorneys phoning you day and night for the rest of your life to remind you that your insurance company says they never heard of you.  3 If you would like us immediately to dispatch our crack Medi-Cash Helicopter with a pre-eminent team of dedicated doctors to pick up your prompt payment for service rendered.  Undaunted, Mona selected 3.  In five minutes, four brain surgeons escorted by a gun-toting nurse arrived.  They left with Mona's total net assets: one share of American Tel. & Tel. & Tel. & Tel. & Tel. & Tel. & . . .  ---  Mr. Schwartz is a New York-based trader and writer.  Push 13 if you wish to read this column again.  Schlumberger Ltd. said it and Nippon Telegraph & Telephone Corp., Tokyo, formed a company called Verisys Inc. to develop advanced test systems.  Schlumberger, an oil-field services and electronic measurement and systems company, said the new company reflects its strategy to create major alliances worldwide in the automatic test equipment market.  Verisys, based in Japan, will develop, make and market application-specific integrated-circuit devices.  Schlumberger and NTT, which provides telecommunications-related services and products in Japan, each own half of the new company.  Tsuneta Sudo, a former associate vice president and executive manager at NTT's LSI Laboratories, was named president of Verisys.  Jean Paul Vernhes, a former vice president of Schlumberger's Automatic Test Equipment division, was named executive vice president of Verisys.  E-Systems Inc. received a $64.6 million Air Force contract for communications equipment.  United Technologies Corp. got a $46.5 million Army contract for work on electromagnetic protection.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. was given $36.9 million in contracts for Army helicopters and experimental computer technology for the Air Force.  Raytheon Co. won a $17.3 million Air Force contract for radio parts.  Telos Corp. received a $15 million Army contract for software support.  Ford Aerospace Corp., a unit of Ford Motor Co., was awarded a $12.8 million Air Force contract for the TR-1 aircraft program.  Pulse Sciences Inc. got an $11.2 million Navy contract for scientific research.  In 1973, two sleepy regional banks, Taiyo Bank and Kobe Bank, set out to attract larger clients and compete more efficiently by merging into Taiyo Kobe Bank.  After 16 trouble-prone years of uninspiring growth, Taiyo Kobe Bank stunned competitors Tuesday by announcing that it would try another merger.  This time the world is watching.  In what will be the biggest bank combination ever, Mitsui Bank and slightly smaller Taiyo Kobe have agreed to join operations beginning April 1 in an all-stock deal that will give Taiyo Kobe investors eight Mitsui shares for every 10 Taiyo Kobe shares they hold.  Holders will be asked to approve the merger at special meetings in December.  The new bank, for now called Mitsui Taiyo Kobe Bank in English, will be the world's second-largest financial institution, with assets amounting to more than 53 trillion yen ($368.92 billion).  Only Japan's Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank, itself the product of a 1971 merger, is larger, with assets of 54.28 trillion yen as of March 31.  Both banks have something to gain in the merger.  Taiyo Kobe, a retail-weighted bank with a huge domestic branch network, gets a firmer foothold in capital markets and international banking after its involvement in an embarrassing corporate scandal two years ago.  Mitsui, the centerpiece of Japan's oldest industrial group, can expand consumer lending and fulfill a longtime wish to regain the top ranking it lost in 1945 because of its support for Japan's failed war effort.  "This is a very complementary merger," declared Mitsui's president, Kenichi Suematsu, at a Tokyo news conference with Taiyo Kobe's president, Yasuo Matsushita.  Mr. Suematsu, who initiated the merger talks in March, will become president of the new bank.  Mr. Matsushita will become the new bank's chairman.  The announcement of the Mitsui-Taiyo Kobe merger reflects the evolution of Japan's banking industry into new areas, such as consumer lending and wholesale banking, and away from others, such as corporate lending.  While some skeptical analysts and bankers foresee rocky times for the new bank, most agree that the merger signals intensifying competitiveness among Japanese banks.  And they predict the consequences of the transformation will be felt around the globe.  "This one merger will produce a collosal new bank," says J. Brian Waterhouse, a senior analyst at James Capel & Co., a British securities firm.  The new bank will have Japan's largest domestic branch network and be present in all the world's major financial centers -- a crucial factor considering that many Japanese banks now permit their overseas offices to make loans amounting to hundreds of millions of dollars without headquarters approval.  Many Japanese bankers these days talk frequently of a "survival theory," which holds that only a handful of major Japanese banks will be able to survive and compete globally.  Those are the banks with large enough capital resources to do business around the world, whether lending or in capital markets.  The rest are likely to remain purely domestic players.  In apparent acknowledgement of the desirability of big bank mergers, the president of the Federation of Bankers' Associations, Dai-Ichi Kangyo President Kuniji Miyazaki, praised Mitsui and Taiyo Kobe for their "courageous decision" to merge.  Though the bigger-is-better logic for fusing two banks into a larger one hasn't changed much since the days of Taiyo Kobe's birth, the stakes clearly have.  Thanks to the rapid growth of Japan's economy and the sharp appreciation of the yen in recent years, this country's banks have become the world's financial titans.  By most measures, the 10 biggest banks in the world are Japanese.  The largest, Dai-Ichi Kangyo, is three times as big as Chase Manhattan Corp. in total assets.  The 1.38 trillion-yen capitalization of Japan's No. 2 Fuji Bank is one-fifth larger than that of Citicorp, America's largest bank.  Last year alone, the combined assets of Mitsui and Taiyo Kobe grew more than Bank of Boston's total assets.  Size has its drawbacks, of course.  Many analysts, for instance, are dubious that the Mitsui-Taiyo Kobe merger will go smoothly because the combined bank may be too big to manage.  The new bank will have nearly 23,000 employees, about 600 branches in Japan and a score overseas, and a deposit base of 39.6 trillion yen -- also just behind Dai-Ichi Kangyo, which had deposits of 41.2 trillion yen at the end of March.  The new bank will have a total of 66 directors.  Size problems have dogged Dai-Ichi Kangyo since its merger nearly 20 years ago.  Even today, outsiders who work with the bank often discover that requests for information get lost or, more peculiarly, must be approved by two camps of managers -- those from the old Dai-Ichi Bank and those from the old Kangyo Bank.  One of the major objectives of any merger is to produce economies of scale, and analysts say the sheer magnitude of the Mitsui-Taiyo Kobe merger makes it unlikely that much can be accomplished soon, even if employees get along.  Only in areas such as computerization, where Japanese banks considerably lag their international competitors, will the merger have an immediate benefit, analysts say.  Worries about the merger prompted Standard & Poor's Corp. to put the credit rating of Mitsui Bank's commercial paper on its CreditWatch list with negative implications.  It put Taiyo Kobe's senior debt rating on the list with positive implications, noting that the bank's weak performance in recent years could be helped by the merger.  Still, the agency said, "successful consolidations of the two banks' operations will be a formidable task."  Already, there are signs that all aspects of the merger will have to be discussed.  The new bank's name, for instance, officially will be Mitsui Taiyo Kobe Bank in English, but will be Taiyo Kobe Mitsui Bank in Japanese, until a new name is found, sometime in the next three years.  For Mitsui, which had been Japan's biggest bank before the war, losing its identity obviously is painful, even though it initiated the search for a partner.  Efficiency is becoming more important for Japanese banks in part because of deregulation.  Authorities in Japan have been eliminating the cozy, fixed interest-rate structure that pretty much has guaranteed banks a steady if thin profit margin in the years since the war.  To increase profits, banks simply boosted lending.  Within the past two years, though, the proportion of loans and deposits that carry floating interest rates and don't offer banks a guaranteed profit margin has soared to more than half of all bank business.  Besides, many big corporations now can raise money directly from the capital markets; Toyota Motor Corp., one of Mitsui's big clients, has even said it no longer needs banks.  At the same time, recently introduced rules that will require banks to keep a certain amount of cash on hand for every loan they make are discouraging banks from lending money.  Those rules, prepared by the Bank for International Settlements, will go into full effect in March 1993, but they already are prompting Japanese banks to trim their lending, especially to corporations.  The only way to avoid constraining lending is to raise money.  Japanese banks have been very successful at accumulating capital; in 1988, they raised a total of 3.73 trillion yen, mainly to meet BIS rules.  Even if banks can keep up with the capital rules, they increasingly are forced to look at ways to increase the margins they earn on loans.  "Quantity will not be the first priority here any more," a top strategic planner at Dai-Ichi Kangyo said in a recent interview.  "Quality will be."  By quality, he means the amount that a bank can earn on a loan.  The highest margins now are on loans to individuals and small businesses, which typically offer profit margins of at least one percentage point more than corporate lending.  And consumer lending is booming, accounting for more than 60% of all loans in Japan today.  At Mitsubishi Bank, a big rival of Mitsui's, consumer lending now accounts for almost all new loans.  The Mitsui-Taiyo Kobe combination may well be Japan's leader in this kind of lending.  With its huge branch network -- it will have a third more offices than Dai-Ichi Kangyo -- the new bank will have better access to small borrowers.  And because one-third of its branches are in Tokyo, it will be able to take advantage of another fact: More than half of all consumer lending originates in the capital.  The increase in consumer lending hasn't quite kept pace with the decrease in corporate lending, though.  The result has been a decline in income from lending.  This interest income now only accounts for about three-quarters of bank earnings in Japan, down from 90% five years ago.  ---  Masayoshi Kanabayashi contributed to this article.  ---  @ Japan's Top Commercial Banks  Ranking by total unconsolidated assets as of March 31, 1989.  Japan's trust banks, which calculate assets differently, are excluded.  @ (in billions  @ of dollars)*  @ 1.  Dai-Ichi Kangyo bank ........... $376.60  @ 2.  Sumitomo bank .................. 367.45  @ 3.  Fuji bank ...................... 355.42  @ 4.  Mitsubishi bank ................ 344.26  @ 5.  Sanwa bank ..................... 334.49  @ 6.  Industrial bank of Japan ....... 259.82  @ 7.  Norinchukin bank ............... 225.59  @ 8.  Tokai bank ..................... 218.02  @ 9.  Mitsui bank .................... 201.48  @ 10.  Bank of Tokyo Ltd. ............. 181.12  @ 11.  Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan . 172.41  @ 12.  Talyo Kobe Bank ................ 167.44  Note: Yen converted at current rate  Overshadowed by the furor surrounding Super 301 and other issues relating to the 1988 Omnibus Trade Act is a little-noticed provision that may discourage foreign investment in the U.S. and ease the way for a future administration to implement a policy of economic nationalism.  Enacted as part of last year's Trade Act, the Exon-Florio Amendment to the Defense Production Act gives the president the authority, without judicial review, to suspend or prohibit foreign mergers, acquisitions and takeovers of U.S. firms or assets that threaten "national security," a term Congress chose not to define. (The amendment was sponsored by Sen. James Exon {D., Neb.} and Rep. James Florio {D., N.J.}.)  At the time the amendment was passed, many observers expected the implementing regulations would ensure it would not become another blunt tool with which to regulate direct foreign investment but rather a precision instrument for protecting national security, as Congress intended.  Unfortunately, the proposed regulations published in the Federal Register on July 14 fail to limit the scope of national security.  The time for public comment is drawing to a close; those who are committed to preserving the market for corporate control and maintaining an open policy toward foreign investment must make their views known by Sept. 12.  Exon-Florio is administered by the Committee on Foreign Investment in the U.S., an inter-agency committee composed of the secretaries of commerce, state and defense, the attorney general, the U.S. trade representative, the chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers, the director of the Office of Management and Budget and the secretary of the Treasury, who serves as chairman.  President Reagan designated the committee to receive notices of acquisitions, conduct investigations and recommend to the president, who makes the final decision, whether to investigate or block foreign acquisitions.  Exon-Florio establishes a reporting regime for foreign acquisitions and provides for a review period of up to 90 days.  Within 30 days of receipt of written notice of a transaction by one of the parties or a committee member, the committee must determine whether to investigate the proposed transaction.  Even if only one member of the committee wants a full investigation, the issue must go to the president, who will decide whether to proceed after receiving a report setting forth the differing views of the members.  A full investigation takes 45 more days, and the president can take an additional 15 days to decide whether to block the acquisition.  The committee has received nearly 100 notices of transactions in the year since the Trade Act took effect and has conducted five investigations.  While no acquisitions have been blocked, at least one has been restructured in light of the committee's informal advice that it would recommend that the president intervene.  Another notification was withdrawn for other reasons.  Three investigations reached the president's desk, and the president did not intervene in any of them.  In one case, however, the foreign buyer provided assurances that research and development facilities would remain in the U.S., and in another a comprehensive export-control management system was put in place during the committee's investigation.  The committee's public actions to date indicate that it has acted responsibly.  It does not lightly recommend that a transaction be blocked, and it properly views the Exon-Florio Amendment as a means for protecting national security and not for raising obstacles to foreign investment.  The danger, however, is that a future administration might not be so reasonable.  Since so much of what the committee does is off the public record, a future committee could extract all kinds of concessions from the parties and cause deals to be restructured or called off.  Moreover, because the statute fails to define national security, a future administration could reinterpret national security to include some ill-defined notion of economic security.  Since a presidential decision to block a transaction is not reviewable, such a reinterpretation could occur, even though Congress, when it passed the Exon-Florio Amendment, rejected a House version that would have allowed the president to block transactions that threatened the nation's "essential commerce," an equally vague but presumably similar notion.  This risk is compounded by the draft regulations, which are written in a way that could allow a future administration to decide that national security includes economic security, without even rewriting the regulations.  In light of all the current rhetoric about foreign investors seizing control of the U.S. economy, the possibility that a future administration will use Exon-Florio to restrict foreign investment cannot be ignored.  An Exon-Florio filing joins the already lengthy list of compliance documents that must be filed whenever a foreign company wants to purchase a U.S. company.  Because an unreported foreign acquisition is forever subject to Exon-Florio, the amendment's "voluntary" reporting requirement is illusory.  The mere possibility that a large transaction can be attacked by a hostile administration sometime in the indefinite future will lead most foreign investors to file.  Moreover, for some companies an Exon-Florio filing is likely to be much more than an expensive nuisance.  Some of the required information can be sensitive business data, and the statute provides that it can be disclosed to Congress, and perhaps to parties in legal proceedings.  This is no way to ensure confidentiality, and it is likely to make some foreign investors decide against investing in the U.S.  As for takeovers, Exon-Florio is a potential show-stopper.  U.S. companies facing an unwelcome tender offer from foreign suitors will certainly invoke Exon-Florio.  Managers at target companies are likely to approach many of the agencies represented on the committee by appealing to their own agendas, seeking the additional 60-day delay or, better yet, presidential disapproval.  Because it takes only one vote to involve the president, delay, which can be fatal to a hostile takeover, will be common.  Exon-Florio will also come into play in friendly transactions.  While third parties cannot file notices, they can communicate with the Committee on Foreign Investment about any transaction and will have little trouble reaching members of Congress and agency representatives, who can influence the committee.  Third parties could include anyone with an economic interest in thwarting or postponing a friendly foreign acquisition, such as shareholders, competitors, bondholders worried about a downgrading of the firm's credit rating, or employees worried about their jobs.  Exon-Florio also makes it riskier, and more expensive, for foreign lenders to finance acquisitions and joint ventures.  A lender that forecloses on a lien on assets or stock and ends up in control of a U.S. business will be subject to Exon-Florio.  The proposed regulations, however, provide no procedure for such a lender to file when it makes a loan to determine if national security would be threatened were it to take control.  Thus, lenders are subject to a risk of divestiture or injunction if, at the time of default, a future administration determines that national security is threatened.  The Committee on Foreign Investment could remove some of the uncertainty generated by Congress's refusal to define national security.  It could provide a streamlined no-action procedure whereby counsel for one of the parties to the transaction could seek the equivalent of an SEC no-action letter or an IRS private-letter ruling to the effect that the nature of the acquired business has no impact on national security and that the president will take no future enforcement action under Exon-Florio.  In addition, the committee could provide some explicit regulatory exemptions for transactions involving certain types of businesses.  By providing safe harbors for foreign investors, the committee could minimize the damage Exon-Florio could wreak on the economy without endangering national security.  ---  Mrs. Liebeler, a Washington attorney, was chairman of the U.S. International Trade Commission, 1986-88.  Bond prices ended mixed yesterday after the government lowered its estimates of inflation and raised its estimate of economic growth.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bonds rose about 1/4 point, or about $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount, while the latest two-year notes ended unchanged.  Corporate bonds were unchanged, mortgage-backed securities were flat to about 1/8 point higher and municipal securities were 1/8 point lower.  The Commerce Department revised its estimate of real gross national product yesterday to show a 2.7% annual rate of growth in the second quarter, up from a preliminary estimate of 1.7%.  The revision of GNP, or the value of the nation's goods and services, had been widely expected, but the inflation measures were a welcome surprise and gave long-term bonds a modest boost.  One of the inflation barometers, the implicit deflator, rose at a 4.6% annual rate in the second quarter, down from the initial estimate of 4.9%.  Separately, the government reported a 14.4% jump in July new home sales, the sharpest monthly gain since September 1986.  The news appeared to have no impact on bond prices.  "There was a smattering of buyers and sellers in the market early in the day after the gross national product report was released," said Steven Saslow, a trading manager at Carroll McEntee & McGinley Inc.  "After that, the market quieted down."  With many investors and traders away on vacation, trading was extremely light.  The last week in August, which precedes the long Labor Day weekend, is typically one of the slowest weeks of the year for financial markets, and this week has been no exception.  Traders said those not on vacation are too anxious about future economic reports to make investment decisions.  On Friday, the Labor Department will release the employment report for August, and the National Association of Purchasing Managers will issue the findings of its latest economic survey.  Both reports are expected to confirm that the economy is growing modestly.  Bond market analysts said investors are reluctant to get involved in the market ahead of the data in case it differs from forecasts and because of concerns that it will be difficult to interpret the jobs report because of the telephone workers strike.  The Labor Department said yesterday that strike activity in August will cut non-farm payroll growth by 108,000.  Still, the telephone strike could distort such data as hourly and weekly earnings, said Elizabeth Reiners, a money market economist at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  She expects a 75,000 increase in non-farm payrolls and a 5.2% civilian unemployment rate, unchanged from July.  Today's data on July personal income and personal consumption aren't expected to have much impact on bond prices unless they differ sharply from forecasts.  Economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report expect, on average, that July personal income and personal consumption both increased 0.8%.  Also ahead this week are tomorrow's report on July factory orders and on Friday the release of July leading indicators and July new construction spending.  In view of the large slate of economic reports due out Friday, some traders expect the market to proceed at a hectic pace, even more so if the trading day is shortened in observance of the Labor Day holiday.  The Public Securities Association said it is suggesting a 1 p.m. EDT close for the U.S. government securities market on Friday.  Meanwhile, Washington Public Power Supply System and Chemical Bank said they reached an agreement that will allow the utility to proceed with the sale of $450 million of bonds during the week of Sept. 11.  Under terms of the agreement, Chemical Bank said it would not assert a claim on the proceeds of the issue.  The threat of such an action had led WPPSS to postpone the sale last week.  The agreement resolves a dispute that began last week when Chemical Bank, acting as trustee for holders of some defaulted WPPSS bonds, vowed to grab part of the proceeds from the new bond deal.  In 1983, WPPSS defaulted on about $2.5 billion of bonds, the largest ever in the municipal market.  The $450 million offering, the first leg of a $2.8 billion refinancing, will mark the company's return to the municipal market.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bonds were mixed in light trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 99 5/32 to yield 8.20%, while the latest two-year notes were quoted at a price of 99 19/32 to yield 8.41%.  Short-term rates were slightly lower.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was quoted late at 7.91% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.16%, while six-month Treasury bills were quoted late at a rate of 7.85% to yield 8.27%.  Meanwhile, the Treasury said it plans to raise $4 billion in new cash with the sale of $4 billion of eight-day cash management bills.  The sale is set for Sept. 14.  Corporate Issues  The junk bonds of financially troubled Resorts International Inc. fell yesterday in response to Monday's news that the company won't make interest payments on $925 million of secured and unsecured notes.  The casino-hotel company's 10% subordinated debentures due 1999 fell 4 1/4 points to close at 31, after trading as low as 27 1/4 earlier in the day.  The 11 3/8% subordinated debentures due 2013 lost 1/2 point to close at 32.  Among new issues, Midlantic Corp., a banking concern, offered $100 million of 10-year notes priced to yield 9.328%.  Foreign Bonds  The Bank of England said it will buy back as much as #400 million ($626.1 million) of medium-term Treasury bonds Sept. 29 in a "reverse auction."  In such an auction, Britain's central bank offers to repurchase government bonds, or gilts, outstanding.  The previous reverse auction was held June 30.  "The announcement wasn't much of a surprise," one trader said.  "It just re-established the technical support this market has and means we'll have to keep waiting for some sort of guidance as to where to take this market next."  In recent months, the government has used its large budget surplus to buy back bonds, a trend that has depressed trading and curtailed profits in the gilt market.  Traders said gilt prices showed little response to the government's announcement and ended flat to lower after drifting for much of the day.  The benchmark Treasury 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 fell 1/4 point to 115 1/8 to yield 9.70%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 fell 1/8 point to 106 9/32 to yield 10.44%.  In other markets:  -- West German government bonds drifted before ending with modest gains.  Traders said local investors were waiting for guidance from U.S. economic data.  Separately, the West German central bank raised the rate on three-day Treasury bills to 6% from 5 1/2%.  But dealers said they didn't see the rise as a signal that the Bundesbank will tighten credit, and the move had no impact on bond prices.  Bonn's 6 3/4% bonds due June 1999 ended 0.05 point higher at 99.55 to yield 6.809%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 closed up 0.025 point at 99.275 to yield 6.924%.  -- Japanese government bonds ended slightly lower in cautious trading ahead of several U.S. economic reports.  Traders said Japanese investors are concerned about the dollar's recent strong gains against the yen.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 ended at a price of 97.14 to yield 5.070%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities gained 1/32 to 5/32 point after light dealings.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery finished at 96 19/32, up 1/32; 9 1/2% securities at 98 22/32, up 1/32; 10% securities at 100 30/32, up 3/32; and Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities at 95 25/32, up 5/32.  The Ginnie Mae 9% issue was yielding 9.63% to a 12-year average life assumption.  The spread above the 10-year Treasury note widened 0.01 percentage point to 1.37.  Municipals  Investors gave a solid reception to a $70 million Illinois sales tax revenue bond offering that dominated the competitive new issue market.  The issue, the largest competitive and state sale of the week, sold down to an $18.5 million balance by late afternoon.  The bonds were won by a First Chicago Capital Markets Inc. group with a bid producing a 7.147% true interest cost.  The issue was priced to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.25% in 2014.  The loan saw strong demand from bank trust departments and bond funds, as well as interest from individuals, according to First Chicago Vice President Eric Showers.  Bonds due in 1990-1999 were all sold.  Being the largest competitive and state offering of the week may have helped the rate the state got, said Dave Boots, bond analyst with Illinois's Bureau of the Budget.  But the fact that many people are on vacation "might have hurt," he noted.  A Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group released details on a $351.5 million offering by Alabama that was launched Monday.  The final pricing set yields to maturity from 7.20% in 2000 to 7.40% in 2003-2008.  Meanwhile, active dollar bonds were largely unchanged to 1/8 point weaker.  The Soviet economy has been shrinking since late 1988, mostly as a result of the half-hearted economic reforms of the past two years.  The recession means that the government will have fewer resources to distribute at the very time when the demands of various groups for a larger share of the pie become more urgent.  The damage from these pseudo-reforms may also delay implementation of the real ones.  It is difficult to obtain exact data on Soviet growth, and the current recession is no exception.  The Soviet government reported a 5% increase in gross national product in 1988, but this number is exaggerated by price inflation.  Real growth of GNP was 1.5%, according to a CIA estimate.  The leading independent Soviet specialist on growth, Gregory Khanin, estimated that the economy hardly grew at all in 1988, and actually began to contract in the second half of the year.  Mr. Khanin also predicted a continuous decline through 1989.  The official report on Soviet economic performance in the first half of 1989 seems to bear out this prediction.  The decline is most obvious in the basic industrial and transportation sectors, in which physical quantity provides a reliable measure of output.  Output of petroleum, coal, steel, fertilizers and basic chemicals declined; electric power generation, which usually outpaces the rest of the economy by several percentage points, grew by only 1%.  Shipments of freight by common carriers declined, with the steepest drop (2%) on the railroads, the most important mode of transport for the economy.  The value of contract industrial construction remained unchanged.  Since prices in this sector have been growing at a rate of 7% to 10% in recent years, this means a serious drop in real output.  The official report gives even less information on the production of equipment in physical units than it customarily did before "glasnost," itself a sign of poor performance.  Even the inflated output in rubles shows declines in such broad sectors as petroleum equipment, chemical equipment and agricultural machinery.  Recession did not spare the consumer sector, despite the high priority it has been receiving in Mikhail Gorbachev's policy.  Retail sales of bread, potatoes, vegetables, fish and sugar declined; domestic production of meat and butter did not increase.  Production of many consumer durables, such as cars, motorcycles and sewing machines, also declined, while output of nondurable items grew mostly on account of price increases.  Residential construction declined, too.  Especially steep declines, ranging from 7% to 50%, were observed in the commissioning of buildings for educational, health-care, and welfare purposes.  What is the cause of the recession?  Bad weather, the perennial culprit of Soviet economic troubles, cannot be blamed this time.  The decline is led by nonagricultural sectors, and the past winter was mild.  A more likely culprit is a series of economic reforms introduced in 1988.  The reforms were intended to make producers conserve resources, so that production of energy and materials could be cut without damage to consumption and investment.  Such a decline would be a sign of a healthy restructuring.  Yet this has not occurred; Soviet firms' demand for steel, timber, cement and railroad services continues to exceed the supply.  The declines in production were caused by supply factors, and not by demand.  The current recession is an unintended result of the reform, which delegated some of the decisions previously reserved for the central planners to the firm managers.  Thus, managers use their increased powers in price setting to inflate prices of their products.  Higher prices allow them to meet plan targets for value of output with fewer units of product.  In this way, price inflation suppresses real growth.  Soviet managers have always wanted to obtain lower production targets, since their success is measured by their ability to meet the targets.  The reform strengthened the interest in lower targets by allowing firms to dispose more freely of output produced in excess of the targets and of above-plan profits.  At the same time, managers were allowed some discretion in setting their own targets.  The production plans of enterprises began to inch downward.  Cuts in production are being planned for goods in very short supply, such as meat, butter, sugar, paper and medical equipment.  Even when these lower targets are exceeded, the output often fails to reach the level of previous years.  The recent reforms have introduced some market elements into the framework of a command economy.  The experience of past reforms, such as those of 1965, suggests that such hybrid systems are unworkable.  In the past, the command system successfully rejected all alien elements, minimizing the harm they did to the economy.  This time, the reformers are more resolute, and the economy is being plunged into a recession.  The recession is not the first blow that the reforms have given the economy.  Greater power in wage setting, granted to managers, has been causing an escalation of wages since 1987.  The resulting flood of cash has led to bare store shelves, rationing of many consumer goods, and a flight from the ruble.  The destruction of the consumer market has been the main source of popular dissatisfaction with Mr. Gorbachev's policies until now.  This dissatisfaction is bound to increase greatly with the recession.  The recession makes a serious market reform politically less feasible.  Such a reform would cause serious dislocations during a transition period, requiring sacrifices from the population.  However, the limited stock of people's patience and good will may already have been squandered by forcing them to endure the results of unpromising reorganizations.  The newly politically active population may not tolerate another cut in its living standard for the sake of a promised bright future.  The Soviet economy is still centrally planned.  The logic of such a system tempts the authorities to solve the twin problems of recession and inflation by tightening centralized controls.  This approach has the benefits of being familiar and having proved its effectiveness.  Yuri Andropov's tightening of discipline brought the economy out of its "pre-crisis" state of 1979-82 in a matter of months.  The program of financial stabilization, adopted in late 1988, represents a small step in this direction.  Yet for recentralization to be effective now, changes in the political climate of the past few years would have to be reversed, at a cost that is impossible to estimate.  The choice of anti-recession measures is thus politically painful.  Delays in making this choice would condemn the economy to continued slow decline.  ---  Mr. Kontorovich is an assistant professor of economics at Haverford College.  W.T. Grimm & Co. said the number of corporate acquisitions announced rose 22% in the first half, to 1,365 from 1,119 a year earlier.  The company, a division of Merrill Lynch & Co.'s Merrill Lynch Business Brokerage & Valuation Services, said the purchase price of acquisitions in the first six months totaled $122.2 billion, the second highest on record, and down 5.5% from the record $129.4 billion in the 1988 first half.  There were 167 transactions valued at more than $100 million in the 1989 first half, down 14% from 195 a year earlier; the number of $1 billion-plus transactions fell 40%, to 18 from 30.  The average acquisition was valued at $203.7 million, down from $212.5 million a year ago.  The tally includes both proposed and pending merger and acquisition offers, and in some cases competing offers for the same target company.  The largest transaction in the first half was the acquisition of Smithkline Beckman Corp. for $16.1 billion by Beecham Group PLC.  Of the 10 largest deals in the period, two others also involved foreign companies: Exxon Corp.'s purchase of Texaco Canada Inc. for $4.1 billion and Kohlberg Kravis Roberts' spinoff of five European food businesses acquired in the RJR/Nabisco acquisition to BSN SA of France for $2.5 billion.  Sales of foreign companies to American corporations rose 62% in the first half to 105, and totaled $13.7 billion, compared with $5.3 billion a year earlier.  Purchases of American companies by foreign entities fell slightly, to 149 with a value of $29.9 billion from 151 at a total of $31.3 billion.  The United Kingdom remained the most active arena for both foreign buyers and sellers, with 41 purchases and 34 sales, followed by Canada, 30 acquisitions and 23 sales.  The second-largest transaction in the first half was Time-Warner Inc.'s $11.7 billion acquisition of Warner Communications Inc.  Grimm's report said divestitures accounted for 45% of all acquisitions in the latest period, reflecting "a continuing and growing trend as corporations divest unrelated or unprofitable operations."  Grimm said the latest figures indicate that the number of transactions this year will be higher than the previous five-year average.  "Total dollar value paid so far in 1989 is on track to finish a close second to last year's record $247 billion, with takeovers of large, well-managed companies leading the way."  The survey indicated that the number of merger and acquisition announcements rose 24% in the first quarter, to 734, and 20% in the second quarter, to 631.  Hog prices soared because U.S. pig farmers are lobbying the Bush administration to ship much of the nation's huge supply of frozen pork bellies to Poland as food aid.  Such a move would be highly unusual.  Pork bellies, which are used to make bacon, aren't a major farm export, and pork hasn't been used as food aid in a big way since the 1950s.  The idea of an aid program is being floated, however, because the U.S. stockpile of pork bellies has swollen to its highest level in 18 years, which in turn has pushed down the price of fresh pork bellies to the lowest level since 1971.  The National Pork Producers Council, a hog-farmer trade group, is pushing the idea as a way to rejuvenate U.S. hog prices and at the same time help ease pork shortages in Poland.  A spokesman wouldn't confirm industry reports that the group is proposing the shipment of 30 million pounds of pork bellies, which is about half the U.S. supply in frozen storage.  Industry analysts are skeptical that the Bush administration will adopt the plan.  Among other things, such a move might raise U.S. consumer prices, and it isn't clear in what manner or how much the federal government would have to pay to acquire the pork bellies for shipment to Poland.  But prices in the cash and futures markets jumped because Cooper Evans, special assistant to President Bush for agriculture, met yesterday with representatives of the hog farmer group.  An aide for Mr. Evans confirmed the meeting but wouldn't elaborate.  In futures trading at the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, the price of the pork belly contract for February delivery jumped its daily permissible limit of two cents a pound to settle at 43.10 cents a pound.  Traders said the cash price of a fresh pork belly rose as much as three cents a pound in some areas of the U.S. yesterday.  Hog futures prices also rose on speculation that any shipment would spur interest in slaughtering more pigs.  The hog contract for October delivery rose 1.05 cents a pound to settle yesterday at 41.67 cents a pound.  The nation's surplus of pork bellies has soared because health-conscious consumers are trimming their consumption of bacon.  What's more, many in the hog industry miscalculated the fallout from the 1988 drought.  Last year, the price of several hog and pork belly futures contracts rose on speculation that hog farmers would trim their herds because the cost of livestock feed would rise in the wake of the stunted corn and soybean harvests.  But farmers didn't cut back hog production as much as expected.  Nonetheless, the rise in the price of futures contracts prompted speculators to put fresh pork bellies into cold storage in the hope of benefiting from higher prices later.  According to industry analysts, the amount of pork bellies in cold storage this month has roughly tripled since 1987.  Analysts expect the U.S. to have about 60 million pounds of pork bellies in storage at the start of September.  As a result, some analysts are estimating that the average price of a fresh pork belly in August was about 28 cents a pound, down about one-fourth from 38 cents a pound for August 1988.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: Futures prices plunged more than seven cents a pound following a prolonged rise.  Selling was prompted by an unexpected increase in copper inventories and the return to work of some miners in Peru.  The December contract fell 7.15 cents to $1.2375.  Nearmost contracts, August and September, dropped even more, losing 7.6 cents and 7.7 cents, respectively.  On Monday prices were slightly easier, but last Friday the December contract, for example, had risen to a life-of-contract high of $1.319.  That was a gain of 34.4 cents from the 97.5 cents at which the December contract traded on July 6.  London Metal Exchange stocks of copper last week rose 3,325 tons to 80,625 tons.  Expectations were that they might fall as much as 5,000 tons, analysts said.  In Peru, miners at Southern Peru Copper Corp.'s Toquepala mine, the country's largest, voted to defy the national strike and returned to work, according to a news service report from Lima.  Miners at Southern Peru's other mine hit by the strike, Cuajone, were scheduled to vote on whether to continue the walkout, the report said.  "The market was overheated, having risen too far too fast, and any excuse would have been used to bring about a correction," said Richard Hirsch, a metals broker at Sharps, Pixeley Inc., New York metal brokers.  In this case, he said, the LME rise in stocks served the purpose, followed by the relatively more moderate, bearish impact of the return of the miners in Peru and the continuation of labor talks at Highland Valley mine in British Columbia, whose workers also are on strike.  The Peruvian action didn't come as a major surprise because the impact of the strike had been waning, Mr. Hirsch said.  Only minor progress is being made at Highland Valley, he said, but the continuation of negotiations was regarded as negative for prices.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices showed little to no change despite a sharp drop in the dollar.  December delivery gold rose $3.30 an ounce to $369.30.  December silver was unchanged at $5.22 an ounce.  October platinum was up $2.60 an ounce to $479.60.  After dropping to new life-of-contract lows early in the session, December gold and silver futures recovered, with gold leading the way, according to an analyst.  However, he noted, "Silver and platinum were reluctant followers.  It wasn't a good performance in view of the fact that the dollar was at its weakest in several months."  He noted that bullion markets were quiet, which also tended to dampen any demand for futures.  But Sharon Ziemian, Citibank N.Y. vice-president, observed that gold has been doing very well, considering the pressures brought on it by the strong dollar recently.  The December contract has been able to hold at the $365 level, and "the price has been able to bounce back every time they've tried to push it down," she said.  COFFEE: Prices rose on continued faint hope that a new coffee agreement may be reached.  The December contract advanced 2.76 cents a pound to 85.97 cents.  It was the third gain in as many days and the second consecutive strong one following talk that had surfaced Monday reviving hope for a new agreement.  "There are a lot of people out there guessing, hoping and praying that there will be a new agreement," said one New York dealer.  The U.S. hasn't changed its strong position on its demand for more flexible export quotas and the elimination of sales of coffee at sharply discounted prices to countries that aren't members of the International Coffee Agreement, the dealer noted.  Although the International Coffee Organization, which runs the agreement, will have the regularly scheduled meeting of its council during the last week of September and the first week of October, the dealer said, no meeting has been called specifically to discuss a new agreement, and the U.S. hasn't been invited to such a meeting, he said.  The executive board of the ICO will meet next week, but its discussions will be on internal matters such as the organization's budget, the dealer said.  There has been a marked change in the attitude of producing countries in the market, the dealer said.  "They aren't aggressively offering or selling coffee as before and concentrating more on getting out shipments of what they have sold previously," he said.  This change has been marked in recent days with the revival of talk about the agreement and the rise in prices, he said.  AMR Corp.'s share price soared $10.25 to $91.50, as this summer's airline takeover fever landed at the door of the nation's largest carrier.  The price runup was sparked by reports that AMR, the parent of American Airlines, has engaged two top Wall Street securities firms, Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Salomon Brothers Inc., to help defend the Dallas company against unwanted overtures.  AMR wouldn't comment, but one person familiar with company strategy said the two firms were signed to "a standard engagement letter, a typical defense retainer."  Volume in AMR was heavy, with nearly 3.9 million shares changing hands in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  AMR has 58.9 million shares outstanding.  Much of the volume was handled through the Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. trading desk, leading to speculation that a single buyer might be accumulating stock.  However, individuals familiar with the trading said there wasn't any sign of that.  Meanwhile, financially ailing Pan Am Corp., still looking for a merger partner, said it hasn't yet decided whether to propose buying Continental Airlines, the nation's fifth-largest carrier, from parent Texas Air Corp. Last week, Frank Lorenzo, Texas Air's chairman, disclosed the company may consider selling a minority or controlling interest in Continental.  Later, it was learned that Scandinavian Airline Systems and an unidentified partner are in advanced discussions with Texas Air for a possible stake.  Airline analysts said they think AMR could be worth more than $120 a share, or more than $7.2 billion, based on measures used in the recent $3.65 billion takeover of NWA Inc., parent of Northwest Airlines, by Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi.  AMR's stock has already more than doubled from $40.875 within the past year, and has risen 74% in 1989 alone.  This year, American surpassed United Airlines to become the U.S.'s biggest airline in terms of revenue and number of passengers.  In 1988, AMR earned $806.5 million on revenue of $8.82 billion.  Among those rumored to be buying AMR shares was Texas investor Robert Bass, who has shown an interest in both NWA and UAL Corp., United's parent.  He couldn't be reached to comment.  AMR's stock-price action prompted Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, who sparked the takeover of NWA and is now bidding for UAL, to deny rumors that he has a stake in AMR. Mr. Davis is particularly sensitive to any suggestion he may have shifted his sights away from UAL, for which he has made a bid of $6.19 billion, or $275 a share.  The United Airlines pilot union is working on a possible bid for the company.  If someone is accumulating a major stake in AMR, the company appears to share one important vulnerability with UAL and NWA.  Two analysts who have read the AMR charter said it allows a consent-solicitation procedure under which shareholders can vote to oust the entire board at any time.  Mr. Davis succesfully used the threat of such a vote to pressure both NWA and UAL.  On the other hand, AMR Chairman Robert Crandall, the aggressive boss who has steered American for years, could be expected to try to ward off the kind of situation that has engulfed NWA and UAL. AMR directors earlier this month bolstered the company's poison-pill defense, an anti-takeover measure designed to make a hostile buy-out prohibitively expensive.  And AMR has been exploring other ways to enhance its stock value, such as selling its computer reservation system for upwards of $2 billion.  "Bob Crandall has in the past seemed adverse to a concept of a leveraged buyout, as it would limit the flexibility of the company," said Karen Firestone, who runs the air transport mutual fund at Fidelity Investments in Boston.  "He might feel that leveraging the company at a time when he sees tremendous growth opportunities would be a mistake."  One airline analyst speculates that a buy-out at an NWA-level pricetag would triple AMR's debt to $9 billion.  Instead Mr. Crandall, known as a cutthroat competitor, might welcome the chance to compete on an unleveraged basis against the likes of United and NWA, some on Wall Street believe.  Paul Karos, an airline analyst at First Boston Corp., said that while AMR is a takeover candidate "from a statistical point of view," the biggest uncertainties are whether management resists or Congress intervenes.  Congress has been in recess during the takeover battle for United.  If lawmakers return to Washington next month to find the nation's two largest airlines facing leveraged takeovers that reduce their financial stability, they may put pressure on the Bush administration to step on the brakes.  Meanwhile, how actively Pan Am pursues Continental Airlines depends in large part on whether Pan Am can be sure that any deal worked out with Texas Air will go through.  Pan Am's losing bid for NWA cost it a special $28 million charge for the second quarter, and the company can't afford to run up more fees on another losing bid, many analysts say.  The carrier posted a $7.7 million second-quarter loss and is running behind its earnings projections for the year.  Together, Pan Am and Continental would be a seriously debt-ridden airline.  They already have two of the highest debt-to-equity ratios in the industry and suffer from many of the same problems, such as aging aircraft fleets and low employee morale.  However, Pan Am does have $830 million in tax credits that could shelter profits, and North Atlantic and Latin American routes that could be combined with Continental's domestic system to produce a strong international competitor.  ---  Bridget O'Brian contributed to this article.  The Dallas Times Herald won a round in its legal battle with rival Dallas Morning News over rights to publish the comic strip Doonesbury and other features syndicated by Universal Press Syndicate, based in Kansas City, Mo.  A state district judge here granted the Times Herald a temporary restraining order barring the Morning News from publishing 26 comic strips and columns that the Times Herald has been purchasing from the syndicate.  Universal Press has filed a related suit against the Times Herald in U.S. District Court in Kansas City.  Underlying the dispute is a planned joint venture between A.H. Belo Corp., parent of the Morning News, and Universal Press.  The venture is intended to explore electronic media possibilities for Universal's features.  But the agreement also gives Belo exclusive rights to Universal Press features for the Morning News, the city's largest paper, starting Sept. 3.  As a result, Universal notified the Times Herald that it could no longer run 26 features, including the Dear Abby and Erma Bombeck columns and The Far Side, a popular comic strip.  The Times Herald, which is owned by DTH Media Inc., sued Belo, Universal Press and the Morning News in state court in Houston on Aug. 7, charging interference with a contract and unfair competition.  State District Judge David West on Monday temporarily barred the Morning News from going ahead with its publication plans, ruling that there is a significant probability the Times Herald would be irreparably harmed by such an action.  Still pending is the suit in Kansas City, in which Universal Press is seeking a similar order barring the Times Herald from publishing the 26 features beginning Sept. 3.  It is seeking the order on grounds that its copyright on the features would be violated.  The nuclear-weapons factory looms up abruptly on the windswept mesa, a gray fortress rising in the shadow of the Front Range.  It is a forbidding, top-secret place, 6,550 acres protected by armored vehicles, sentry towers and barbed wire.  But it may not be protected against the company that runs it.  Rockwell International Corp., the maker of the space shuttle and other spectacular flying machines, can't seem to get its act together as a bomb-builder.  At Rocky Flats and at plutonium-producing Hanford Reservation, which Rockwell operated until 1987, the company's record has been marred by sloppiness and sometimes-blatant disregard for federal regulations.  In March 1988, the Department of Energy formally cited Rockwell for "a breakdown in the classic management responsibilities to organize, direct, plan and assess the safety of the activities" at Rocky Flats, which makes the plutonium triggers that detonate warheads.  An internal DOE memo in 1986 criticized the plant as "in poor condition generally in terms of environmental compliance" and called some of its waste facilities "patently illegal."  Two years earlier, the Federal Bureau of Investigation found that a part of the plant supposed to be making high-tech weapons mock-ups was actually making gifts for DOE officials.  And last June, the FBI dropped the biggest bomb of all.  As 72 agents swooped down on the Flats, as locals call the plant, the agency alleged that Rockwell had dumped cancer-causing chemicals into nearby streams and burned hazardous waste in a supposedly closed incinerator.  The criminal investigation, dubbed Operation Desert Glow, is likely to last up to a year and may ultimately decide whether Rockwell gets any more DOE contracts.  A federal grand jury began considering evidence in the case a few weeks ago.  As various troubles have hit the nation's 17 principal bomb-making plants -- with the shuttering of unsafe reactors, exposure of workers to potentially harmful radiation, and mushrooming waste-disposal problems -- the DOE has borne the brunt of the public's criticism.  But a look at Rockwell shows how contractor mismanagement can cause bomb-plant problems, which can fester when mixed with DOE laxity.  "Rocky Flats is firmly in the hands of Rockwell International," contends Nathaniel J. Miullo, the Environmental Protection Agency official who oversees the plant's compliance with pollution rules.  He notes that the company has 5,200 employees here, DOE only about 60.  Rockwell denies knowingly doing anything wrong at the Flats.  "We've done a noble, patriotic job," says Sam Iacobellis, one of the company's three chief operating officers, a man best known as the highly successful pitchman for the B-1B bomber.  At the company's El Segundo, Calif., headquarters, he offers statistics showing that the plant's worker injury rate is 60% below the average for U.S. industrial companies, and he notes that the Flats has never had an uncontrolled nuclear reaction.  He also observes that certain DOE reports about Rockwell management have been decidedly favorable and that one senior department official said, before the FBI raid, that the company had turned Rocky Flats into a model facility.  "You think I'd go there if I thought it was unsafe?"  Mr. Iacobellis asks.  Earlier this month, Energy Secretary James Watkins also expressed confidence that Rocky Flats is now "safely doing its job . . . with a lot of new oversight, new management on the part of Rockwell International {and} new management on the part of DOE."  Within weeks, however, Watkins-appointed investigators determined that plutonium -- one of the most lethal substances on earth -- is still "found in situations that require immediate attention" at the Flats.  They also said Rockwell should give "more careful attention to preventing and mitigating the consequences of human error."  Local critics are more worried than ever.  "You're talking about a catastrophe," says Niels Schonbeck, a chemistry professor at Denver's Metropolitan State College and a member of a state panel monitoring the cleanup of the facility, which lies just 16 miles outside the capital.  "It's going to be very hard to convince people it's a different day," adds Rep. Patricia Schroeder, a Colorado Democrat.  Indeed, talks with Mr. Iacobellis raise doubts about how seriously Rockwell takes its censure.  Asked about safety, for example, he boasts of company T-shirts declaring: "Safety -- Watch It Grow at Rocky Flats."  He addresses questions on bomb-plant accountability by handing over Rockwell's code of ethics -- standard fare for any major company.  And he casually describes Rockwell's primary aim as pleasing its customer, in this case the government.  "We're like Kelly girls," he says.  The diversified aerospace company entered the nuclear-weapons business 14 years ago, inheriting Rocky Flats from Dow Chemical Co. Rockwell, which has never viewed bomb production as a large part of its business, saw it as a flag-waving way to keep abreast of nuclear technology.  A leader in nuclear energy since the late 1950s, Rockwell was among the first to send atom-derived power -- 7.5 megawatts -- through a commercial grid.  If there was a price, the company figured, it would be government's close scrutiny at the bomb plants.  Then-Chairman Robert Anderson said in 1975 that Rockwell would be "placed under a microscope" after taking over the Flats, which, like many weapons facilities, had a long legacy of problems.  Among them: persistent leaks of plutonium from contaminated oil drums and large fires in 1957 and 1969.  Oversight by DOE, however, has turned out to be spotty at best.  The FBI is even charging that the department abetted the illegal storage and disposal of toxic waste at Rocky Flats and helped cover up Rockwell's alleged misdeeds.  In 1977, Rockwell took over Hanford, a 570-square-mile complex in southeastern Washington state, and for the next decade was blasted by regulators for ignoring safety hazards there.  House Energy and Commerce Committee investigators charged in a 1988 report, for example, that two workers had received plutonium puncture wounds while replacing filters in a piece of equipment that Rockwell knew was of flawed design.  Casey Ruud -- Rockwell's lead auditor at Hanford at the time and now an outspoken company critic -- says supervisors had ordered the workers to pull out the jammed filters without wearing protective rubber gloves.  "The managers in charge said, 'Throw those gloves off and go to it,'" Mr. Ruud recalls.  Rockwell declines to comment on the incident.  The scope of the Hanford problems is difficult to determine because of an apparent clampdown on bad news about the plant.  A 1982 memo distributed by a Rockwell manager said that if employees reported company problems to the government, "I will take action to terminate that person immediately."  Mr. Iacobellis says the memo may have simply meant that the manager wanted to be involved in solving problems.  Hushing employees is "just not our policy," he says, and anyone who does it "isn't going to hack it at Rockwell."  An embarrassing moment at Hanford occurred when Washington Gov. Booth Gardner rode past a spill of low-level radioactive material because someone had taken down warning signs.  Rockwell now terms the event "a pointless error since the same signs were in a number of other places" around Hanford.  Pointless or not, the highly publicized incident was Rockwell's undoing at Hanford, many believe.  When the DOE consolidated operations there in 1987, Rockwell lost its management contract to Westinghouse Electric Corp.  "The handwriting was on the wall," says Dan Silver, a special assistant to Gov. Gardner.  Rockwell says it doesn't believe that its rejection stemmed from the governor's visit.  It is at the Flats, in any case, that the company has stumbled most seriously.  In the raid four years ago, FBI agents descended on an area known as the "model shop," which is supposed to make nonexplosive replicas of weapons for research, testing and display.  What they found was that for more than a decade, Warren Rooker, the Rockwell manager in charge, had been manufacturing baseball caps, belt buckles, cabinets, car parts, coffee mugs, cuff links, earrings, foot massagers, grandfather clocks -- even a staircase.  He had workers make paperweights with this question written on the bottom: "Would we lie to you?"  Records show that Mr. Rooker gave these items, at taxpayers' expense, to DOE officials.  Though Mr. Rooker was fired, a lawsuit brought under the False Claims Act by a former Rockwell employee, J. David Navarette, alleges that the company never disciplined others involved.  Mr. Rooker couldn't be reached for comment, and Rockwell won't say much because the suit is pending in federal district court in Denver.  But Mr. Iacobellis contends it "promptly informed" the DOE after learning of the misuse of the model shop, cooperated fully with the FBI and took "a number of corrective actions to prevent a recurrence of such activities."  Most of the recent concerns have been about safety.  In its March 1988 report on Rocky Flats management, the DOE specifically examined buildings No. 776 and No. 777 and found radiation-protection, fire-protection and quality-assurance problems.  The report said, "Although management policy statements strongly supported safety, the organizational structure, the diffusion of responsibilities, the lack of correlation between authorities and responsibilities, the deficiencies in the oversight program {and} limited accountability throughout the entire organization were all contributing factors" to the difficulties.  Dominick Sanchini, the president of Rockwell's Rocky Flats operations, acknowledges that "we got hit pretty hard" by the DOE appraisal.  "It was obvious that we weren't safe enough and could do better," he says.  Although "we still have a ways to go," he adds, the company is now on the right track toward "a new awareness" about safety and quality.  He even sent a letter to Rocky Flats employees last October, saying, "Our entire way of doing business has changed, and we are very proud of our accomplishments."  Rockwell, for example, says it has made great strides in dealing with worker exposure to beryllium, a grayish-black metal used in various industrial processes.  Though at least 11 workers have been exposed over the years -- one died from beryllium poisoning, according to court records -- Rockwell says others are being closely monitored by company medical personnel.  Rockwell adds that since a 1984 DOE study pointed out shortcomings in its beryllium operations, it has spent $3.5 million to reduce airborne concentrations of the substance.  Similarly, Rockwell attempts to put in the best light a finding by the General Accounting Office, the congressional investigative arm, that levels of solvents in Rocky Flats ground water exceed certain standards by as much as 1,000 times.  In addition, a September 1988 environmental survey by the DOE also ranked water contamination at the plant as the No. 1 potential health hazard at any of its nuclear-weapons facilities.  The company says it doesn't consider this as a danger and is preparing to clean things up during the 40 years it would take for contaminants to migrate off site.  But, at times, the government has seen a need to remind Rockwell of its responsibilities.  After the latest FBI raid, Energy Secretary Watkins wrote Chairman Donald Beall that "we are not in a position to produce at all until we are in a position to meet all environmental, safety and health requirements."  The secretary has been among the first to recognize publicly that for 40 years the DOE, pressured by various Pentagon arms buildups, gave its contractors one priority above all others: Make more bombs.  Since taking office this year, however, Mr. Watkins has pledged to make sure that contractors comply fully with every rule on the books.  Facing a stricter regulatory environment, Rockwell may want to "get out of the business," says Jack Modzelewski, who was a Rockwell executive before becoming a PaineWebber Inc. securities analyst last year.  There hasn't ever been much profit in nuclear weapons.  In its best six-month period here, Rockwell earned, in effect, only $4.8 million; its total net income in the fiscal year ended Sept. 30, 1988, was $811.9 million.  Even before he left, Mr. Modzelewski says, Rockwell was asking itself: "For a few pennies a share, do we need all this trouble?"  Some outsiders believe that dropping out under government fire could scar the spirit of a company that views itself as a nuclear pioneer.  But Rockwell, which also has a classified DOE contract at the Idaho National Engineering Laboratory, says it plans to continue producing nuclear-weapons parts.  After all, Mr. Iacobellis says, opponents of Rocky Flats lack proper perspective.  He quotes a study showing that anyone living within 50 miles of the plant would have about a one-in-a-billion annual risk of dying of cancer -- and that is if an accident occurred here.  By contrast, he says, Colorado residents have a one-in-65 chance of dying in a motor-vehicle accident.  His local adversaries, though, say such responses only deflect the real issues.  "There has been a lot of swaggering on the part of Rockwell," charges Paula Elofson-Gardine, a local activist.  "When we talk about cutting down on contaminants at the plant, we're literally met with laughter."  Adrienne Anderson, who has taken on Martin Marietta Corp., Manville Corp. and others for the Denver office of the National Toxics Campaign, an environmental group, says Rockwell "stands out as a corporation that has been callous to the public."  The latest allegations appear to anger residents the most.  The FBI says that late last year it sent an airplane over an incinerator where two workers and an inspector had been exposed to radiation and which wasn't supposed to reopen until Jan. 20.  But on three nights in December, the bureau says, the plane took infrared photos that proved the "incincerator stack was thermally active."  Mr. Iacobellis denies that.  He says Rockwell hasn't seen any evidence that the incinerators were turned on or that it engaged in any midnight dumping of pollutants.  The work force here, he says, has "consistently compiled the finest record for health and safety" among the DOE's weapons plants.  Says the EPA administrator, Mr. Miullo: "I've looked into their eyes.  These people want to do a good job.  They have families that live downstream from the facility."  But Mr. Miullo, who supplied information to the FBI that helped spark the latest raid at Rocky Flats, adds: "Some things have made me uneasy.  And obviously the FBI and the Department of Justice saw some things that made them uneasy, too."  Now that a Solidarity leader has become prime minister, it seems everyone in Congress wants to send U.S. foreign aid to Poland.  Certainly, everyone wishes this remarkable new government well, and it is important to give it a show of confidence.  But unless the U.S. steers clear of past foreign-aid mistakes, aid to Poland could be more than wasted.  It might make the problems worse.  President Bush has displayed commendable caution in not immediately pledging to increase the $100 million in aid he promised in Warsaw last month.  Administration officials recall the billions in loans Western banks poured into Poland after the pseudoreforms of the 1970s.  All that remains is a crushing $40 billion foreign debt.  This, after all, is a country whose milk subsidies alone exceeded the defense budget until earlier this month.  The White House believes the new government has to first show that it can free up the economy so that any Western aid can be spent wisely.  The administration no doubt will catch some flak for this wait-and-see attitude but there is good reason for it.  A recent report by the U.S. Agency for International Development noted that while the U.S. has spent $250 billion on foreign aid in the past 20 years, none of the recipient countries has moved from less-developed to developed status.  It found that U.S. aid plays only a "supportive role at best" in improving an economy compared with internal reform, free trade, U.S. volunteer groups and foreign investment.  Indeed, the report noted that absent the right economic changes, U.S. aid might hinder economic progress in countries such as Poland.  This means that any U.S. assistance to Poland should be conditioned on real economic reform, and should go to private entities, not to the corrupt and inefficient state sector.  Fortunately, 80% of Polish agriculture is already privately owned, though farms are usually only three to six acres.  If the state choked off its ruinous 15%-a-week hyper-inflation, sold or gave away larger tracts of land to private farmers and abolished price-fixing marketing boards, Poland's food lines could start to melt away.  Recall that after Chinese agriculture produced results in a more market-based climate, private capital began to flow into the country.  Poland's state-owned industries will require even more radical surgery.  Lech Walesa argues that Poland's skilled, cheap labor pool can make it competitive, but that will happen only if the state's uncompetitive mines and shipyards are closed and workers redirected to private industry.  But before Poles can hope to start their own businesses and succeed, the state will have to end currency controls and allow private banking.  U.S. foreign aid in general would get good results for a change if it clearly rewarded these sorts of policies.  GOP Senator Connie Mack has used the AID report to draft an "Index of Economic Freedom" for use in deciding the right level of foreign aid to developing countries.  The index would rate aid recipients in such areas as property rights, regulation, limits on trade and the flow of capital, taxation and the overall size of government.  In June, the House voted to require that AID report back within six months on the creation of a similar index.  There was a time when expecting such commitments from stumbling economies seemed politically unrealistic.  But the reality of economic failure and collapse is now causing many of these same countries to think hard about policies that work.  Hungary's government this month issued a policy statement that sounds like a version of Adam Smith.  It pledged an irreversible shift toward a "market economy" with different forms of ownership even, it stressed, "if it causes social conflicts."  It also promised to enact "guarantees of the autonomy of the individual."  At this point, Solidarity's membership is obviously split, at least in public, over the shape of Poland's economy.  Many of its members still claim to believe that a retooled version of socialism can work in Poland.  Others reject capitalism and want Poland to steer a course between free markets and pure socialism.  They could do worse than consult with Hungarian and Yugoslavian economists, who admit their countries have tried to do just that -- with disastrous results.  Privately, of course, Solidarity economists will agree that a market economy is the only long-range answer to Poland's problems, but Solidarity's leaders are reluctant to be this bold in public.  Yet, they are now running the government, and the time for giving lip service to ideas that cannot work may be past.  Real economic reform and the positive performance it brings would go a long way to convince Western investors and governments that their heads as well as their hearts justify putting money into Poland.  Japan's new prime minister, Toshiki Kaifu, is likely to be long on soothing reassurances and short on concrete initiatives on his diplomatic tour of North America that begins today.  As head of the government, the 58-year-old Mr. Kaifu must reassure President Bush and the leaders of Canada and Mexico that Japan is a reliable and consistent ally, and try to defuse their anger over Japan's persistently high trade surplus.  As a relatively young and untested premier, he needs to come across as a leader and convince people at home his cabinet deserves to be more than temporary.  But as the head of a ruling party buffeted by financial and sexual scandals that felled his immediate two predecessors, he must do all this without alienating voting blocs that oppose market liberalization or a public that has grown impatient with political high-handedness.  Mr. Kaifu, who took office three weeks ago, was selected partly because he wasn't a strong leader within the ruling Liberal Democratic Party, and therefore satisfied the need for a compromise candidate.  Strong Japanese prime ministers in recent years have visited the U.S. equipped with trade initiatives or concessions.  But with the LDP reeling from defeat in Upper House elections in July and worried that Lower House elections may be held within the year, Mr. Kaifu will find it difficult to make even token pledges.  "He won't be able to promise much in his current position," said a senior LDP official.  Nonetheless, trade friction is at the top of the U.S. agenda.  Japan's surplus with the U.S reached $52.1 billion in 1988 and stood at $24.5 billion for the first six months of this year.  Next week U.S. and Japanese officials will meet in Tokyo for the first of a new series of trade talks on ingrained systems that may lie at the root of the trade imbalance.  The so-called Structural Impediments Initiative was agreed to at the July summit between former Prime Minister Sosuke Uno and President Bush as an attempt to get beyond narrow product-related talks.  Mr. Kaifu will reiterate Japan's enthusiasm for the structural talks.  But rather than presenting political initiatives, he is hoping to win the understanding of his hosts for the progress Japan has already made on the economic front.  The economy has shifted from depending predominantly on exports to a greater reliance on domestic demand, and imports are increasing rapidly.  U.S. exports to Japan totaled about $38 billion last year and rose 18% in the first half of this year.  "Structural issues are certainly very important for improving the external balance position . . . but he's going to stress efforts should be made by both sides," says Foreign Ministry official Mitoji Yabunaka.  "These issues aren't such easy ones that we can make a quick fix or a quick result."  Mr. Kaifu will also consult with Mr. Bush on such international issues as relations with the Soviet Union and China and will welcome the U.S. call for closer consultations on global problems such as Third World debt and threats to the environment.  Japan may demonstrate some of the power it can bring to this proposed "global partnership" when Mr. Kaifu visits Mexico next week between his stops in Washington and Canada.  On the eve of his departure from Tokyo, Japan was discussing how to disburse $2.05 billion of new refinancing loans from its Export-Import Bank, and local press reports said Japan was preparing a $1 billion loan to Mexico that Mr. Kaifu may announce during his meetings there.  That loan may be targeted at cleaning up pollution in Mexico City.  Mr. Kaifu will also use the visit to try to personalize the U.S.-Japan relationship.  Foreign Ministry officials hope Americans will simply like the new prime minister, who sports polka-dot ties and has what one official describes as his "young, energetic, accessible and caring personality."  He will begin his U.S. visit with a speech at a dinner for 600 people in San Francisco today, spend tomorrow and Friday in Washington and end his U.S. stay with a dinner with leading academics in Boston and a Sunday Red Sox baseball game.  He'll go to Mexico City next Monday, to Ottawa two days later and back to Tokyo on Sept. 9.  In Kennebunkport, Maine, where Bush is vacationing, national security adviser Brent Scowcroft said the prime minister's visit was part of a longtime tradition.  "It's customary for a new Japanese prime minister to visit Washington to establish a personal relationship with the president," he said.  The two leaders will undertake a "preliminary discussion of the overall economic agenda," he said, adding that issues such as Third World debt and Asian affairs will also be on the table.  Speculative selling knocked the stock market lower on volume that was substantially heavier than in the past two sessions.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 16.73 to 2726.63 as 175,210,000 shares were traded on the New York Stock Exchange, the most since the industrials surged 56.53 points Thursday to a record close.  The average extended its record Monday with a gain of 11.00 in light trading.  U.S. gross national product growth for the second quarter was revised upward a full percentage point to 2.7% yesterday, and inflation measures connected to GNP were revised downward slightly.  The report helped boost investor confidence in many of the so-called cyclical stocks that rise and fall with economic activity.  Among issues in the industrial average, Aluminum Co. of America rose 5/8 to 77, and Bethlehem Steel gained 7/8 to 22 3/4.  The increased strength in second-quarter GNP was linked in part to stepped-up consumer spending.  As a result, Woolworth rose strongly, jumping 2 1/4 to 70 1/4 on 738,700 shares, more than twice its average daily volume.  Another consumer-goods maker, Philip Morris, rose 1 1/4 to 162 3/4.  There was speculation that Philip Morris's board will decide to boost its quarterly dividend at its meeting today.  But in a statement of caution, many institutional investors pulled away from the market yesterday.  "There have been huge, huge gains in the market, and that leaves people wondering how long it can go on," said Joseph McAlinden, managing director at Dillon Read.  The industrials opened lower, and losses were deepened at midday by stock-index arbitrage sell programs.  In this strategy, traders buy futures and sell the underlying stocks to lock in fleeting price differences.  Traders said that at about 1:30 p.m., the sell programs kicked in, and big futures speculators met the arbitrage-related buying with a wave of selling.  The arbitragers, in turn, rushed to sell the underlying stocks.  But buyers were scarce, and the result was a quick tumble in the industrial average to a loss of more than 20 points by midafternoon.  Among broader market averages, the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index fell 2.25 to 349.84, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index fell 0.98 to 194.47.  AMR, the parent of American Airlines, soared 10 1/4 to 91 1/2 in Big Board trading of 3.9 million shares.  People familiar with activity in the stock said the volume was spread among various institutional and speculative accounts, rather than representing a spurt of buying by a single acquirer.  AMR declined to comment, but Morgan Stanley analyst Kevin Murphy said he learned from AMR's management that the company hired Salomon Brothers and Goldman Sachs as advisers.  Mr. Murphy told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report the two firms will investigate possible defensive transactions that would help the company to realize the value of its assets.  UAL, the parent of United Airlines, fell 4 1/2 to 277 1/4 amid rumors that Marvin Davis, a bidder for UAL, had become interested in AMR. However, a spokeswoman for Mr. Davis said he doesn't hold a stake in AMR and isn't interested in making a bid.  Traders said there also was concern that a management-employee buy-out of UAL would be at a lower price than expected.  Among other airline issues, Delta Air Lines climbed 2 1/2 to 83, USAir Group rose 1 3/8 to 52, and Southwest Airlines gained 1 to 28 1/2.  Texas Air, which is considering the sale of all or part of its Continental Airlines unit, gained 5/8 to 22 5/8 in American Stock Exchange trading.  Another Amex stock, Bolar Pharmaceutical, plunged more sharply than any other listed issue in percentage terms.  The generic-drug maker's shares tumbled 6 3/4 to 19 1/2 -- or more than 25% -- on 2.2 million shares after the Food and Drug Administration said it intends to withdraw its approval of one of the company's biggest-selling items, a generic version of the blood-pressure drug Dyazide.  SmithKline Beecham, which makes the brand-name version of Dyazide, went up 1 to 42 3/4 on 1.4 million shares.  The FDA's plans also led to early gains in Mylan Laboratories, which makes a competing medication, but Mylan ended 1/2 lower at 13 3/8 on 1.4 million shares after peaking at 14 7/8.  On Monday, the stock jumped 1 7/8 in heavy trading.  Dividend-related trades continued to boost volume in the two most active Big Board issues: Texas Utilities, which fell 1/8 to 31 3/4 on 7.8 million shares, and Texaco, which rose 1/8 to 49 5/8 on 5.2 million shares.  The utility stock is about due for a quarterly dividend payment, and Texaco is paying a special dividend next month.  Selected gas-pipeline stocks posted gains on favorable comments from Merrill Lynch, which said it plans to increase the weighting of the sector in its model portfolio.  Tenneco rose 1/8 to 61 3/8, Sonat gained 3/8 to 41 3/4, Transco Energy added 3/4 to 49 1/2, Williams Cos. went up 1 3/8 to 41 3/4, and Enron climbed 1 3/8 to 51 3/8.  Canadian Pacific rose 1 1/4 to 23 3/4 on more than 2.9 million shares.  Market sources said the stock received a recommendation from Drexel Burnham Lambert.  Vague takeover speculation boosted First Capital Holdings, which advanced 5/8 to 13 1/8 as 1.7 millon shares changed hands.  The company declined to comment, as did Shearson Lehman Hutton, its largest shareholder, with a 43% stake.  Rumors that Dallas investor Harold Simmons might be increasing his stake in Lockheed sent that stock climbing 2 1/8 to 52 5/8.  Although Mr. Simmons holds about a 9.5% interest in the company, analysts cast doubt on the speculation, noting that a group he leads is currently trying to acquire Georgia Gulf.  Ecolab fell 1/2 to 32 after rallying to 35 3/4 amid rumors that investor Asher Edelman, who is thought to own about 4% of its common, had sold all or part of his interest in Britain's Storehouse and will shift his takeover interest to Ecolab.  Stocks of several other rumored takeover candidates also slumped.  Several arbitragers said there were rumors that S.B. Lewis & Co. was selling some of its arbitrage holdings ahead of next month's scheduled trial of its managing partner, Salim B. Lewis, on stock-manipulation charges.  Among the stocks reportedly involved in the selling were Armstrong World Industries went down 5/8 to 47 1/4; Time Warner, down 2 3/4 to 136 3/4; Warner Communications, down 3/4 to 64 1/4; and Anchor Glass Container, down 1/4 to 20.  Mead rose 1/4 to 45 1/8.  The company agreed to sell its Mead Release Products unit for $38 million to a unit of Britain's Bowater Industries and said it will record a third-quarter gain of about 25 cents a share on the sale.  The American Stock Exchange Index lost 0.73 to 380.94.  Volume was 18,190,000 shares, compared with 10,550,000 Monday.  There were 256 issues advancing, 303 declining and 292 unchanged.  Gundle Environmental Systems fell 1 1/8 to 16 3/4 on word that one of the company's biggest clients, Waste Management, acquired a stake in a competitor.  Waste Management confirmed making the investment but wouldn't elaborate.  KV Pharmaceutical gained 3/4 to 14 7/8.  Burroughs Wellcome, a unit of Wellcome of Britain, agreed to market in the U.S. the company's proposed once-a-day medicine for coughs and colds.  In proxy materials mailed to shareholders, MGM/UA Communications Co. gives details of overtures for all or part of its assets prior to an agreement to sell its United Artists operations to Qintex Australia Ltd. earlier this year.  The final two suitors were Qintex and News Corp.'s Fox Inc., according to the proxy.  Concerns about antitrust problems helped foil the Fox bid.  According to the proxy, a host of other companies expressed interest in acquiring all or part of MGM/UA, including: Weintraub Entertainment Group; Davis Cos.; Polygram N.V.; Walt Disney Co.; MCA Inc. and Gulf & Western Industries Inc., now Paramount Communications Inc., acting jointly; Barris Industries Inc.; Sony Corp.; Cannon Group, now Pathe Communications Inc.; Elizabeth Dickenson Industries; Warner Communications Inc.; C. Itoh & Co.; Gibbons, Green, van Amerongen Limited Partnership; and two directors of the company, Alan Ladd Jr. and David Gerber.  Mr. Ladd was chairman of MGM/UA unit MGM Pictures Inc. and is now chairman of Pathe unit Pathe Entertainment; Mr. Gerber is chief executive officer of the MGM/UA Television Production Group.  The proxy materials also disclose that the new MGM has retained Merrill Lynch Capital Markets to explore the sale of its television production arm and library, with Qintex getting right of first refusal.  The TV operation had been for sale even before United Artists, but the TV auction was overshadowed by the United Artists negotiations, the proxy said.  The asking price is $100 million to $150 million for the unit.  Qintex agreed to acquire MGM/UA for about $1 billion in a transaction in which Kirk Kerkorian's Tracinda Corp., 82% owner of MGM/UA, agreed to repurchase for $250 million the MGM name and logo, the television production arm and library, the 34-title film library of recent MGM movies and MGM's new headquarters in Beverly Hills.  The new MGM would then invest $75 million in Qintex and agree to distribute its films through Qintex.  United Artists would have $75 million at the close of the transaction, so MGM/UA put the effective price at $600 million.  MGM/UA shareholders are set to vote on the Qintex acquisition Sept. 23.  The 1990 Census won't be taken for another seven months, but politicians are already plotting on how they can use the results to gerrymander congressional districts to partisan advantage.  Until now, most critics of this distortion of democracy have been Republicans, since Democrats usually control the redistricting process through their preponderance in state legislatures.  But a Democrat, Rep. Wayne Owens of Utah, is the latest politician to cry foul.  Rep. Owens is the only Democrat in Utah's five-member congressional delegation.  A liberal known for his work on the environment, he won his seat in 1986.  Republicans, frustrated at winning only 41% against Mr. Owens last year, apparently have decided to get out their redistricting pens and draw him out of a job.  Last June, Rep. James Hansen, a Utah Republican, gave a copy of a proposed GOP redistricting plan to a local newspaper.  Currently, Rep. Owens's district includes Salt Lake City and its suburbs.  The GOP plan would shear off much of Mr. Owens's city constituency and shift him out in the countryside, with vast stretches of conservative, rural Utah.  Salt Lake City would no longer have just one Congressman.  When Rep. Owens saw the plan he said, "They've done away with every Democrat but me."  Rep. Hansen admits that in their zeal to end Mr. Owens's career he and other Republicans have even debated whether or not to redistrict the state before the 1990 elections even take place.  Politicians feel free to gerrymander districts into grotesque shapes because they are confident voters will never care about such political "inside baseball."  But in Utah, Rep. Hansen's plan touched off a public uproar.  The Republican National Committee, which supports President Bush's proposal to curb gerrymandering, had to formally deny any role in the Utah plan, which in its most extreme form appears dead.  Still, Richard Snelgrove, Utah's Republican chairman and Rep. Owens's 1988 opponent, defends the practice of gerrymandering.  "The issue should be that of balance," Mr. Snelgrove says.  "The Republican Party is dominant in Utah, and districts ought to be balanced politically."  Nationally, this kind of "political balance" has meant that large sections of the country have been carved up in such a way that elections for the House of Representatives represent a travesty of democracy.  Nearly 99% of House incumbents now win re-election, and 387 out of 435 congressional seats have been held by the same party throughout the 1980s.  Most districts are not gerrymandered, but a significant number of members from large states owe their political survival to a gerrymander.  The most notable case is in California, where the state's 45 districts were aggressively gerrymandered by the late Democratic Rep. Phil Burton.  With the discovery that the gerrymander can bite both major parties, Utah Democrats now want a bipartisan commission to supervise redistricting.  Public reaction to the GOP gerrymander suggests such an idea might pass easily.  Perhaps the outcry over the attempted hijacking of Rep. Owens's seat will convince politicians in other states that voters, if properly informed, will no longer stand for the chicanery of gerrymandering.  Chairman Lloyd Bentsen of the Senate Finance Committee is examining ways to reduce capital gains taxes, increasing the chances that such a cut could be enacted this year.  In a telephone interview yesterday, the Texas Democrat said he intends to ask his tax-writing panel to devise a bill that would raise federal revenues about $8 billion in fiscal 1990, which begins Oct. 1.  That would be enough to meet deficit-reduction targets while extending several soon-to-expire tax breaks, including the credit for research and development expenditures.  As part of the tax package, a cut in the capital gains tax "is one of those things we'll have to take a look at," Sen. Bentsen said, citing President Bush's eagerness to include it.  The Finance Committee chairman specifically praised a possible method of cutting capital gains taxes advanced by the House's top tax-writer, Rep. Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.).  The senator said he is willing to take a "serious look" at an unusual part of Mr. Rostenkowski's proposal that, in certain circumstances, would define the taxable gain on long-held capital assets as a percentage of the price at which the assets are sold.  He also said he is "intrigued" by Mr. Rostenkowski's plan to reduce capital gains taxes to offset the effects of inflation.  Sen. Bentsen said many lawmakers find the Rostenkowski plan deficient because it would apply only to newly acquired assets.  But he noted that it would be difficult to include currently held assets, too, because doing so would substantially increase the long-term cost of such a plan.  "Then the problem is limiting the cost," he said.  Sen. Bentsen's openness to a capital gains tax reduction is significant.  Although the senator said he hasn't made any final decisions, the House appears headed toward enacting a cut in the next few weeks, and that would create pressure for the Senate to take a similar action.  Sen. Bentsen historically has favored reducing capital gains taxes, but he has been cautious recently about pushing the idea.  Currently, capital gains are taxed at the same rate as ordinary income.  The idea of cutting capital gains taxes is attractive to some in Congress because of a fiscal irony: Lowering taxes almost always is politically popular, and cutting capital gains taxes actually would raise revenue -- at least in the short run.  That's because the tax change would instigate a rush of sales of affected assets, such as securities and real estate.  The extra revenue could help the government meet deficit-reduction targets.  Sen. Bentsen said that if he includes a capital gains tax cut in his package, he would try to limit any long-term revenue loss.  He said President Bush's capital gains proposal, which would reduce the top tax rate on long-term gains to 15% by excluding a portion of one's gain from taxes, is too costly.  It would cut federal revenues an estimated $13.3 billion over five years, according to congressional experts.  A plan that incorporates parts of the Rostenkowski proposal would be less costly, Sen. Bentsen asserted.  Rep. Rostenkowski would index capital gains, or remove from taxation that part of a gain that is attributable to inflation.  But taxpayers who sell long-held assets would have another, novel option: For assets sold after being held five years, the taxable gain, as an alternative to inflation adjustment, could be 75% of the price at which the asset is sold.  After 10 years, the taxable gain could be 50% of the sales price.  The alternative would particularly please taxpayers with large gains.  Sen. Bentsen said that it would be difficult to administer a plan that removes inflation from taxable gains.  "I've always been intrigued by the theory of indexing if we could find a practical way of administering it," he said.  But the novel adjustment that utilizes the sales price, he added, is "worthy of consideration."  The senator also indicated that he dislikes elements of another leading capital gains plan in the House offered by Rep. Edgar Jenkins (D., Ga.).  The Jenkins plan, which is backed by a one-vote majority on the House Ways and Means Committee, would lower the top tax rate on gains, through an exclusion, to 19.6% for two years.  The rate would then rise to 28%, the current nominal top tax rate on ordinary income, and the gain attributable to inflation in subsequent years wouldn't be taxed.  "I strongly oppose the idea that you can have the reduction in capital gains for a year and then go back," Sen. Bentsen said.  "That's bad economic policy.  It would have to be a permanent cut if we did it."  Over the next few weeks, Sen. Bentsen's Finance Committee will be rushing to complete a large amount of legislation.  One sticky issue will be overhauling the controversial insurance program that was passed just last year to cover catastrophic illnesses.  Sen. Bentsen said he intends to begin work a week from tomorrow on a bill that would reduce the surtax that helps pay for the multibillion dollar program.  The bill also would cut some of the program's benefits.  He said he hopes to avoid as much as possible increasing a flat premium paid by almost all Medicare beneficiaries, as the Ways and Means Committee already has suggested doing.  The senator said he hopes that by drastically curtailing the program, he will avert a growing movement in Congress to repeal it altogether.  Last year, we twitted the authors of an economics quiz given to high-schoolers for saying that students who thought free markets promoted economic growth were wrong.  The supposed right answer was to "increase investment."  The authors then wrote us to claim that free markets "are neither necessary nor sufficient conditions for inducing economic growth."  We wonder what they think of the AID report mentioned above {see: "REVIEW & OUTLOOK (Editorial): Aiding Poland" -- WSJ Aug. 30, 1989}, which concludes that U.S. foreign aid -- "investment" -- has failed to lift any developing country out of poverty.  AID did find that the degree of economic freedom in 42 poorer countries was the most important single factor in predicting their prosperity.  From 1984 to 1987, per capita income grew 1.9% in countries with greater economic opportunity, was unchanged for those with poor opportunities and fell 1.3% for countries with the most restricted economies.  In other words, free markets are the key to whether a nation pursues poverty or progress.  Southmark Corp. said a Georgia state superior court granted a temporary restraining order prohibiting National Heritage Inc. from proceeding with a restructuring plan without shareholder approval.  Southmark and one of its units own 62.5% of the health-care management concern, but the two companies have been feuding for months.  Indicating that it wants to distance itself from its financially troubled parent, National Heritage has proposed restructuring by spinning off its two business units to shareholders.  Such action has been opposed by Southmark, a real estate and thrift concern that is operating under federal bankruptcy-law protection.  Southmark officials have said they think National Heritage would dilute current shareholders by issuing large numbers of shares to employee stock ownership plans at the spun-off companies.  The restraining order was issued despite an announcement by National Heritage that it had abandoned the employee stock ownership plan opposed by Southmark.  Southmark officials said the 30-day restraining order also prohibits the National Heritage board from several other actions, including changing the company's capitalization, amending its bylaws or taking any action that would affect Southmark's interest in the company.  Southmark has said it intends to seek proxies or shareholder consents to replace National Heritage's board at a National Heritage stockholders meeting scheduled for tomorrow in Dallas.  To replace the board it needs 66% shareholder approval.  "The fate of the company now lies with the outside shareholders," National Heritage Chairman James R. Gilley said.  PASSPORT APPLICANTS living abroad have a harder time hiding from the IRS.  All applicants now must list Social Security numbers and other facts so the IRS can check its records.  It got 73,000 applications filed at embassies and consulates in 1988.  Assuming all came from overseas residents, it studied a sample of 615 and estimated that 59% of those required to file 1987 returns didn't -- about equaling the 61% non-filer rate estimated by the General Accounting Office in 1986.  The IRS focused on the 42% of the group whose ages were 22 to 65 (54% were younger and 4% older).  The IRS had correct addresses for only 30% of those who didn't file 1987 returns but had filed previously.  Only 61% of the applicants gave Social Security numbers; 18% said they weren't required to have numbers, 16% left the space blank, and 5% gave wrong numbers.  Return filers showed lower average taxable income and tax rates than U.S. residents; yet only 18.5% seemed to take legal foreign-income exemptions, and only 6% claimed credits for foreign taxes.  Still, once you have a passport, it is good for 10 years.  SAUDI REFUNDS of social-security tax are fully taxable here, the IRS rules.  The news hits tens of thousands of U.S. construction and other workers who have labored in Saudi Arabia.  That nation removed foreign workers from its compulsory retirement system and is sending them lump sums in lieu of benefits earned or as refunds of social-security taxes paid by or for them.  For long-term workers, the cash may be substantial.  As reported here, the IRS has been mulling over the tax consequences.  Now Revenue Ruling 89-104 says payments into the system were taxes, not pension investments, so the full payout must be included in taxable income when received.  There seems to be no way to spread out the tax or roll over the cash into another pension plan, Patricia Farro of Ernst & Young, CPAs, says.  The ruling treats all workers alike, no matter how they treated the Saudi tax on past returns, she says, but the result is simple and doesn't call for amending any returns.  AN OVERDEVELOPED HOME costs this photographer a business deduction.  Kenneth C. Burkhart Jr. bought and remodeled a three-level Chicago building with an apartment on each floor.  He turned the two upper stories into his home and converted the basement apartment into a studio by removing kitchen, bath, and sleeping rooms and closing its outside entrance.  He had only $675 of photo-business income in 1984 but deducted larger expenses and showed a loss.  Alas, he had exposed himself to the limits on home-office deductions.  The IRS questioned neither the expenses nor Burkhart's use of the basement as his principal place of business.  But it noted that apart from mortgage interest and property taxes, which are deductible anyway, the law didn't permit home-office deductions exceeding income; it limited his deductions for depreciation and utilities to $675.  Burkhart appealed to the Tax Court.  Now Judge Featherston has upheld the IRS.  Burkhart integrated the basement into his home, the judge found.  Had the basement stayed a separate unit, Burkhart would have had a better case.  WE CAN LICK 'EM if we stick 'em with a stamp tax, more states say of drug pushers.  At least 17 -- including Texas, Idaho, Rhode Island, North Carolina and North Dakota in 1989 -- have enacted stamp or other taxes on drug dealers and stiff penalties on those who don't pay.  Texas puts a Grim Reaper image on stamps.  Such a tax is more club than revenue raiser.  Pacesetter Minnesota has collected $802,000 of $29 million in stamp taxes imposed since 1986.  IRS PROBLEM SOLVERS have handled over 9,000 hardship pleas from taxpayers under new rules and have found 6,700 worthy of special aid, such as accelerating refunds or blocking levies or other enforcement actions, IRS Ombudsman Holmes says.  CHARITIES MAY DIAL 202-343-8900 if they are unsure how to value premiums, such as T-shirts, given to donors, who must reduce deductions by the value of anything received in return for gifts.  The IRS will give informal advice on valuation.  LET'S AUTOMATE collections of diverted payroll taxes, the GAO urges.  Employers that don't turn in taxes withheld from employees -- but use the cash, say, to pay other debts -- are major IRS targets.  Ultimately, the IRS tries to recoup its losses, plus interest, by seizing personal assets of responsible officials who willfully fail to remit taxes.  At June 30, 1987, payroll-tax delinquencies were $15.2 billion; the IRS had assessed $5.6 billion against individuals.  But the GAO says the IRS doesn't use its most efficient resource on the debts.  The cases go directly to field agents, bypassing the computerized systems that keep close tabs on other accounts and prompt regular collection attempts by phone.  The systems control collection better and close cases at 25% of the cost of field action, the GAO says.  It recommends a quick switch to the systems and other procedural changes for payroll-tax cases.  The IRS, which has tested such action in two districts, agrees with most of the recommendations.  BRIEFS: Julia D. Gilreath of Corona, Calif., wasn't an employee of her husband's cocaine business, the Tax Court says.  She was a partner and owes self-employment taxes. . . .  IRS Notice 89-95 tells employers how to notify workers on the back of Form W-2 wage statements that they may qualify for the earned-income tax credit.  The Commodity Futures Trading Commission proposed a package of surveillance and record-keeping rules designed to detect and deter many of the trading abuses uncovered by the government's investigations of the Chicago futures markets.  The agency also decided to deploy an experimental task force of CFTC officials in the trading pits to supplement the self-regulatory efforts of the exchanges.  The agency heretofore has never exercised its authority to inspect the floor brokers' trading cards and other records on an exchange floor.  CFTC officials expect the pilot program -- which will start next week in Chicago and New York -- to have "a definite deterrent effect" on trading violations, said Andrea Corcoran, director of the agency's division of trading and markets.  She wouldn't say how many officials will be deployed during day and evening trading hours.  Under the rule proposals adopted unanimously by the commissioners yesterday, futures exchanges would be required to collect trading cards every 30 minutes in order to prevent brokers from altering trades and inserting fictitious trades.  Eventually, this requirement would be tightened to 15 minutes.  The agency also took aim at the illegal practice of trading after the close.  One of its rule proposals would require the exchanges to designate the opening and closing hours for each of their futures and options contracts.  Moreover, exchanges would be required to have their members identify all trades executed at the opening and closing bells.  Their trading cards would have to be collected within five minutes of the close.  The agency also adopted an "interpretation" of CFTC policy that underscored the obligation of floor brokers, traders, exchanges and clearing organizations to maintain complete records of trading errors and unmatched trades, in which prices and amounts don't jibe.  The CFTC reminded the exchanges of their responsibility to monitor these records for trading abuses.  "We don't think what has been done in this area is sufficient," said Ms. Corcoran.  The Justice Department's two-year undercover investigation unearthed a variety of trading and record-keeping tricks that defrauded customers.  Ms. Corcoran pointed out that some Chicago traders and brokers were indicted recently for alleged abuses in connection with the resolution of trading errors and unmatched trades.  The CFTC also proposed that major violators of exchange rules be prohibited from serving on the governing board, arbitration panel or disciplinary committee of an exchange for three years.  The public has 60 days to comment on the package of rule proposals.  These days, William Isaac, former chairman of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., wonders if he would have been wiser to let Continental Illinois National Bank & Trust Co. fail.  Mr. Isaac made the tough decision in 1984 to cover even the biggest deposits in the bank, though the government supposedly insures them only to $100,000.  Scores of thrifts and banks with billions in deposits at Continental might go down too, he feared -- and with them, much of the deposit-insurance system.  As it turned out, most of those banks and thrifts failed anyway, for other reasons.  If he had pulled the plug at Continental Illinois, Mr. Isaac now reasons, the government might have been forced to deal much sooner with the savings-and-loan insurance crisis, saving taxpayers tens of billions of dollars.  Mr. Isaac's second thoughts about the Continental Illinois bailout are part of a new consensus that the nation's deposit-insurance system has run out of control.  Only yesterday, in fact, Lee Hoskins, president of the Federal Reserve Bank of Cleveland, called for cutting back federal deposit insurance, perhaps by limiting coverage to $25,000 per account.  Born in the Depression with the modest aim of protecting Mom and Pop depositors, deposit insurance has grown into a monster that defends major depositors at banks deemed "too big to fail."  Out of fairness, regulators routinely back all deposits at most other banks as well.  Regulatory precedent and policy have rendered meaningless the limit emblazoned in every bank lobby in the country: "Each depositor insured to $100,000."  In practice, the only depositors held by regulators to the $100,000 cutoff are those with their money in certain small institutions that can't be sold.  Thus, deposit insurance now protects the nation's biggest and most sophisticated investors.  And as hundreds of failed thrifts have lately proved, deposit insurance gives bankers the license to bet big, with taxpayers covering the risk.  The Bush administration and Congress failed to address this rock-bottom cause of the thrift crisis in their efforts to get a bailout bill through Congress quickly.  "I'm incredulous that Congress didn't deal in the bailout with one of the fundamental causes of the problem," says Rep. Jim Leach (R., Iowa), who voted against the bill partly because it didn't revise deposit insurance.  Now that the immediate crisis has passed, policy makers are beginning to explore ways of taming the deposit-insurance monster -- all with the intent of reducing the risk faced by the FDIC, which would turn to the taxpayer for any losses it was unable to absorb.  The Treasury Department is directing an 18-month study that will become the basis for any insurance-reform package.  The FDIC is analyzing ways of adjusting the premiums that banks pay into the insurance system according to the industry's fortunes.  Some lawmakers are discussing a proposal to protect individuals -- rather than individual savings accounts -- to a total of $100,000.  Bankers, for their part, are trying to head off new regulations by proposing their own limitations on deposit insurance.  For instance, many support proposals to give depositors a "haircut" -- a 10% or 15% loss on deposits above the $100,000 level -- when a bank fails.  Two of banking's biggest guns, Citicorp Chairman John Reed and Chase Manhattan President Thomas Lebrecque, support variations of this proposal.  Almost everyone agrees that dramatic, fundamental changes -- such as lowering the $100,000 insurance limit or wholly renouncing the "too-big-to-fail" policy -- aren't in the offing.  For one thing, the system has more populist appeal than ever, now that the government has made thrift depositors whole in the savings-and-loan crisis.  "Next to Social Security, deposit insurance is the government program least likely to be changed or tampered with," says William Seidman, the current FDIC chief.  Moreover, the thrift crisis reduced the options for change by vaulting deposit insurance to a new level of political delicacy.  Regulators worry that harsh new restrictions could cause runs.  And the issue is a classic candidate for congressional inaction because it is so complex and involves so many powerful lobbies.  "The inertia of doing nothing predominates," says Rep. Charles Schumer (D., N.Y.), a member of the House Banking Committee.  Mr. Schumer should know, after failing to get the rollback of one small but growing corner of the deposit-insurance system.  Bank regulators now openly extend insurance to long-term pension fund deposits -- in amounts up to $100,000 times the number of beneficiaries in the pension fund.  Already, some $3 billion of deposits in these so-called Bank Investment Contracts, or BICs, are backed by the full faith and credit of the U.S. Offering this protection to institutional investors will help banks grab even more of the $150 billion market for pension-fund deposits currently dominated by insurance companies.  With banks now holding $2.3 trillion in deposits, tossing in another $150 billion would hardly imperil the financial system.  But Mr. Schumer worries that the failure of his efforts to roll back such protections means Congress isn't ready to adopt meaningful changes.  For all its reluctance to address the issue, Congress could be forced to take up deposit insurance as early as next year, when large banks attempt another attack on the Glass-Steagall Act, which restricts them from the securities business.  With radical changes highly unlikely, specialists already are exploring politically palatable ways of revising the system.  Academics, lawmakers and industry officials are studying ways to encourage "depositor discipline," such as exposing a small percentage of deposits over $100,000 to the threat of loss.  This, the theory goes, would force depositors to make judgments about the soundness of their banks.  "The debate is fundamentally divided between people who think depositor discipline is a good idea and those who think it's a waste of time," says Robert Litan, a Brookings Institution scholar.  The FDIC's Mr. Seidman, for one, puts himself in the latter category.  "We have a hard enough time figuring out a bank's financial condition.  I don't see how you can expect a depositor to do it," he says.  Many specialists argue not for fiddling with deposit insurance, but for making banking practices safer to begin with.  Brookings's Mr. Litan and others would force banks to carry assets at market value.  This, they say, would make regulators less apt to find that an institution reporting a slight insolvency is actually billions in the hole -- as was true in some of the worst thrift cases.  The U.S. could also better afford to maintain the current liberal insurance system if regulators were forced by law to shut down institutions when they become insolvent, rather than letting them accumulate more red ink.  While these proposals have some support in Congress, they face tough opposition from the industry.  "Bankers aren't worried about market-value accounting; they're freaked out about it," Mr. Litan says.  Concedes James McLaughlin, a top official of the American Bankers Association: "I don't think you'll see the industry proposing those ideas or supporting them."  Mr. Isaac, the former FDIC chief, backs the idea of a 15% "haircut" for big depositors.  In any case, he says, the current system of making good on every deposit will only lead to more failures.  "We need to have an alternative that is less draconian than paying off the insured accounts and letting everybody else -- and maybe a chunk of the U.S. financial system -- twist in the wind," he says.  First Security Corp. adopted a shareholder-rights plan aimed at thwarting unwanted takeovers.  The Salt Lake City financial-services concern said it declared a dividend of one preferred share purchase right for each First Security common share held.  The rights give holders the opportunity to purchase additional equity interests in the company at a big discount under certain conditions.  First Security said the distribution will be made effective Sept. 8 to stock of record the same date.  The rights expire in 10 years and are redeemable by the company anytime.  First Security said the action wasn't in response to any "immediate concern" about a takeover.  Varian Associates Inc. said certain of its employees would be among those subpoenaed to testify before a federal grand jury in Chicago as part of an apparently escalating Justice Department antitrust investigation of the electronic tube market.  Last spring the Justice Department, as part of a civil investigation, requested documents from several companies in the $500-million-a-year power grid tube industry, which supplies tubes for television and radio transmission.  The investigation has been mildly controversial because the market had been abandoned by many competitors in the shift to transistors during the 1960s, and some of the current participants felt they were being targeted for having kept it alive.  Varian, a diversified high-technology concern, said it also received a request to supply documents to the grand jury earlier this month.  It said it would comply by the end of next month.  "We are not aware of the specific concern of the Department of Justice which would require a grand jury investigation," said Thomas Sege, Varian's chairman.  Varian didn't identify the employees scheduled to be subpoenaed.  Public Service Co. of Colorado said it ended electric production at its Fort St. Vrain nuclear generating station earlier than expected.  PS Colorado said it made the decision based on the financial impact of an anticipated lengthy outage associated with a problem at the plant, which is 35 miles north of here.  In December, the electric and natural gas utility said it would end operations at the plant no later than June 30, 1990, and begin defueling and decommissioning.  The decision to terminate operations will have no "material financial" impact on the company, although some layoffs are expected during the next year, PS Colorado said.  AMR'S STOCK SOARED $10.25 to $91.50 on speculation that the American Airlines parent may become the next airline takeover target.  The company is said to have engaged Goldman Sachs and Salomon to help defend it against unwanted overtures.  Other airline issues also gained.  Separately, Pan Am said it hasn't decided whether to propose buying Texas Air's Continental Airlines.  ---  Eastern Air intends to revamp its reorganization plan due to an inability to sell enough assets.  The Texas Air unit could wind up $400 million short of its cash target, perhaps forcing the parent to shoulder more costs.  ---  The economy grew in the second quarter at a 2.7% annual rate, far faster than the government first reported.  The revision confirms that an imminent recession is unlikely, economists say.  Corporate profits declined in the period, while sales of new single-family homes shot up in July.  ---  Bentsen is examining ways to reduce capital-gains taxes.  The Senate finance chairman's openness to the idea increases the chance that a reduction could be enacted this year.  ---  One of KKR's founders sued the other two, alleging they illegally reduced his stake in four companies bought by the buy-out firm.  The case threatens to strip the partnership of some of its financial secrecy.  ---  Hog prices soared on the possibility that the government would ship much of the nation's supply of frozen pork bellies to Poland as food aid.  ---  OPEC's oil output has jumped again, to its highest level this year and near the point that caused prices to plunge last fall.  But oil markets appear to be absorbing the extra production, holding prices steady.  ---  Stocks and the dollar declined, while bond prices rose modestly.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average dropped 16.73 to close at 2726.63.  ---  The SEC is scrutinizing the way "government-plus" bond funds have been marketed.  The funds have taken in more than $50 billion from investors, but their use of options backfired, hurting overall returns.  ---  Traders named by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange in an alleged $1 million trading scheme offered to settle the disciplinary charges.  U.S. commodity regulators proposed surveillance and record-keeping rules to detect trading abuses uncovered by recent government probes.  ---  Stellar Computer and Ardent Computer plan to merge to save money, illustrating the increasingly tough environment for computer start-ups.  ---  Leading department stores say their newspaper advertising spending will be flat this fall, disappointing publishers who have been hurt by a slowdown in retail ad expenditures.  ---  Italy's largest state-owned bank said its Atlanta branch has been involved in a scandal involving letters of credit for export to Iraq.  ---  Corporate acquisitions numbered 1,365 in the first six months of the year, up 22% from a year earlier.  ---  Yields on CDs continued their slow climb in the past week, but remain well below their late-April highs.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 175,210,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2726.63, off 16.73; transportation 1506.58, up 13.69; utilities 217.74, off 1.20.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3282.31, up 10.66.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.54, off 0.55; spot index 129.99, off 0.37.  Dollar: 142.95 yen, off 1.60; 1.9360 marks, off 0.0273.  Trucker Wilbert Fuselier and 45,000 pounds of coffee are headed down Louisiana's Interstate 10 when -- boom -- a shattering jolt throws his rotund body upward and slams his head up into the top of his cab.  Five similar jolts hit the white and red 18-wheeler in quick succession as Mr. Fuselier, a driver for Saia Motor Freight Line of Houma, bumps along a 12-mile stretch where alligators sometimes float within view.  But he is a veteran of I-10, and he is prepared.  On the ceiling of his cab Mr. Fuselier has installed an inch-thick strip of red foam rubber padding.  Everyone with a car knows that the interstate highway system has a pothole problem.  In fact, it's a whole lot worse than that.  This vast public-works project -- by some reckonings the biggest such project in history -- is literally falling to pieces.  And the money it would take to fix it simply doesn't exist.  The Federal Highway Administration, which now spends about $13 billion a year on repairs and construction, figures that bringing the roads up to "minimum engineering standards" would cost a stunning $565 billion to $655 billion over the next 20 years.  For comparison, the huge bailout of the nation's failed savings and loans, perhaps the biggest financial debacle in history, is expected to cost about $166 billion.  As part of its smoke-and-mirrors act to make the budget deficit smaller, Congress doesn't even want to spend the surplus money built up in the federal highway fund.  So, except for some piecemeal -- and, critics say, mostly pork-barrel -- projects, little is being done to arrest the highway system's decline.  What's more, some of the repair projects under way are being bungled, causing even more problems.  This is no mere nuisance; some economists consider it a threat to the nation's productivity as the U.S. relies ever more heavily on highways to move its goods.  David Aschauer of the Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago goes so far as to argue that highway deterioration is "a root cause of the decline of American competitiveness."  The two trillion miles that Americans annually travel by car, truck, bus and mass transit is expected to double in three decades.  And increasingly, this travel is economic in nature.  Low trucking costs have persuaded companies to entrust more than 75% of their freight to the highways, up from two-thirds in the 1960s.  They do so assuming the roads will get it there in time.  What can happen instead is a hangup such as Rocky Smith ran into, as the independent hauler was traversing Chicago with a load of machinery that just had to get to a factory by morning.  "There was this truck in front of me carrying giant steel coils, and potholes all over the place," he remembers.  "This guy swerves all of a sudden to avoid a big hole."  He hit it anyway.  "The coils go bouncing off the truck onto the highway, and the truck almost jackknifes," Mr. Smith recalls.  "We sat there in traffic for two hours while they cleaned up the mess.  I couldn't make the schedule."  The irony is that the sprawling interstate system is crumbling just as it finally nears completion.  President Eisenhower launched it in 1956, envisioning a time when the nation's resources -- or armies -- could move swiftly about much as the Germans could along the Autobahn in World War II. Now, the 42,798-mile system is only 794 miles and three years from its goal.  But its planners designed the roads to last just 20 years, the best they could do with the technology at the time.  And that figure was only good at one-third current traffic levels.  "You can't build these roads and expect them to last forever," shouts engineer Albert Alberts as cars whiz past him only two feet away.  Clad in tie, white hard hat and work boots, he is walking the construction site that is the last unrestored mile of Pennsylvania's Schuylkill Expressway.  "Sooner or not much later, every major city in the country is going to have to rebuild their interstates like this," Mr. Alberts claims.  If so, the $225 million Schuylkill project may offer a glimpse of the future.  It is not an appealing prospect.  Running 18 miles from the Pennsylvania Turnpike through the affluent Main Line suburbs and into Philadelphia, the Schuylkill is one of the busiest stretches of highway in the country, at its peak carrying three times the 48,000 cars a day it was designed for.  The potholes, cracks and buckled pavement "had gotten so bad you had to drive 45 {miles per hour} or less if you didn't want to rattle yourself to death," says Mr. Alberts.  Locals took to calling it the "Sure Kill."  Now, motorists are trading one kind of disruption for another.  Crumbled piles of discarded concrete sit among neat rows of new plastic-coated steel supporting rods ready for use in new paving.  A sunburnt man resembling a fly fisher stands knee deep in green goo spraying artificial filler with a large hose.  The passing trucks combine with the construction work to send dark clouds of dust into the sky.  "It's not so bad, if it weren't for all the traffic getting in the way," foreman Robert Layton yells over the sound of jackhammers and car engines.  Motorists no doubt would say the same about him.  Reconstruction, now in its fourth and final year, cut traffic volume by 50% and often caused delays ranging up to 30 minutes.  Stretching back to the horizon, cars wait their turn at the one lane left open.  The disruption might have been less severe, some suggest, if not for the kind of mismanagement and poor workmanship that have dogged many federal highway projects.  In 1986, for instance, the state department of transportation removed a major contractor from the project, charging it was months behind schedule.  The affair delayed completion of the project by a year, and isn't over yet: The contractor is suing the state.  The state, in turn, has hired a construction consultant solely to guard against irregularities and further delays in the project.  Trucking companies, which pay special federal taxes to help fix the roads, have long been the most vocal lobby for more federal spending on highways.  Experts say, however, that their extra tax assessment doesn't come close to compensating for what the big rigs do to roads.  The Transportation Department estimates that a single 80,000-pound truck does as much damage to an interstate as 9,600 cars.  While the truckers haven't proposed raising their own contribution, they are increasingly being joined in their lobbying for more spending by other parts of American business, especially manufacturers.  Some manufacturers in recent years have sought to curb costs by keeping their inventories of materials low.  Such "just-in-time" production schedules require precise delivery schedules that the failing highway system is taking a toll on.  Robert Cowie, a vice president of Dana Corp., an Ohio maker of engine and transmission parts, says that "we're already beginning to experience highway delays here in Toledo.  But the only way you can ship reliably and get deliveries on time is by truck.  That means you've got to have good roads."  Richard Dines, transportation director for Latrobe Brewing Co., maker of Rolling Rock beer, says the poor highway conditions in eastern Pennsylvania amount to a kind of hidden tax.  "We've got weight restrictions on some roads, which limit how much we can ship," he complains.  "We've got the wear and tear on the trucks.  Worst of all are the delays from potholes, traffic and construction.  This costs us profits, because the truck and driver are just sitting there in traffic for an hour and a half, not moving, eating up wages and gas."  The Federal Highway Administration estimates that truck costs shoot up by 6.3 cents a mile when road conditions drop from "good" to "fair," or "barely tolerable for high-speed traffic."  Economists at the Department of Transportation have also tried quantifying the costs.  They calculate that if the highways are allowed to continue deteriorating, the economy by 1995 will have missed out on increases of 3.2% in GNP, 5.9% in disposable income, 2.2% in employment and 2.7% in manufacturing productivity.  That would come as no surprise to planners who can't expand operations in Plaquemine, La., home to Dow Chemical, Occidental Petroleum, Georgia Gulf and Copolymer Rubber & Chemical plants.  The roads there just can't accommodate the increased truck traffic that bigger plants would call for.  "It's very constricting," says Dwayne Smartt, senior production planner at the Dow plant, which ships 30 trucks of chemicals a day.  "People down here are very frustrated."  So is Glenn Victor, a bus driver of 45 years' experience.  Waiting for his passengers outside Washington, D.C.'s Air and Space Museum, the veteran driver agrees that the highways "have gone to hell."  Mr. Victor has just traveled from New York down I-95 and is walking around the bus to look for any damage.  "It was so bad sometimes I had to drive with the bus halfway on the shoulder," he says.  Gesturing toward the nearby Capitol building, he asks, "What's going on over there?"  Congressmen sitting in Rayburn House Office Building 2358 -- the appropriations subcommittee on transportation -- could provide the answer.  This particular day, a long line of lobbyists and observers waits in the hall outside the committee room to no avail: The panel has voted to close its meeting to the public, and now is in the process of negotiating which projects get funded and which ones don't.  It is a process, many say, that is governed more by politics than by practical considerations.  A big chunk of money that has already been earmarked for road spending doesn't get spent, for example, because keeping it in the government bank account makes the budget deficit smaller.  The Highway Trust Fund, which collects gasoline taxes and other user fees to pay for federal highway work, currently boasts an unspent cash balance of more than $14.5 billion.  "That money should be put to use maintaining highways and making them safer, instead of letting it sit there gaining interest . . .," argues Henry Jasny of the Center for Auto Safety, a Nader-affiliated watchdog group.  President Bush's Transportation secretary, Samuel Skinner, is working on his own highway repair plan, but it is still in the information-gathering phase and department officials haven't been willing to comment on it.  With the money Congress is willing to allot to road repair limited to even less than the highway fund takes in in a year, politicians have spent the last decade fighting over "demonstration projects" that funnel money out of the highway fund to specific undertakings.  Federal highway administrators oppose these tactics because they bypass the standard system of allocating money, a formula based on a state's area, population, and highway mileage.  Other critics, notably the Highway Users Federation and the American Trucking Associations, charge that such projects represent unfocused federal policy and detract attention from the larger problem of crumbling highways.  "What we've got is the triumph of parochial interests that push and shake and push and shake to get special favors," says Robert Farris, a former head of the highway administration.  Nevertheless, congressmen managed to slip 157 of these projects into the last highway authorization bill -- to the tune of $1.4 billion.  Pennsylvania, with two members on the House Appropriations transportation subcommittee and others on the full House and Senate bodies, landed 12 such projects, compared with just three for New Jersey and seven for New York.  Often, such projects are the result of legislative log-rolling: For instance, Pennsylvania Democratic Rep. John Murtha won $13.7 million for a 5.1-mile relocation of U.S. 219 in his district in return for his defense subcommittee's support for $300 million for the Coast Guard.  His district boasts another project as well, a 1.3-mile access road enabling tourists to visit the Johnstown Flood National Memorial.  "There's nothing wrong about it," says an aide to the congressman.  "We're trying to fund projects for the welfare of our constituents."  ---  @ Where the Potholes Are  @ States with the highest percentages of Interstate Highway miles deemed "deficient"  @ Alaska 41.8%  @ Missouri 40.0%  @ Mississippi 39.2%  @ Tennessee 36.3%  @ Oregon 35.2%  @ North Dakota 25.4%  @ District of Columbia 25.0%  @ Wisconsin 24.7%  @ Rhode Island 24.3%  @ Oklahoma 23.6%  @ Source: Federal Highway Administration  Vermont American Corp., Louisville, Ky., said Robert I. Baker, president and chief executive officer, resigned as director so that he could pursue a management buy-out of the company.  The maker of consumer and industrial tools said Mr. Baker told the board he, along with other senior officers, would attempt to form a proposal to acquire the company.  As result, Mr. Baker said he resigned to avoid any appearance of conflict of interest, Vermont American said.  Mr. Baker will continue as president and chief executive and assist the board in soliciting other acquisition proposals, the company said.  Vermont American, which put itself on the block earlier this month, said last week that a "number of parties" expressed interest in making an acquisition proposal and that it would provide data to them.  It didn't identify the concerns.  WHO'S NEWS: Allan E. Gotlieb, former Canadian ambassador to the U.S., joined Young & Rubicam Inc.'s Burson-Marsteller, a public relations and communications company, as a senior adviser.  Unicorp Canada Corp. and Cara Operations Ltd. raised their offer for Dunkin' Donuts Inc. to $45 a share from $43, giving it a total indicated value of $268 million.  The two said they have waived financing conditions, but that the offer still depends on 50.1% of the shares being tendered and on the redemption or invalidation of the Randolph, Mass.-based doughnut chain's poison-pill rights.  The two are seeking to overturn those takeover defenses through a lawsuit scheduled to proceed Sept. 11 in the Delaware Court of Chancery.  Legal proceedings are to begin Sept. 11.  Unicorp, a holding company with interests in financial services and oil and gas, and Cara, a food services concern, said their offer expires Sept. 15.  Dunkin' Donuts said its board will meet with legal and financial advisers to evaluate the revised offer.  And it urged holders to defer a decision on tendering shares until it makes its recommendation.  Barry Ziegler, CL Global Partners Securities Corp. analyst in New York, estimates the chain's market price at $43 to $46 a share.  He termed the bid "fair."  When the owner of a Colorado ski resort defaulted on loans from the Small Business Administration in the early 1980s, agency officials tried to run the business themselves.  The result: The SBA lost more money.  The SBA's move into the resort business highlights the growing problems of its program to help finance "small business investment companies" -- ventures that are considered too small to attract private venture capital.  A total of 170 SBIC's, or more than a quarter of all such companies, are now in liquidation proceedings.  They owe the SBA at least $369 million.  While such businesses by nature are risky, the number of failures has surged from about 16 companies a year in the early 1980s to 26 in 1986, 38 in 1987 and 26 in 1988.  In addition to the ski resort, some of the companies' failed investments include office buildings, shopping malls and a cable-television station.  In the ski-resort case, the SBA says it took the unusual step of deciding to operate the failed business because it couldn't find any buyers and because it was overwhelmed with the task of liquidating so many companies.  But the SBA's inspector general said in a recent audit that the agency violated federal rules when it tried to run the business itself.  The report also cited agency officials for possible conflicts of interest and poor record-keeping.  No criminal activity has been alleged.  But SBA head Susan Engeleiter has appointed a management task force to review the case, and to find the reason for the growing number of SBIC failures.  "Anytime the government is the lender of last resort, or involved in backing the private sector, there's an inherent risk," says Katherine Bulow, the SBA's deputy administrator and head of the management team looking into the case.  "We sometimes end up with property and we're not as sanguine at disposing of it as the private sector."  The officials criticized by the auditors blame their problems in managing the liquidation on a lack of staff.  Ms. Bulow says there are six professional staffers handling SBIC liquidations, and an additional 12 who work at times under contract.  Those people are aided by several more SBA lawyers, she says.  Congressional officials say the SBA, which faced budget cutbacks and threats of outright elimination during the Reagan administration, is understaffed, particularly in its loan-liquidation offices.  "When an agency is short on staff, the shortfall affects departments where nobody yells," says one Capitol Hill staffer familiar with the agency.  "In loan liquidation, nobody yells until you start seeing losses.  SBA's liquidation people may have 10 times more work than bank loan officials."  The investment-company program has been the target of both praise and condemnation over the years.  Some of the companies backed by the program -- including Apple Computer Co. and Federal Express Corp. -- have been outstandingly successful.  But critics also have dubbed it "food stamps for the rich" and an "evergreen money tree" because some of its dollars ended up backing pornographic theaters and rock-concert promoters in the early 1980s.  To be licensed as an SBIC, investors need $1 million in private capital.  They then can borrow as much as four times that amount from the agency.  They can renew their debentures or loan commitments.  The result, says one official, can be continuous, rolling loans that last until a company's investments run into trouble.  The Conquistador ski resort in Westcliffe, Colo., was owned by Royal Business Funds Corp., New York.  After the company defaulted on its loans in 1982 -- owing the SBA $23 million, including interest -- the agency was faced with the task of liquidating the company's assets.  Besides the ski resort, these included undeveloped land in Florida and an apartment complex in Ithaca, N.Y.  The SBA set up a separate company, EWE Properties Ltd., to liquidate the Royal Business assets.  When EWE was unable to sell the ski resort, it spent about $10 million to operate and improve it.  Agency officials say the idea was to maintain the property's value until a buyer could be found.  But the inspector general's report said federal rules prohibit a corporation from acting for a government agency.  The auditors also said SBA officials should have sold the various properties "as is."  The resort, which was closed last year, still hasn't been sold.  The auditors say the SBA eventually may lose between $11 million and $15 million on the Royal Business failure.  The audit also showed that records for some major transactions are missing or incomplete, although no funds were missing.  The auditors also questioned EWE's hiring of several consultants, one of whom was an acquaintance of an SBA employee involved in EWE.  The SBA officials involved have reacted angrily to the auditors' report, arguing that the head of the SBA has broad authority to take such action and that they were working to settle the matter to the agency's advantage.  "This is a case of Monday morning quarterbacking," Charles Hertzberg, SBA's deputy associate administrator for financial assistance, wrote in his reply to the auditors.  The Treasury plans to raise $350 million in new cash with the sale Tuesday of about $14.4 billion in short-term bills to redeem $14.06 billion in maturing bills.  The offering will be divided evenly between 13-week and 26-week bills maturing on Dec. 7, 1989, and March 8, 1990, respectively.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum $10,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Tuesday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  Separately, the Treasury plans to raise $4 billion in new cash with the sale next Wednesday of about $4 billion in eight-day cash management bills.  The offering will mature on Sept. 14.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum $1,000,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT next Wednesday at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  Peter Ueberroth moved a step closer to getting an airline.  HAL Inc., parent of island-hopping Hawaiian Airlines, said it reached a definitive agreement with a company headed by the former baseball commissioner and an associate to purchase a majority stake in HAL.  Terms call for the Ueberroth group to offer $22 a share, or about $21.9 million, for 51% of HAL.  The agreement is still subject to the obtaining of financing and to approval by regulators, shareholders and unions.  HAL said shareholders of record Sept. 5 will consider the proposal at a special meeting here Oct. 19.  Earlier this year, Mr. Ueberroth was frustrated in an attempt to acquire Texas Air Corp.'s Eastern Airlines.  HAL, meanwhile, has been frustrated by losses that widened to $13 million in the first half from $2 million a year earlier.  Oil production by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries has taken another jump.  With a pivotal meeting of the oil ministers only three weeks away, OPEC production has risen to its highest level so far this year.  It's also nearing the level that caused oil prices to plunge last fall, according to the outside firms that track OPEC's output.  But, for the moment, oil markets still appear to be absorbing the excess OPEC production with prices of the world's crudes holding around $4 a barrel higher than those of a year ago.  In fact, prices increased yesterday on European spot markets.  They were up 10 cents to 15 cents a barrel, leaving North Sea crudes valued at around $17 a barrel.  But in U.S. futures trading, prices were flat to down.  West Texas Intermediate crude for October delivery was unchanged for the day, settling at $18.64 a barrel on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  OPEC's production has been surging since a June ministerial meeting agreed on an offical second-half output ceiling of 19.5 million barrels a day.  Actual output is seldom within the ceiling, but had been expected to hold below the 21 million barrels a day of the second quarter.  Instead, it has moved higher.  Although estimates vary widely, leading monitors of OPEC's output measured July production at 21.3 million to 21.5 million barrels a day.  Now, most estimates for August are showing a jump of some 300,000 barrels a day beyond the July level.  August output will average "fractionally under 22 million," said Conrad Gerber, president of Petro-Logistics Ltd. of Geneva.  OPEC production followed a similar pattern last year -- with a second-half surge -- but it didn't reach 22 million barrels a day until October.  That same month, falling prices of crude bottomed for the year, with West Texas Intermediate below $13 a barrel.  OPEC output didn't reach its 1988 peak of 23 million barrels a day until December.  Few in the industry expect production to get that high this year if Saudi Arabia, the OPEC kingpin, continues to abide by its quota.  But there is little evidence of any slowdown in this year's rise in production, although Kuwait, a major quota violator, has reduced its output some.  "September production looks similar to August, perhaps a little higher," said Cristina Haus, an analyst who follows OPEC output for OPEC Listener, an oil-industry analysis service.  She estimates August output at 21.6 million to 21.7 million barrels a day.  Her estimate doesn't include some 300,000 barrels a day of Iraq's production that's being used to fill an export pipeline that isn't open yet.  Next month's meeting of the oil ministers is intended to adjust the production ceiling for the fourth quarter, probably by raising it to a more realistic level of 20 million or 20.5 million barrels a day.  Still, some oil ministers are concerned about the current output level.  The oil ministers of Algeria and Libya yesterday announced plans to step up contacts with others in OPEC regarding "the danger threatening the unity and solidarity of the organization" from the current high production.  However, the excess production doesn't seem to be causing much of a problem for the oil markets so far.  Those who track OPEC production say there are buyers for the oil and that very little of it seems to be going into producer-owned storage.  "If it were a really big surplus, we would see it stacking up in tankers, and there are no indications of that," said Edward N. Krapels, president of Energy Security Analysis, a Washington firm that monitors oil supplies world-wide.  Still, he said, the high OPEC output is likely to lead to "an increase in stock levels which could create a difficult situation."  The average interest rate rose to 8.675% at Citicorp's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, from 8.6647% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $600 million were submitted.  Accepted bids ranged from 8.67% to 8.68%.  Citicorp said that the average rate rose to 8.491% at its $50 million auction of 182-day commercial paper from 8.4557% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $555 million were submitted for the 182-day paper.  Accepted bids ranged from 8.49% to 8.492%.  The bank holding company will auction another $50 million of each maturity next Tuesday.  The Environmental Protection Agency, citing an irreplaceable loss of a prized trout stream and fishery habitat, moved a step closer to killing the Two Forks dam project proposed outside of water-starved Denver.  Lee Dehihns, a regional EPA official on special assignment in Denver, proposed that the $550 million dam and reservoir project on the South Platte River be prohibited or restricted because of "unacceptable and avoidable environmental impacts."  The proposal is a vital step in the process triggered by EPA Administrator William Reilly in March, when he delighted environmentalists and stunned Western lawmakers and conservative groups by initiating a special review of the project.  In the past, the rarely used special reviews have ultimately ended in the veto of water projects.  Public comments on the Two Forks proposal will be accepted until Nov. 17, and Mr. Dehihns is expected to make his final recommendation by the end of the year.  The final decision on whether to veto the dam must be made by the EPA's Washington headquarters.  Denver officials warn that rejection of the dam may force Denver suburbs to curb growth and cause agricultural lands to dry up.  But Mr. Dehihns said more emphasis should be given to groundwater supplies, conservation and alternative projects.  He said a scaled-down dam hasn't been ruled out.  Banca Nazionale del Lavoro, Italy's largest state-owned bank, said its U.S. branch has been involved in a financial scandal regarding letters of credit for exports to Iraq.  Banca Nazionale, based in Rome, said it doesn't expect to report any losses.  Representatives at the branch, in Atlanta, declined to comment.  The announcement is the latest disclosure in a bizarre tale that began to emerge two weeks ago.  Few of the parties involved are willing to discuss the affair -- but all are quick to point the finger at one another when asked who will bear the brunt of any losses.  On Aug. 17, Banca Nazionale said it was under investigation by U.S. and Italian banking authorities for "unauthorized transactions" by its Atlanta branch.  The bank yesterday said it couldn't immediately determine how much money was involved, but it said the funds were guaranteed by either the Iraqi central bank or the U.S. Commodity Credit Corp.  Commodity Credit Corp., a lending arm of the Agriculture Department, has $1.75 billion in export-credit guarantees to Iraq outstanding under two credit-guarantee programs designed to boost U.S. farm exports.  Transactions involving Banca Nazionale amount to "probably less than half of CCC's total exposure," said Kelly Shipp, spokeswoman for Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter.  But she added that it could prove to be much less than half.  Department officials said they are cooperating with the Federal Reserve System and other agencies in investigating the matter.  A Banca Nazionale spokesman said the bank's own internal investigation had turned up as many as 2,500 transactions in the Atlanta branch that hadn't been authorized by the bank's North American management or by the head office in Rome.  The transactions apparently took place between August 1988 and the beginning of this month, when they were first discovered, the spokesman said.  Although the bank declined to specify how the fraud was perpetrated or who was involved, the spokesman said the internal investigation has been complicated by the sophisticated methods used to keep the transactions off the official books.  The bank spokesman said the total value of the unauthorized letters of credit wouldn't be known until the internal investigation is completed, but he emphasized that the bank "doesn't foresee any losses" because the letters of credit are guaranteed.  In Washington, however, Agriculture Department officials said they don't expect Commodity Credit Corp. to be liable for any part of losses that might result from the Iraqi transactions.  "I don't believe there is any danger the Commodity Credit Corp. is going to take a hit on this," said one senior official, who asked not to be identified.  Added Ms. Shipp: "The program doesn't guarantee payment in the event of fraud on the part of the exporter or the bank."  In Atlanta, banking regulators and law-enforcement authorities declined to comment on the case.  They also declined to say whether or not the local branch of the bank was under investigation.  The letters of credit were issued for the export of agricultural products, machinery and industrial plans by U.S., European and Italian companies under contracts authorized by Iraqi ministers.  In recent years, Iraq has been one of the leading recipients of U.S. export-credit guarantees, averaging about $1 billion a year.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it affirmed its triple-A ratings on long-term debt of the Federal Home Loan Banks.  The ratings agency said it had reviewed its ratings as a result of the recent federal savings and loan legislation.  Moody's said it had been concerned that the bailout of the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. would weaken the financial standing of the Home Loan banks.  The legislation does earmark Home Loan Bank retained earnings and some future earnings to help meet interest expenses on bonds to be issued by the new agencies created to handle failed thrifts.  But Moody's said it believes the Home Loan banks will "remain amply capitalized and very profitable."  Moody's rates debt on eight of the 12 Federal Home Loan Banks, which help provide liquidity to the savings industry.  A legal dispute among the founding partners of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. threatens to subvert part of the leveraged buy-out firm's financial secrecy.  The dispute stems from complaints by Jerome Kohlberg Jr., who helped found KKR in 1976 but left its management in 1987, that the firm's current controlling partners, Henry Kravis and George Roberts, have illegally reduced his stake in four companies KKR bought between 1979 and 1985.  Mr. Kohlberg, 63 years old, sued Messrs.  Kravis and Roberts, KKR and one of its affiliated partnerships Aug. 22 in state court in Manhattan, alleging that the defendants had breached their fiduciary duty to Mr. Kohlberg and had breached the contract under which he left the firm.  According to the suit, Mr. Kohlberg has retained a partnership interest in KKR, interests in all the companies KKR acquired before 1987, and the right to buy specified stakes in all KKR transactions through 1995.  The four companies are Marley Co.; Pacific Realty Associates Limited Partnership; M&T Inc.; and Idex Corp., which owns six former units of Houdaille Industries Inc. KKR paid a total of nearly $900 million for the companies.  The current value of the companies isn't known, but the values of most companies acquired by KKR have escalated sharply within a few years after their acquisition.  Mr. Kohlberg's original stakes in these four companies ranged from 26% to 37%, but those stakes have been reduced to 17.6% because of various recapitalizations arranged by KKR after Mr. Kohlberg left the firm's management, the suit alleges.  For his stakes in the four companies, Mr. Kohlberg paid a total of $763,364, the suit says.  The suit, to which KKR hasn't yet responded in court, seeks a court order forcing KKR to increase Mr. Kohlberg's stake in the four companies by an unspecified amount.  A spokesman for KKR said, "We are saddened that Mr. Kohlberg felt it necessary to sue his partners and KKR.  We believe he is wrong both as to the facts and his interpretation of the agreement between us, and we fully expect to prevail in court."  A spokesman for Mr. Kohlberg declined to comment.  Regardless of the suit's outcome, it is likely to shed more light on the internal workings of KKR than any of the multibillion-dollar acquisitions the firm has arranged in the past few years.  Although it was known Mr. Kohlberg retained a limited partnership interest in KKR, it wasn't known he is able to buy into KKR's future transactions.  According to his suit, he was able to buy a 20.5% stake in KKR's 1987 deals, a 17.6% stake in its 1988 deals, and a 14.6% stake in its deals this year.  The permitted stakes decline to 7% in 1995.  The figures indicate that Mr. Kohlberg could own 14.6% of KKR's equity in the buy-out of RJR Nabsico Inc., completed this year for $25 billion.  Of the three founding partners, Mr. Kohlberg has been the most publicity-shy.  And even Mr. Kravis, a visible member of New York's charity-ball social scene, has closely guarded any information on KKR's profits and how they are divided.  The litigation also could provide a more public airing of the reasons for Mr. Kohlberg's departure from KKR's management.  The suit itself, however, says only that "in 1986 and 1987, differences in operating philosophy arose between Kohlberg on the one hand and Kravis and Roberts on the other.  It was agreed that Kohlberg would change his relationship with KKR and KKR Associates {an affiliated partnership} and with Kravis and Roberts."  In the suit, Mr. Kohlberg alleges that Messrs.  Kravis and Roberts decided after 1986 to change the firm's previous practice of selling off companies that had increased in value to realize a profit.  Instead, Mr. Kohlberg alleges, Messrs.  Kravis and Roberts "decided that it would serve their purposes to retain control of these companies, to substantially maintain or enlarge their own interests, and to transfer interests to certain KKR personnel or other persons or entities that they chose."  According to the suit, KKR bought out the interests of outside institutional investors in the four companies in dispute and recapitalized the companies, and in the process, reduced Mr. Kohlberg's stakes while increasing the stakes of other KKR partners.  In the case of Houdaille, the suit says, KKR sold the company and then quickly bought back six divisions for about 40% of the sale price and organized them into Idex.  As a result of the Houdaille transaction, the suit alleges, "Kravis and Roberts effectively re-allocated interests" in Houdaille "by wrongfully reducing the interest of their partner Kohlberg."  Scotty's Inc. said its board has decided not to declare a quarterly dividend until its pending merger with GIB Group, a Belgian retailer, is complete.  GIB Group now holds 95% of Scotty's 14.7 million common shares outstanding following a tender offer by its affiliate, GIB Acquisition Corp., that expired July 13.  As a result of the merger, Scotty's is to become an affiliate of GIB Group.  Scotty's most recent quarterly dividend, 13 cents a share, was paid Aug. 1.  In other board action, Daryl L. Lansdale, Scotty's president, was elected an additional director of the home improvement products retailer.  A federal judge ordered the Food and Drug Administration to require tampon manufacturers to put standardized information about tampon absorbency rates on their product labels.  Judge Barrington Parker gave the agency until Oct. 30 to issue a rule that establishes uniform terms for defining specific ranges of absorbency and requires manufacturers to display them on their products.  He faulted the FDA for "unreasonable" delays.  Public Citizen Health Research Group, a Washington-based watchdog organization, petitioned the agency for such a rule in 1982 after several women died from toxic-shock syndrome, a disease linked to high-absorbency tampons.  "Without this regulation, women cannot compare . . . the absorbency of a particular brand to another," the judge said, "and women will continue to subject themselves needlessly to the risk of serious injury and even death from toxic-shock syndrome."  Currently, some manufacturers use vague terms such as "regular" and "super" and "super plus" to describe the varying absorbency of their products, while other manufacturers display a numerical absorbency rating of their various tampons.  But Public Citizen argued that a uniform labeling standard must be set for the industry.  MAN AG Tuesday said fiscal 1989 net income rose 25% and said it will raise its dividend for the year ended June 30 by about the same percentage.  The Frankfurt, West Germany, engineering concern said it will raise the payout to eight marks ($4.07) a share from 6.50 marks in fiscal 1988.  MAN didn't disclose its exact profit, but it said earnings rose about 25% from 201.7 million marks a year earlier while sales climbed 13% to 16.88 billion marks.  MAN attributed the profit gain, which far exceeded its expectations at the start of the fiscal year, to a strong economy and its own restructuring efforts.  The company said it "participated fully" in the booming demand for capital goods in West Germany and other industrialized countries.  Citing a sharp rise in orders, MAN said it expects earnings growth to continue in the current fiscal year.  A Connecticut real estate developer, unable to meet payments on $300 million owed to 45 New England thrifts and banks, asked creditors for time to devise a plan for restructuring his debt.  The troubles of Arnold Peck, Milford, Conn., who in five years has become a major builder, have shaken the state's already jittery real estate market and worried lenders with large loan exposures.  The loans involve about 180 residential and commercial properties in various stages of development throughout the state.  Mr. Peck, who holds about one-third of the debt himself and the rest through partnerships, missed some interest payments in August.  According to unofficial estimates, Mr. Peck's biggest creditors and their exposures are Centerbank of Waterbury, Conn., $33 million; Omni Bank, a subsidiary of NESB Corp., $27 million; Connecticut Bank & Trust Co., a unit of Boston-based Bank of New England, $27 million; Fleet/Norstar Financial Group, Providence, R.I., $20 million; and CityTrust, Bridgeport, Conn., $19 million.  Michael Widland, an attorney for Mr. Peck, said, "It's Mr. Peck's firm intention with every power in his body to stay out of bankruptcy and pay his creditors.  He has met with his creditors and has asked for 60 to 90 days to come up with a plan for restructuring."  However, two of his smaller creditors have filed legal actions against Mr. Peck seeking the missed payments.  Mr. Peck's troubles apparently stem from New England's slowing economy.  Mr. Widland said, "Prices are depressed, and sales are 10% to 20% off a year ago in the condominium market."  Lenders note that all but $30 million of the loans are secured, and they maintain that even in a soft market the properties' values still exceed their loans.  John P. Burke, president and chief executive officer of Centerbank, said, "The bulk of our loans aren't construction loans but mortgage loans on income-producing properties.  There is significant equity in these properties even in a distressed sale.  He has an awful lot of assets."  Harry Duke, a securities analyst for First Boston Corp., said that if loans to Mr. Peck's projects were written down 35%, Centerbank's estimated 1990 per-share earnings would drop 57%.  Mr. Duke has recommended that investors sell Centerbank and NESB shares.  Mr. Burke called Mr. Duke's estimate "highly exaggerated," saying, "The only possible impact would be to non-earning assets.  There would be no hit to capital and minmal impact on earnings per share."  A spokesman for Peoples Bank, Bridgeport, Conn., said, "We continue to believe that the best solution is for the banks to work together with Mr. Peck. . . .  This isn't Houston.  We have a diversified economy, the highest per capita income in the country."  Some analysts continue to take a wait-and-see attitude toward the situation.  Henry Peltz of Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc., said, "Real estate worries are nothing new right now.  This is one more wave on the waters.  We're not pushing the panic button.  These loans are collateralized."  In national over-the-counter trading, Centerbank was unchanged at $12, while NESB slipped 25 cents to $6.375.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Bank of New England closed at $22.50, off 12.5 cents, and Fleet/Norstar was down 25 cents at $28.125.  Wanted: a good man.  And there's a $5,000 reward, 'cause a good man is hard to find when he -- or she -- is that rarity, a country doctor.  Putting a price on someone's head is nothing new for Kansas -- shades of Dodge City.  But it's the latest idea of the Central Kansas Medical Center, which is searching for a physician to attend its 60-bed hospital in rural Larned, population 5,000.  For almost a year, the hospital's executives tried, without success, conventional search tactics, such as help-wanted ads, professional headhunters and even direct mail.  Now they're offering a $5,000 U.S. savings bond to anyone -- it could be you -- who tracks down a doctor willing to set up practice in the Great Plains.  A problem with using professional recruiters is that they "identify {only} one candidate" who may not work out, says Stephen Menke, the center's president and chief executive officer.  For instance, one wife urged her husband to reject the post after one visit to Larned, despite its four parks, high school and petting zoo that Mr. Menke touts to potential recruits.  "She grew up in an urban setting and wasn't ready for the rural life," he says.  The hospital also tried direct mail, sending letters to 2,000 doctors.  That turned up just two candidates, both of whom fell through.  Finally, the facility developed an ad starting, "$5,000 Reward."  Explaining that one of the hospital's two previous physicians had died, the ad offers doctors "a generous recruitment package, including guaranteed compensation, limited call assignments, assistance in office management and relocation benefits."  And it promises the savings bond to anyone recommending the doctor who finally hangs out his or her shingle in Larned.  The ad appeared in the Dallas Morning News and regional editions of this newspaper.  The ad has appeared only a few times but has produced more than two dozen calls, says Robert Blinn, vice president of the center's primary facility, in Great Bend.  Almost all the callers are bounty hunters from Texas, California and the Midwest, with one from West Germany.  "We hope to interview all candidates in September," he says, "and have a new physician on board by Thanksgiving."  But the savings bond -- which will cost the hospital only $2,500 -- won't mature until 2001.  Cie.  Industrielle Chairman Jean-Marc Vernes requested a delay in announcing how he intends to fight a takeover bid by Cie.  Financiere de Suez for Cie.  Industrielle and its main asset, insurer Groupe Victoire, financial sources say.  Under French stock market regulations, Mr. Vernes had until midnight last night to announce whether he was launching a counterbid to Suez's 23.7 billion French franc ($3.58 billion) two-pronged offer.  Citing "new elements," Mr. Vernes canceled a news conference he was to have held this morning at which he was expected to announce his strategy.  Aides to Mr. Vernes wouldn't comment on what these new elements were.  Suez officials say they don't see what is new in the current situation and said no negotiations are under way with Mr. Vernes.  Under French stock market regulations, Mr. Vernes could obtain a delay in launching a counterbid under "exceptional circumstances," which aren't spelled out.  Zoning board meetings in this bucolic little town usually are snoozers.  But when developer Robert Moss recently sought board approval to build a golf course, some 200 people showed up, ready to tar and feather.  The issue was water.  Many people in Upton have a well, and many of the wells yield only a trickle.  Watering the golf course would devastate Upton's strained aquifer, the residents complained.  And if that didn't do it, the runoff from fertilizers and pesticides surely would.  "I'll leave town rather than drink water contaminated by his pesticides," thundered one homeowner.  Such a reaction is increasingly common in the Eastern U.S., where a growing number of cities and towns are confronting water shortages and impurity problems they never had before.  A drought intensified the issue this spring.  But droughts come and go, as the recent one did.  Still, the long-term problem won't go away with this summer's heavy rain.  In Upton and many other places, the possibility of a chronic water crunch is looming, portending radical changes in the way Easterners think about and use water.  "The East will experience many of the same water resource problems that the West has faced," says Steven J. Shupe, editor of Water Market Update, a Santa Fe, N.M., newsletter.  Eventually, he adds, water will be so precious in the East that reserves of it will be bought and sold -- just like in the West.  Western-style water fights already are breaking out.  In Florida, farmers are squaring off against cities for rights to groundwater.  New York City has been feuding with environmental groups and the city of Poughkeepsie, N.Y., about siphoning water from the Hudson River.  Towns on Cape Cod are clashing with developers about groundwater pollution.  For more than a century, Eastern cities have expanded their water supplies by tapping ever more remote sources.  Before the recent drought, New York drew an average of 1.5 billion gallons a day from a 2,000-square-mile watershed spread over the Catskill Mountains north of the city, and many of its reservoirs are more than 100 miles away.  Fifty years ago, Boston extended a big concrete straw 65 miles west to the Quabbin Reservoir, out of which the city now takes about 300 million gallons of water a day.  But further major expansions have become prohibitively expensive or politically untenable in many places.  Among New England towns "there's tremendous interest in protecting water supplies" from encroachment by outsiders, says Peter Shelley, a water expert with the Conservation Law Foundation, a Boston lobbying group.  Meanwhile, millions of people have migrated to coastal cities, dishwashers and Jacuzzis have proliferated and countless suburban lawns have spread.  Pollution and increasingly strict purity standards have shut down dozens of water supplies in the East during the past decade.  And many of the area's old, leaky water mains are hemorrhaging like sliced arteries.  Some Eastern towns perennially exceed their water systems' "safe yields," the maximum output sustainable in a prolonged drought.  Since 1969, New York has been in the habit of consuming more than its estimated safe yield of 1.29 billion gallons a day.  Despite that, the city only last year began to install water meters.  Historically, its consumers have paid flat rates.  During periods of normal or above-normal rainfall, huge systems like New York's can meet high demand.  But during dry times, reservoir levels can drop faster and farther than in the past.  A drought from 1962 to 1967 lowered Boston's main reservoir to 45% of capacity.  If the same drought had hit today, the reservoir would have fallen to 10%, given current demand, says Marcis Kempe, an official with the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority.  Even at a level of 20%, muck at the bottom of reservoirs can be sucked into aqueducts.  And because usage is higher, recovery is harder.  Boston's reservoir took about nine years to completely refill after the 1960s drought.  At usage levels of recent years, recovery from a similar drought would take decades, says Mr. Kempe.  But the long-term weather cycle would probably roll around to another drought before the reservoir refilled.  Some Eastern towns' water seems scarce even when rainfall is normal.  In parts of Upton, southwest of Boston, families can't wash cars, water lawns or take two showers in a row without emptying their wells.  Hoses sometimes snake across streets -- telltale signs that neighbors are borrowing water from each other again.  The East's water problems, however, mainly involve quality rather than quantity.  In many fast-growing areas, a growing population has led to more pollutants; as more water is pumped out of wells to meet demand, contaminants are sucked into them faster from surrounding ground.  Cape Cod is particularly vulnerable to pollution because "there are no alternatives" to the area's aquifer, says Bob Mant, environmental coordinator for Brewster, Mass., a town on the Cape.  He adds that some 90% of household cleaners, paints and solvents used in the area are poured down drains or tossed into the trash -- creating potential time bombs for the Cape's wells.  As chronic water problems worsen, Murphy's Law more readily comes into play.  Consider recent events in Franklin, N.H., a town that once boasted some of New England's cleanest water.  In January, a maintenance man at Franklin's post office noticed that water coming out of faucets had slowed to a trickle.  When he unscrewed the aerators on the faucets, fibrous gunk oozed out.  Soon the same thing was happening elsewhere in town.  A sample of the stuff was taken and sent to a lab.  The good news: It was only tissue-paper-like material.  The bad news: It was infested with coliform bacteria, protozoa and other germs.  Heavy doses of chlorine soon killed the microbes in Franklin's water and eliminated the slime.  No one got sick, and the town's water is now perfectly safe to drink, say city officials.  But "when you take a shower, it's like opening a bottle of Clorox," gripes a Franklin resident.  Franklin's water problems have been building for years, but it isn't known precisely what triggered the recent crisis.  Perhaps when two of the town's wells were closed last year because of pollution, water-flow patterns changed, loosening watermain deposits built up over decades, says Edward Kent, a consultant with Whitman & Howard Inc., a Wellesley, Mass., firm that tested the water.  Anti-corrosion chemicals the town dumped into its water last year also may have stirred up the creatures of Franklin's deeps.  In the thickly settled East, tainted water in one place doesn't have to travel far to affect another.  When New York City draws water from the Hudson River to augment reservoirs depleted by drought -- as it did this spring -- people upstream in Poughkeepsie fret about the "salt front."  That's the boundary between fresh water and sea water, which moves inland when there is less fresh water to push it back.  Salt-front migration endangers fish and other wildlife.  If the front moves far enough, it could devastate Poughkeepsie's water supply, which draws from the Hudson about 10 miles from New York's pumping station.  There is talk in New York of tapping the Hudson permanently, and "we are very much opposed to that," declares Anna Buchholz, Poughkeepsie's town supervisor.  The salt issue is particularly corrosive in Florida, where burgeoning cities wrangle with farmers.  In some places near Tampa, irrigation periodically draws down aquifers so much that people fear the subterranean salt front may soon move inland and ruin wells.  So far, water prices generally haven't given a hint of the East's developing pollution problems.  On average, each American uses 105 gallons of water a day -- and that's just at home, says the American Water Works Association, a trade group in Denver.  The average bill?  One thin dime. (Sewer rates are going up in some places, though.  Boston residents' average water-and-sewer bills will quadruple to an estimated $1,200 annually by 1999, largely to fund the cleanup of Boston harbor.)  There are some signs that the East is starting to take its long-term water problems seriously.  Besides installing meters, New York City has permanently banned midday lawn watering, required restaurants to give water to customers only on request and made it illegal for building owners to neglect leaks.  In March, Massachusetts became the first state to require that builders install toilets that use no more than 1.6 gallons-per-flush, compared with up to seven gallons for older models.  And in Boston, the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority has launched an ambitious water conservation campaign.  "It's very hard to market conservation," says Paul Levy, the agency's executive director.  "But from every point of view, it's the way to go."  The Association of Independent Colleges and Schools plans to withdraw the accreditation of the business schools run by Commercial Programming Unlimited Inc., the company said.  Commercial Programming said that without the accreditation, it would be economically unfeasible to continue operating the schools.  The company said it would appeal the decision to the accreditation concern's review board.  The Washington association's accrediting commission told Commercial Programming that the company failed to meet certain standards and could be suspended unless it filed such an appeal.  The company declined to specify the association's objections yesterday, but said it will make a Securities and Exchange Commission filing on the matter today.  Commercial Programming's two schools, one here and the other in Pennsylvania, teach business with an emphasis on computers, said Walter Small, president.  For 1988, the company reported a loss of $153,068 on sales of $7.2 million.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Commercial Programming was quoted at $1.75 bid, down 6.25 cents.  Major sales of a company's stock by its own top officials usually aren't bullish signals, but that's exactly how analysts are taking a recent $3.1 million sale of Symbol Technologies Inc. stock.  Jerome Swartz, chairman and chief executive officer of Symbol Technologies, slashed his stake in the company, selling 135,000 shares, or 47% of his holdings, between Aug. 8 and Aug. 10, according to filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Mr. Swartz was the fifth insider to sell shares of the New York Stock Exchange-listed electronics company since May.  But analysts who follow the Bohemia, N.Y., company said it could be a bullish sign, if Mr. Swartz uses the cash, as he's expected to do, to exercise below-market-price stock options due to expire next month.  Mr. Swartz holds options on 644,823 shares, according to the company.  He was vacationing and couldn't be reached for comment.  An official of the company declined to comment on Mr. Swartz's plans.  "Anytime you see inside sales, it raises a red flag," said Walter J. Winnitzki, an analyst at Brown Brothers Harriman & Co. of New York.  "But sometimes it's for other reasons" than pessimism about the company's prospects.  Sales of the company's laser-scanning business picked up sharply in the most recent quarter, he added.  Dennis Rosenberg, an analyst at Oppenheimer & Co., said that although the company's earnings growth has been modest, he expects it to accelerate as its recent acquisition, MSI Data Corp., begins to contribute to the bottom line.  Kenneth Schlenker, senior vice president, finance, at the company, said the five insiders who sold since May had "personal reasons" for the transactions.  His own recent sale, he said, of 4,894 shares, or 18% of his direct holdings, on July 24, was tax-related.  In Big Board composite trading, Symbol Technologies finished yesterday at $23.75, down 12.5 cents.  DEFENSIVE SELLING.  Three more insiders cashed out of Lockheed Corp. holdings.  The insider sales were relatively small, at 1,400 to 2,877 shares apiece, but each Lockheed official sold all holdings in the Calabasas, Calif., defense contractor.  Their sales bring the total number of Lockheed insiders selling its stock in 1989, including its vice chairman, to 11, according to SEC filings.  Lockheed has 40 elected officers, according to a spokesman.  On Aug. 11, Robert B. Young Jr., president of Lockheed's engineering and sciences unit, sold 2,877 shares for $144,569.  A day later, Treasurer Anthony G. Van Schaick sold 1,500 shares for $74,812.50.  Lockheed's vice president of science and engineering, Robert P. Caren, on July 18 and 19, sold 1,400 shares for $68,662.50.  The insiders all sold their shares for $49 to $50.25 a share.  Those sales come on top of a previously reported sale last May by Robert A. Fuhrman, vice chairman, who sold 5,000 shares for $239,375, filings with the SEC show.  The sale left him with only 1,000 shares.  The company confirmed the sales but declined to comment on them.  In the second quarter, Lockheed, which took write-downs for cost overruns on two aircraft programs and the near phase-out of a third, posted a 27% drop in earnings.  Net income fell to $1.20 a share from $1.77 a share a year earlier.  In Big Board composite trading yesterday, Lockheed closed at $52.625, up $2.125.  BUY OF THE WEEK.  The biggest insider buy reported to the SEC last week was E.L. Scarff's $1.3 million purchase of Clorox Co. stock.  Mr. Scarff, a director of the Oakland, Calif., household products company, bought 32,900 shares for $38 each on June 21.  It was his biggest Clorox purchase, more than doubling his existing holdings in the company to 53,300 shares, according to SEC filings.  Henkel Corp., a unit of Henkel KGaA of West Germany, also has been loading up on Clorox.  It holds a 27% stake and has announced plans to raise its holding to 30%.  Mr. Scarff was traveling and couldn't be reached for comment.  A spokesman for Clorox said, "Our basic grocery products business is quite strong, and we are exploring very thoroughly the opportunities for business in the detergent category, which may in some minds represent a real opportunity for the company."  Clorox introduced a laundry detergent on the West Coast last year, and has since expanded distribution to cover about 45% of the country.  Clorox's net earnings for the fourth quarter, ended June 30, were down nearly 50%, to 34 cents a share from 67 cents in the year-earlier quarter, but that mainly reflected a one-time charge for discontinued operations.  Operating earnings were up 12% for the quarter.  In Big Board composite trading yesterday, Clorox closed at $43, down 12.5 cents. ---  Richard B. Schmitt in San Francisco contributed to this article.  David Friedson, president and chief executive officer of Windmere Corp., was elected chairman of this lighting retailer, succeeding David Michael Ross, who resigned earlier this month.  Plessey Co., a U.K. electronics concern fighting a hostile #2.04 billion ($3.19 billion) bid by General Electric Co. PLC and Siemens AG of West Germany, has been required by the U.K. Panel on Take-Overs and Mergers to qualify earlier claims that the bidding consortia are trying to buy its businesses "on the cheap."  GEC and Siemens complained to the panel that Plessey's defense document, which was issued last week, put unrealistically high valuations on Plessey's stake in GPT, a joint telecommunications venture between Plessey and GEC, and Hoskyns Group PLC, a U.K. computer company.  Plessey had valued its stake in GPT at #825 million and its 73% interest in Hoskyns at #200 million.  Responding to the panel's order, Plessey, while sticking to its valuation of GPT, noted that it wasn't "supported by independent valuations as required by the City Code on Take-Overs and Mergers."  American businessmen eager to put their money behind Poland's fledgling democracy -- and tap a promising market -- will want to cut deals fast with the owners of big and small companies here.  But first they'll have to find them.  "In the real world," says Polish economist Andrzej Bratkowski, "a company has an owner.  But not in Poland.  We have convinced ourselves that it's natural for a company to have no owner."  There are sort of owners, state agencies that long ago gave up any responsibility for managing these companies or controlling their losses.  There are sort of managers, usually Communist Party hacks put in top corporate jobs because of their faithfulness to the party line rather than to the bottom line.  But "sort of" isn't good enough when real money is on the line.  "No businessman is going to rush in here waving dollars, with a shaky government and standards of productivity in industry that are just plain unacceptable," says Sen. Frank Lautenberg, who has been touring Poland.  "Sure there are low wages, but those low wages are accompanied by low productivity, terrible equipment, and all the rest."  The New Jersey Democrat, who ran a computer company before his election to the Senate, met with Solidarity leader Lech Walesa, who asked for immediate and massive investment.  "There's a measure of naivety here," the senator says.  "They've got shipworkers making $50 a month and they expect them to outwork the South Koreans.  The real world doesn't work that way."  American businessmen who know how the world works are, at least for the moment, mainly staying away from Poland.  Apart from a few investments in the works, U.S. business reponse to Poland's experiment with political pluralism has picked up, but remains tepid.  "It's a bit too early," says Jan Vanous of PlanEcon, a Washington economic consulting firm specializing in East bloc nations.  "Right now, there's nothing."  He adds that there is far more foreign interest in Hungary, even though it has one-quarter the population of Poland and its wages are considerably higher.  "The Poles have a bad reputation, to put it bluntly."  Nonetheless, Poland's new Solidarity-led government is desperately seeking Western and Japanese aid.  Solidarity strategists say that while they're not responsible for the wasteful practices of the planned economy that caused the country to build up $39 billion in foreign debt with nothing to show for it, Solidarity will get the blame if nothing is done.  They'd like forgiveness on interest payments on some or all of that debt, and an infusion of perhaps $10 billion in capital through joint ventures or direct aid.  In return, Solidarity economists know they've got to take drastic steps to repair the economy.  Among action under serious consideration: a wage-price freeze to attack the 100% annual inflation rate, the ending of wasteful subsidies to state firms, freeing currency exchange, and tax holidays for foreign investors.  A few companies may be attracted if such proposals turn into reality.  Donald Hasfurther, director of East-West trade for the Chamber of Commerce of the U.S. in Washington, says he has seen a "significant increase" in inquiries from small and medium-sized U.S. companies interested in Poland in the past six months, "tenfold what it was a year ago."  But turning inquiries to deals will take time.  "If events in Poland proceed positively, it will have a very important long-term impact on our economic relations," Mr. Hasfurther says.  "They have so many needs, and there are so many opportunities.  But in the short-term there may well be more confusion than light."  He adds: "Unlike the 1970s, when the Singers, International Harvesters and RCAs all jumped in with multimillion-dollar deals, this time investment will be smaller and more focused."  He says strategic areas will be food-processing, construction and tourism.  One pleased joint-venture partner is Marriott Corp. of Bethesda, Md.  Its new $100 million, 525-room 41-story hotel will open late next month, and already dominates the Warsaw skyline.  The company has a 25% equity interest in the hotel and will manage it, a first in Poland, where previously the state tourism arm, Orbis, insisted on retaining day-to-day control.  A Marriott spokesman says the project "was more time-consuming" than Marriotts elsewhere, "but it's certainly not impossible to do business in Poland and not really all that difficult."  The Poles are eager for such joint ventures, which not only bring in fresh money and expertise, but also partially privatize the companies, establishing a responsible owner.  Solidarity says that while such a plan probably wouldn't work at Poland's huge state steel mills, for instance, it could work almost everywhere else.  Solidarity is trying to start by saving its birthplace, the huge Lenin Shipyards in Gdansk, where Mr. Walesa and colleagues began agitating for a free trade union in 1980.  Polish-American heiress Barbara Piasecka Johnson is negotiating to buy a 55% interest in the shipyards for as much as $100 million.  The former Communist government wanted to close the yards, which it said were losing money.  Solidarity claimed that decision was political and argued that the yards could be profitable if they were better managed.  But a problem at the yards is one common to all Polish firms.  "Nobody really has any idea whether the Lenin Shipyards is making or losing money," says economist Ryszard Bujaj, a Solidarity member of Parliament.  "The books are a mess."  Another candidate for similar treatment could be the Ursus tractor factory outside Warsaw, says union activist Zbigniew Janas.  He says the factory inefficiently produces 60,000 tractors a year with 24,000 employees.  An infusion of $40 million in new machine tools could raise output to 80,000 a year, cut employment by 20%, and export 18,000 tractors a year, winning Poland badly needed foreign exchange.  The factory has been plagued by strikes, but these have been over working conditions, not pay, and fresh investment would improve those conditions, Mr. Janas says.  So far no Western company is interested.  Losing jobs at Ursus and elsewhere would be hard on Solidarity, Mr. Janas concedes, "but it's inevitable that there will be fewer jobs.  If not, the society will destroy itself."  Mr. Janas adds: "Our idea is to transfer control of thousands of factories to their workers by selling them shares at favorable prices.  This would put them in charge and get them interested in working.  Now nobody cares.  But to make this work we need some capital."  If American industry isn't rushing in, will the U.S. government?  Alan Cranston, one of several packs of American senators who visited Poland last week, says the U.S. should help Poland on all levels.  "There is a lot we can do that won't hurt the U.S. budget deficit," says the California Democrat.  "Debt forgiveness is one big area.  Encouraging investment is another.  Small-scale cooperation on research and technology is another.  If there has been a case for restraint because of the Communist system, the events of the past few days have removed that restraint."  But Senate Minority leader Robert Dole, in another delegation, said "we've got budget problems of our own."  The Kansas Republican indicated the administration would remain cautious.  Sen. Lautenberg said that during his meeting with Mr. Walesa the Solidarity leader demanded immediate, hefty U.S. aid.  "He basically said that it was up to the U.S. to be the salvation of Poland right now," Sen. Lautenberg said.  "We made it clear the U.S. government can't do this."  The senator added that Solidarity officials, while describing the Polish situation as a "house of cards" that could collapse any time, "also expect a wave of American businessmen to come in here and put down real money.  I told him businessmen want to see stability first, then they'll come.  There won't be a big flow of capital in here for a very long time."  A Northeast Utilities unit offered to settle Connecticut regulators' prudence audit on its 4.1% stake in the long-delayed Seabrook, N.H., nuclear plant by agreeing to place only about 56% of its investment into its rate base.  Connecticut Light & Power Co., the Northeast unit, proposed that $148.5 million of its estimated $264.3 million investment in Seabrook through Dec. 31, 1989, be placed in its rate base when Seabrook begins commercial operation.  The company noted that the terms it is proposing are similar to a settlement made with the state by United Illuminating Co., New Haven, regarding its 17.5% stake in Seabrook.  In addition, Connecticut Light & Power said its offer provides for $20.1 million in financing-cost adjustments to its rate base to recognize that none of its investment in Seabrook has been included in its rate base during construction, while a portion of United Illuminating's investment has been included during construction and already is reflected in rates.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Northeast Utilities shares closed at $21.375, unchanged.  Two of the most expensive and disappointing ventures in the computer industry, Stellar Computer Inc. and Ardent Computer Corp., plan to merge in an effort to save money.  The plan illustrates the increasingly difficult environment for starting computer companies, even with top managers and substantial funding.  Both companies had aimed for a fast-growing graphics supercomputer market that hasn't developed as hoped.  Analysts tipped off to the plan said it is being presented as a merger of equals.  Even the name of the new outfit is a merger: Stardent Inc.  According to individuals familiar with the plan, it was pushed by venture capitalists on Stellar's board.  Ardent, 44%-owned by Kubota Ltd. of Japan, has raised $108 million since its founding in November 1985; Stellar, founded a month later, has raised $60 million.  Charles Casale, president of Aberdeen Group, a Boston consulting firm, said: "If there is a merger, it may prove a classic example of the shortsightedness of American investors.  It may also show the lower cost of capital for Japanese investors looking for longer-term investments."  Stellar, based in Newton, Mass., and Ardent, headquartered in Sunnyvale, Calif., will make unlikely stablemates.  Both were founded by veteran computer entrepreneurs.  Both make graphics supercomputers -- $75,000 computers designed for use by a single scientist or engineer to simulate complex mechanical and chemical actions.  "It makes a lot of sense, should it happen," said Frank Moss, a former Stellar executive who now works for Lotus Development Corp.  "They were going after the same thing and beating up each other.  Although they're going after the same market, the cultural differences are tremendous."  The two companies have split the market since they began turning out their products in 1988, each a year later than originally planned.  Vicki Brown, an analyst with International Data Corp., a market researcher in Framingham, Mass., said each had sales of about $12.5 million last year.  Ms. Brown declined to comment on the planned merger.  The merger could prove awkward.  In an apparent effort to avoid bruised egos, the company's top executives will be named "co-chairmen and co-CEOs" of Stardent.  Some consultants questioned the congeniality of the two strong-willed entrepreneurs: Stellar founder and chairman, J. William Poduska, who also founded Apollo Computer Inc. and Prime Computer Inc., and Ardent chairman and chief executive officer, Allen H. Michels, who started Convergent Technology Inc.  The companies briefed some analysts and consultants by telephone and fax yesterday in anticipation of a formal announcement this afternoon.  The analysts said the two companies will maintain offices on each coast but won't be able to pick a headquarters until one of the CEOs defers to the other.  The two companies also left unanswered the question of which computer design will prevail -- always a touchy issue among proud engineers.  Mr. Poduska told the analysts that the two lines will be fully compatible by early 1991.  Officials of Ardent couldn't be reached immediately for comment.  Officials at Stellar didn't return telephone calls.  John Swanson, president of Swanson Analysis Inc., a Houston, Pa., software developer working on programs for computers of both companies, said he would welcome a merger so he can close down one support effort.  He warned that "they should kill one quickly.  If they don't make a clear statement, customers won't buy either," until they know the surviving design, he added.  Investors in each company will own half the percentage stake in the combined firms that they owned in either one.  Kubota will be the largest holder with 22%, compared with its 44% stake in Ardent.  Kubota, which already makes Ardent's computers, will take over manufacture of all Stardent computers.  Mr. Poduska told the analysts that the merger is "a clear case of two and two adding up to five."  Analysts said that at least it will end the cutthroat price discounting that the two companies have practiced as they fought to a draw for market dominance.  Pearson PLC, a British conglomerate that owns the Financial Times newspaper, reported a 4.5% rise in first-half pretax profit.  Pretax profit rose to #85.4 million ($54.6 million) from #81.7 million, which was in line with market expectations.  Profit attributable to shareholders increased to #158.6 million from #51.1 million due to a #103.7 million extraordinary gain due to the company's sale of a number of businesses.  Total group sales rose 29% to #641.4 million from #496.2 million.  Pearson said profit in the year-earlier first half was boosted by #21 million of property profits, compared with about #12 million this year.  The company reported particularly strong performances from investment banking, fine china, and its printing and publishing businesses.  Growth of economic activity in the industrialized countries is moderating after two years of fast expansion, but chances that the slowdown could develop into a full-fledged recession are slight, the International Monetary Fund said in its semiannual economic report.  Economists at the IMF also said that although the risk of a "dangerous" acceleration of inflation still exists, "it appears to have diminished somewhat" and inflationary pressures are expected to continue easing gradually through the end of next year.  But the IMF warned that governments mustn't be tempted into prematurely relaxing their anti-inflationary monetary policies, arguing that this could rekindle inflation.  The IMF's latest projections call for a growth rate of 2.7% for the industrialized countries in 1990, slightly down from its estimate of 2.9% in April.  The latest estimate is likely to be revised in the coming weeks, however, partly reflecting faster-than-expected growth in the U.S.  Waertsilae Security, a division of engineering group Waertsilae OY AB, said in Helsinki, Finland, that it had agreed to buy all the stock of Cardkey Systems Inc., a maker of card access control systems.  The accord is worth $40 million, the company said.  Waertsilae Security also has plants in Finland, Britain, Norway, Sweden, West Germany and the U.S.  The division is the market leader of lock systems in Europe.  Cardkey said it expects net sales to reach $55 million in 1989.  Two airline passengers filed a lawsuit in state court here against USAir Group Inc., alleging that its airline unit committed fraud when it purportedly changed its frequent-flier program.  The passengers, Albert M. Zlotnick and Antonio D. Pyle, sued on behalf of all people who joined USAir's frequent-traveler program prior to Aug. 5, including those who were members of Piedmont Airlines' and Pacific Southwest Airlines' frequent-flier programs before those carriers merged with USAir.  The plaintiffs assert that the mileage credits they had accumulated will become less valuable when certain changes USAir allegedly made take effect Dec.31.  For example, the suit alleges that "subsequent to Dec. 31, 1989, a free companion seven-day Carnival Cruise with the purchase of a seven-day Carnival Cruise will require an additional 20,000 miles over the existing award schedule."  Last night, a USAir spokesman said he wasn't familiar with the litigation, which seeks class-action status, and therefore hadn't any immediate comment.  The plaintiffs asked for unspecified damages.  RAFSANJANI WON approval of his cabinet, opening the way for Western ties.  Iran's parliament endorsed all 22 members of the president's proposed government.  The unexpectedly clear-cut vote boosted Rafsanjani's standing as Iran's dominant political figure since Ayatollah Khomeini's death in June.  It also gave him a stronger hand to improve relations with the outside world and possibly to help free Western hostages held in Lebanon.  Rafsanjani had risked a clash with the legislature by dropping anti-Western Interior Minister Mohtashemi, a former paymaster of Hezbollah, the Lebanese fundamentalists who are believed to control the kidnappers.  In the decade since Iran's revolution, no other cabinet has been approved without changes by the hard-liners who make up a majority of parliament.  ---  CAMBODIAN TALKS COLLAPSED in Paris, raising fears of renewed fighting.  An ambitious 19-nation effort to halt 20 years of war in Cambodia ended without an agreement.  Last-minute mediation attempts foundered over the issues of power-sharing and peace-monitoring.  Cambodia's Vietnam-backed government refuses to share power with the Khmer Rouge, the country's former ultra-leftist rulers.  But the Chinese-backed Khmer Rouge is the strongest force in the three-party resistance coalition, and backers say it must have a role.  Participants fear that fighting for chunks of Cambodian territory will intensify when Vietnam completes its unilateral troop pullout Sept. 26.  ---  Colombia's justice minister held a news conference in Washington to announce she will stay on the job despite death threats.  In Colombia, bombs blew up six state liquor stores in Medellin and a travel agency in Bogota.  The father of three of Medellin's drug lords called for talks with the government to end the spiral of violence.  ---  Bush said his administration will "cooperate to the best of our ability" with a plea by Colombia's justice minister for an extra $19 million to fight drug lords.  He spoke after meeting with advisers in Kennebunkport, Maine, to review an anti-drug plan that he is scheduled to announce next Tuesday.  ---  Syrian gunners shelled an oil tanker bound for a Christian port in Lebanon and set it ablaze, killing seven crewmen and starting an artillery duel that killed three.  The Sunshield was hit as it tried to run Syria's blockade.  The attack coincided with Beirut's fiercest shelling in two weeks.  ---  India arrested 5,000 political workers and asked others to stay in their offices overnight to thwart a nationwide strike to demand Prime Minister Gandhi's resignation.  Four opposition parties set the strike to focus attention on charges of government corruption and display strength before parliamentary elections later this year.  ---  The U.S. recalled its ambassador to Bulgaria for consultations in response to human rights abuses involving Bulgaria's ethnic Turkish minority.  The State Department also said it may provide aid to help Turkey cope with 310,000 Bulgarian Turkish refugees who have fled across the border.  ---  The EPA blamed a power plant partly owned by the U.S. for much of the air pollution that obscures views of the Grand Canyon.  The agency's preliminary report could lead to orders to install expensive air-pollution devices at Arizona's Navajo Generating Station.  But the majority owners are challenging the findings.  ---  A Republican led in the race to succeed the late Democratic Rep. Claude Pepper of Florida.  With more than 90% of the precincts reporting, State Sen. Ileana Ros-Lehtinen had 53.1% of the vote, to 46.9% for attorney Gerald Richman, a Democrat.  ---  Israeli troops shot and killed an Arab activist in the occupied Gaza Strip.  Abu Jayad, 27, who headed an outlawed university youth organization, was involved in a clash between troops and stone-throwing Palestinians, military sources said.  Meanwhile, a strike by Palestinians to protest Israeli identity cards continued for a second week.  ---  Greece publicly burned 16 million secret files compiled by intelligence services over four decades on the political beliefs of private citizens.  The ceremony, ordered by the conservative-communist coalition government, was hailed as a symbolic end to bitter divisions among Greek political parties.  ---  An Army study concludes that faulty government policy, not negative news coverage, caused Americans to stop supporting the Vietnam War.  The report blames rising American casualties and a no-win U.S. strategy and says news reports were often more accurate than government statements.  ---  The Security Council criticized South Africa for failing to cooperate fully with U.N. monitors overseeing Namibian independence.  The unanimously adopted reprimand was watered down in bargaining between African and Western council members.  --- Moldavian lawmakers won a test of strength in their bid to make Moldavian the Soviet republic's official language.  They were opposed by deputies from cities where 80,000 mostly Russian workers have been on strike since last week to protest the bill.  Mark IV Industries Inc. said directors authorized the purchase of as many as one million, or about 10%, of the company's common shares outstanding.  The Williamsville, N.Y., maker of industrials products said the buy-backs will be made from time to time in open-market or privately negotiated transactions.  Mark IV has about 9.8 million shares outstanding, since completing its initial buy-back of one million shares this month.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Mark IV shares closed at $16.50, up 75 cents.  Unable to sell all the assets it planned, Eastern Airlines faces a possible $400 million shortage in its cash projections and is preparing to revamp its bankruptcy-law reorganization plan.  A breakdown in negotiations over the sale of Eastern's lucrative South American routes to AMR Corp.'s American Airlines has put in doubt key financial projections in the Chapter 11 reorganization plan approved by Eastern's creditors last month.  As a result, the Texas Air Corp. unit, operating under court protection since March 9, will propose significant changes in the plan to a creditors' committee meeting tomorrow in New York.  An Eastern spokesman confirmed last night that the carrier is scheduled to make a status report tomorrow to creditors.  "We have always said the creditors will be paid in full, that hasn't changed," he said.  He declined to characterize the meeting further, except to say it will entail what "steps Eastern must take for a successful reorganization."  But people familiar with the changes say that, tentatively, they include an expanded role for parent Texas Air in underwriting some of ailing Eastern's costs.  Until now, Texas Air has avoided participating in the Eastern proceedings.  Eastern's reorganization plan calls for shrinking the airline 40% and selling off $1.8 billion in assets.  The funds would be used to repay Eastern creditors in full and pay down debt, as well as to finance the carrier's scaled-down operations.  The plan projected that Eastern would amass $774 million in cash by year end for operating purposes.  A significant part of that original plan was that Eastern would sell off its South American routes, valued by creditors at least $365 million.  Eastern began serious negotiations some time ago with American, which has the money to buy them and has a route system best-suited to them.  The price under discussion isn't known.  But talks foundered primarily on a longstanding legal fight between AMR and another Texas Air unit, Continental Airlines, according to sources familiar with the discussions.  AMR wanted a suit that Continental filed against AMR's computer-reservation unit dropped as part of any transaction with Eastern.  Continental refused.  Spokesmen for American and Eastern wouldn't comment.  Although an agreement could still be reached with American, it now appears unlikely the routes will be sold to it or any other party.  Instead, it is understood Eastern probably will fly them itself.  But that means at this late stage Eastern will have to scramble to renegotiate its plan with creditors to reflect not only the lower-than-projected funds coming in from asset sales, but also the cost-and-revenue implications of Eastern maintaining South American flight operations.  Sources say the overall $400 million shortage from Eastern's original plan is an estimate, reflecting some other small gaps that have occurred beyond the failure to sell the South American routes.  Those familiar with the reorganization plan say some of the changes being considered involve Texas Air taking up some of the slack.  A decision isn't expected until after this week's session with creditors.  But one possibility, sources said, is for Texas Air to agree to provide all or part of a $99 million installment due Eastern's pension plan Sept. 15.  Eastern has already asked the bankruptcy court to let it make the payment on time, and also has asked the Internal Revenue Service for an extension.  The IRS can penalize Eastern if the payment isn't made on time.  The matter, an Eastern spokesman said, is under discussion with the IRS, creditors and the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation, which administers the plan.  Another possibility is for Texas Air to provide Eastern with a revolving credit line.  The spokesman declined to comment on that.  One source speculated the credit line, which would supplement Eastern's operating funds, could be for $75 million to $100 million.  Others said any discussion of a figure is premature.  The possibility of Texas Air taking a more active role in underwriting Eastern comes at a time when the holding company is weighing whether to sell a minority stake or control of its main operating unit, Continental Airlines, to others.  Texas Air, headed by Chairman Frank Lorenzo, is discussing the sale of a stake in Continental to Scandinavian Airline Systems and unidentified partners.  And Pan Am Corp. is understood to be weighing a bid for Continental.  Sale of any significant piece of Continental, or all of it, could give Texas Air sizable reserves to pour into struggling Eastern.  Because of sluggish exports, South Korea's current-account surplus in July shrank to US$430 million from US$1.26 billion a year earlier, the Bank of Korea, the central bank, said.  But the July results marked the second consecutive improvement from month-earlier levels.  The surplus stood at US$270 million in May and US$394 million in June.  The current account, or balance of payments, is a measure of transactions in services, such as investment, as well as trade in goods.  Officials said the July figure brought the aggregate of surpluses since January to US$2.88 billion, down 59% from US$7.09 billion a year earlier.  Central bank officials said the surplus is expected to reach US$7 billion at most by year end, below the government's recently lowered projection of US$8 billion.  South Korea had a record annual current-account surplus of US$14.1 billion in 1988, based on strong exports.  The Swedish auto maker AB Volvo posted a 12% increase in first-half pretax profit to 4.25 billion kronor ($641.3 million) from 3.8 billion kronor a year earlier.  The results were in the lower range of the 4.05 billion to 4.62 billion kronor predicted by analysts.  Volvo said earnings per share increased 17% to 28.90 kronor ($4.36) from 24.70 kronor.  Sales rose 1.7% to 46.55 billion kronor from 45.76 billion kronor.  Car division sales increased 14% to 22.09 billion kronor from 19.35 billion kronor, Volvo said.  Truck division sales rose 19% to 12.46 billion kronor and Marine and industrial engines sales increased 10% to 1.47 billion kronor.  Aerospace sales rose 23% to 1.08 billion kronor.  Sales in the food operating sector declined 2% to 5.1 billion kronor; Volvo said the decline stemmed from the continuing liquidation of trading in fish.  Volvo also said demand for heavy trucks continued to be strong in both Western Europe and North America, but leveled off in a number of other important markets during the second quarter.  Scott Paper Ltd. said it will build a wood pulp mill in Crabtree, Quebec, at an estimated cost of 110 million Canadian dollars (US$93.8 million).  Vancouver, British Columbia-based Scott, which is 50.1%-owned by Scott Paper Co. of Philadelphia, said the new mill will produce 300 metric tons of pulp a day.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  Robert Stewart, chairman and chief executive officer, said about half of the new mill's output will be used at the company's Quebec paper mills, with the remainder shipped to the U.S. for use by Scott Paper Co.  Mr. Stewart said commercial production at the new mill should begin in early 1992.  He said Scott is negotiating with the Canadian and Quebec governments regarding financial assistance for the construction of the mill, but wouldn't say how much aid the company is seeking.  He said a construction date will be set, once financing arrangements are complete.  HemoTec Inc. shareholders agreed to a merger with Bio-Medicus Inc. valued at $27 million, the companies said.  HemoTec will become a wholly-owned subsidiary of Bio-Medicus, an Eden Prairie, Minn.-based maker of blood pumps.  Under terms of the merger, HemoTec shareholders will receive 0.61 share of Bio-Medicus for each share of HemoTec.  The company has 2.48 million shares outstanding, said HemoTec President Jerry Nigh, who estimated the merger was worth about $11 a share to holders of HemoTec, which makes blood-coagulation products.  In connection with the merger, Robert K. Anderson, a director of HemoTec before the merger, was elected a director of Bio-Medicus.  Mr. Nigh, who will remain as president of HemoTec, was elected a vice president of Bio-Medicus.  HemoTec said its common stock ceased trading at the market's close yesterday.  On Monday, Quest Medical Inc. said it would drop its unsolicited $6-a-share bid for HemoTec and support the merger.  The Dallas-based maker of hospital products said that based on its short position in Bio-Medicus stock, it expected to realize a $1.25 million gain from the transaction.  In national over-the-counter trading, Bio-Medicus closed at $17.25, down 75 cents.  Neco Enterprises Inc. said it will give holders an option to swap as many as 200,000 shares, or 20% of the company's stock, for shares in Eastern Utilities Associates.  Under the proposal, NECO said holders will receive one Eastern share for each 2.5 Neco shares, or about 80,000 Eastern shares for all 200,000 Neco shares.  The exchange would be made following the anticipated sale of Newport Electric, Neco's principal subsidiary, to Eastern Utilities.  Neco said in light of its plans to diversify into "higher growth opportunities such as power generation and real estate development," the stock swap would permit holders who do not "share the same desire for diversification" to retain an interest in Newport Electric.  Neco's board, however, doesn't recommend that holders swap their shares, a spokesman said.  "In the board's judgment the value of Neco shares, if held, are worth more than this conversion would imply," the spokesman added.  Neco has agreed to sell Newport Electric to Eastern Utilities for 530,000 Eastern Utilities common shares.  A Neco spokesman said the company expects to sign a definitive agreement by next week.  An international bidding contest is emerging for one of the music industry's most coveted prizes, the rights to many of Motown's biggest hit songs.  The music-publishing business assembled by Motown's founding entrepreneur, Berry Gordy Jr., is valued at more than $100 million.  It has rights to hits by Stevie Wonder, Lionel Richie, Smokey Robinson and other Motown stars.  "It's a piece of music history," said Charles Koppelman, chairman and chief executive of the EMI Music Publishing unit of Britain's Thorn EMI PLC.  EMI Music Publishing, London-based Filmtrax PLC and Britain's Virgin Group PLC are among several international music-industry giants now circling Jobete Music, Mr. Gordy's publishing business, after he signaled that he might sell.  Jobete holds one of the last big rock 'n' roll-era catalogs still uncontrolled by multinational musical recording and publishing corporations.  It is the crown jewel that Mr. Gordy kept when he sold his related Motown Records recording company last year for $61 million to Boston Ventures and MCA Inc.  In both musical recording and publishing, "independent" operators like Mr. Gordy are suddenly hot properties.  Their catalogs of long-lived hits are coveted by music industry giants, intent on stoking their ever-growing pipeline of record, tape and compact-disk sales.  Last year, Warner Communications Inc. paid $200 million for Chappell Intersong Music Group.  In January, Britain's Thorn topped that by paying a record $337 million for a music publisher: the publishing interests of New York-based SBK Entertainment World Inc.  On a smaller scale, Sony Corp's CBS Records unit paid $30 million for U.S. country-music publisher Tree International.  Most independent publishers like Tree and SBK "have all been Hoovered up by larger groupings of publishers," said Filmtrax's chief executive, John Hall.  Partly because of that, he said, he expects Mr. Gordy's business to fetch a record premium -- far more than the 10-times annual earnings figure for which industry executives believe SBK's business was sold.  Though Jobete's earnings aren't public, Filmtrax's Mr. Hall said his company's own bid for Jobete is for "substantially more than $100 million."  The Hollywood Reporter, an entertainment-industry trade publication, says Mr. Gordy seeks bids of around $200 million.  The Jobete catalog has about 15,000 active copyrights.  Lionel Richie's song, "Three Times a Lady," is the best-selling song world-wide in the catalog.  Officials at Los Angeles-based Gordy Co., Mr. Gordy's holding company, didn't return repeated calls seeking comment; a secretary said the company was in the midst of audits.  For the buyer of Jobete, owning the catalog will mean collecting hefty licensing fees for any uses of the songs.  Other potential bidders include Thorn EMI, which has had talks with Jobete and is considering making a bid, according to Mr. Koppelman.  A Virgin Group spokesman, though declining to say whether his entertainment concern has submitted a bid, confirmed "we're interested in such catalogs when they come along" for sale.  Other potential buyers, according to Los Angeles gossip mills, include singer Michael Jackson, who owns the rights to many Beatles songs.  Mr. Gordy, a former boxer and auto worker, founded his Motown music empire in 1959 in Detroit, the "Motor City" from which the genre gets its name.  His business changed the face of rock, popularizing music by black performers among white audiences.  Music by his stable of stars, which included the Temptations, Diana Ross and the Supremes, and the Four Tops, remains popular today.  But before its sale last year, Mr. Gordy's Motown Records label had fallen on hard times.  It failed to develop new acts, and its annual sales after returns reportedly plunged to just $20 million.  Industry analysts date the decline to 1971, when Mr. Gordy moved the company from Detroit to Los Angeles, to pursue movie and television interests.  @ ---  @ Ten Motown Favorites  @ 4 -- Marvin Gaye  @ "I Heard It Through The Grapevine"  @ 5 -- Jackson 5  @ "I Want You Back"  @ 10 -- The Supremes  @ "Stop] In The Name Of Love"  @ 12 -- Smokey Robinson & The Miracles  @ "Tracks Of My Tears"  @ 14 -- Marvin Gaye  @ "What's Going On"  @ 21 -- Martha & The Vandellas  @ "Dancin' In The Streets"  @ 23 -- Four Tops  @ "Reach Out, I'll Be There"  @ 28 -- The Temptations  @ "My Girl"  @ 73 -- Stevie Wonder  @ "Superstition"  @ 94 -- Edwin Starr  @ "War"  Note: 10 Motown hits were among the top 100 singles of the previous 25 years chosen by Rolling Stone magazine in August 1988.  National Steel Corp. said it will increase base prices on tin mill products and tin coated sheets about 5.5%, effective with shipments on Oct. 1, 1989.  Similiar increases will be made for basis weight extras while increases will not affect tin coating extras, the company said.  Mead Corp. said it agreed to sell its Mead Release Products division to Rexham Industries Inc. for $38 million in cash, which would result in a one-time gain of 25 cents a share in the third quarter.  The West Chicago, Ill., division makes silicone-coated release liners, which are pieces of paper or film on the back of adhesive name tags, among other things.  The liners also have aerospace, medical and automotive applications.  The division operates two plants and employs about 100 people.  It had sales of $29 million in 1988.  Mead, a forest products and electronic publishing concern based in Dayton, Ohio, had sales of $4.5 billion in 1988.  Rexham Industries, a unit of London-based Bowater Industries PLC, makes specialized paperboard and flexible packaging materials, among others.  Norwegian computer company Norsk Data AS announced a pretax first-half loss of 244 million kroner ($34.1 million) and said it plans to cut 600 jobs as part of a restructuring.  Orders fell 21% in the first six months to 1.21 billion kroner from 1.53 billion kroner a year earlier, the company said.  Sales fell 26% to 1.11 billion kroner from 1.5 billion kroner.  Norsk Data's longtime chief executive officer, Rolf Skar, resigned this month after the company announced it expected to post a first-half loss of around 240 million kroner.  The poorer result was attributed mainly to a sluggish second quarter.  This year's first quarter was "comparable" with that of 1988, the company said.  Norsk Data said half of the jobs that will be cut are in Norway.  Net income of property and casualty insurance companies dropped 30% in the second quarter, reflecting strong price competition.  After-tax earnings, including investment income, was $2.6 billion in the quarter, compared with $3.7 billion a year earlier.  "The industry has definitely entered a period of sub-par financial performance," said the Insurance Information Institute, a trade group.  "Competition in commercial lines has driven premiums down to uneconomic levels."  The analysis continued: "This situation obviously is not sustainable long term.  Most analysts expect poor results for the industry through this year and into 1990, with the turnaround expected in the second half of 1990."  Underwriting losses, before investment income, nearly doubled to $4.9 billion from $2.5 billion, reflecting the fact that claim costs rose at almost three times the rate of premiums.  Pretax operating profit fell 42% to $2.4 billion from $4.1 billion a year earlier.  The institute said earned premiums rose 3.1% in the second quarter, failing to keep pace with inflation, which rose 4.5%.  However, investment income, which represents 13% of the industry's revenues, rose 11% in the quarter, reflecting gains from the rising stock market.  Realized capital gains increased 42% to $909 million from $640.9 million.  The major source of increased costs was in incurred losses for claims, up 8.9% in the second quarter, the institute said.  That exceeds the rate of increase for claims costs in recent years; in 1988, claims costs rose 5.5%.  Catastrophe losses rose 71% in the second quarter to $1.2 billion from $703 million a year earlier.  The institute said the largest catastrophe loss in the second quarter was $380 million for a series of storms that hit southern states last May. en  The Labor Department said that strikes reduced the growth in payroll employment by 108,000 in August.  The government will disclose on Friday how much payrolls grew in the month when it releases the unemployment rate.  The growth in non-farm payrolls is closely watched by financial markets and economists, but the telephone workers' strike will distort the August tally.  Payrolls grew by 169,000 in July.  The Labor Department said that the 108,000 figure includes 136,000 telephone workers going on strike, as well as 20,000 miners and 8,000 grocery-store workers returning to work.  Slattery Group Inc., New York, said it completed the sale for $28 million of Slattery Associates Inc., which represents a substantial portion of its assets, to the Skanska (USA) Inc. unit of Skanska AB, a Swedish general contractor and builder.  The transaction was approved at a special meeting of Slattery shareholders yesterday.  As part of the transaction, first announced in April, Slattery Associates, a heavy-construction company, paid a $20 million dividend to Slattery Group, which owns assets of a cement business.  Slattery Group said it will pay a special $3-a-share dividend on Sept. 28 to stock of record Sept. 12.  It has about 1,470,000 shares outstanding.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Slattery Group shares closed at $34, down 12.5 cents.  Bullish U.S. growth data failed to resuscitate the dollar in New York after intervention by the Bank of Japan and the Bundesbank's decision to increase a short-term Treasury bill rate in West Germany fueled profit-taking in European trading.  The dollar shed nearly three pfennig and about one and a half yen overall, surprising many traders who had expected the U.S. currency to test the upper end of its range.  Whereas market players had been looking for the dollar to challenge resistance at 145 yen and 1.9700 marks and perhaps head higher, the consensus now is for narrow, if choppy, trading until the release Friday of the August U.S. employment report.  "We broke through some key technical levels on the way down," with stop-loss orders hammering away at the dollar below 1.9510 marks and 143.25 yen, said Liliana Nealon, a vice president at Union Bank of Switzerland in New York.  "Now it's steady as she goes until Friday, when we can get an indication of how the U.S. economy is doing."  Others don't think it will be so steady, however, as continued thin volume leaves exchange rates prey to speculators who can turn the market around with a single large order.  In late New York trading, the dollar was quoted at 1.9360 marks and 142.95 yen, down from 1.9633 marks and 144.55 yen late Monday in New York.  Sterling was trading at $1.5870, up from $1.5637.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the U.S. currency opened at 142.86 yen, down from Tokyo's Tuesday close of 144.15 yen.  Traders said Tuesday that the Bank of Japan intervened when the dollar was at 144.20 yen and on the rebound about 30 minutes before the Tokyo close.  The central bank appeared more effective than it did Monday, when repeated interventions failed to stop the dollar's jump above 144 yen.  Traders said the bank intervened through brokers for the first time in several months to emphasize the seriousness of its efforts.  The action nipped a rallying dollar in the bud, prompting profit-taking early in Europe.  Additional motivation to sell came from a surprise move during the European morning by the Bundesbank to raise its three-day Treasury bill rate to 6% from 5.5%.  That rate, at which banks can place excess funds with the central bank, serves as an effective lower limit to money market rates.  The move helped fuel speculation that the Bundesbank soon may raise its discount and Lombard rates, dealers said, even though the Treasury bill rate increase is viewed as a technical measure aimed at stabilizing money market rates, not a tightening.  Harbinger or not, the Bundesbank's move held the dollar back following the announcement of the U.S. gross national product revision, which showed an expansion at a seasonally adjusted 2.7% annual rate in the second quarter, up from the 1.7% rate initially reported last month.  The U.S. currency rose slightly on the news, but quickly recommenced its retreat.  Traders said downward revisions of the inflation measures in the GNP report -- the implicit price deflator and the fixed-weight deflator -- may have accelerated the dollar's decline in New York.  The implicit deflator rose at a 4.6% annual rate in the second quarter, down from the 4.9% rate initially reported, and the fixed-weight index rose at a 5.1% clip, down from 5.2%.  The dollar actually began to fall on profit-taking prior to the GNP revision.  Traders attributed this to the fact that market participants already had discounted the figures.  Said one trader with a European bank in New York: "The market had been expecting a GNP revision somewhere between 2.5% and 3.0%, so this was no big surprise."  Traders said they saw participants selling dollars for yen, and then turning around to sell the yen for marks to take advantage of favorable cross-rate fluctuations.  The mark finished at 73.86 yen, up from 73.59 yen Monday.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $363.60 an ounce, up $3.60.  Estimated volume was a moderate 3.6 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was quoted at $363.30 an ounce.  Baseball managers and money managers share an occupational hazard: Unless they produce winning results, they stand a good chance of being fired.  But poor performance isn't the only reason for an investor to dump a money manager, and sometimes it's not even a good reason, the experts say.  Haste in showing a money manager the door because of faltering results might only compound an investor's problems.  "That can be the very worst time to fire a manager," says Allan Emkin, president of Glendale, Calif.-based Pension Consulting Alliance, whose clients include California's $25 billion teacher retirement fund.  Investors, like savvy team owners, would be wise to weigh a variety of factors before sending a manager to the showers.  Performance is only one of the "four P's" that consulting firm Frank Russell Co. watches in its business of evaluating money managers for big pension funds and wealthy individuals.  Significant changes in the management firm's investment philosophy, people or portfolio also can mean it's time to say goodbye.  Here's what some experts look for in assessing a money manager.  While their comments are meant specifically for individuals with their own personal money managers, mutual fund investors also should find them pertinent.  PHILOSOPHY: Successful money managers consistently follow some sort of investment strategy or style -- whether it's looking for undervalued securities, buying high-dividend issues or trying to pick out the next lucrative takeover stock.  Whatever the style, deviation from it is a sure trouble sign.  "If a management firm says, 'We have to change our stripes,' they are playing catch-up, and then they may have to change again and again," says L. Duncan Smith, head of manager research for Tacoma, Wash.-based Frank Russell.  Kent Naugle of Kansas City, Mo., consultants DeMarche Associates agrees.  "We are very disappointed if a manager changes styles," he says.  It's true that no investment style works all the time, that changing market conditions affect every manager's performance at some time or other.  And toeing the line can be tough.  Managers following the so-called tactical asset allocation style are now having to ride out a storm, as most have kept little or nothing in stocks for months, missing this year's rally.  But some sophisticated investors say changing styles is a far worse sin for a manager than a stretch of poor performance.  Such switching throws off portfolios that have been carefully balanced to spread risk among a variety of styles.  Besides, being too quick to fire a manager can backfire when an out-of-fashion investment strategy suddenly comes back into vogue.  PEOPLE: "At the end of the day, this is a people business," Mr. Emkin says.  "When people leave, or if a senior investment professional were to die, you have to say, 'Is that person replaceable?'"  Reputable money managers report significant personnel changes to their clients.  But in a field where comings and goings are commonplace, keeping track of such moves can be difficult.  Investment advisers are required to list key personnel with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form ADV-Part II. Investors should examine the ADV form when hiring a money manager, and then ask the manager for updates.  A change in the firm's ownership also should turn on a bright warning light.  Money managers who sell their firms but then continue working for them may be less dedicated under new ownership, they say.  Important personnel usually are locked into long-term contracts with incentives aimed at reducing that problem.  PORTFOLIO: Peo ple who hire a money manager may be glad to turn over responsibility for figuring out what to buy and what to sell.  But they're advised to check the portfolio periodically for the unexpected.  "I don't want to open up the hood of my Oldsmobile and find a Chevy engine there," says Milwaukee-based consultant Richard A. Schilffarth.  Investors should not only review the specific investments but also watch for changes in the size of a manager's portfolio.  "Someone who can run $200 million or $300 million very well may not be able to handle $1 billion," says Mr. Naugle, as managers flooded with new cash may not have enough good investment ideas to use it all wisely.  A stock investment manager holding more than 10% to 15% of the firm's portfolio in cash, for example, can be a tip-off to problems -- although there could be good reasons for that position.  Keeping track of a firm's size also can be a good idea because rapidly growing outfits can't always keep up with the administrative chores that a flood of new accounts brings.  Investors also should watch the turnover rate on securities in a manager's portfolio.  Appropriate turnover levels vary by investment style, but big changes in a manager's commission costs should raise questions.  PERFORMANCE: The bottom line still is the bottom line, but measuring performance can be tricky.  Investment professionals judge their success in relative terms, comparing it with benchmarks such as the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index or the performance of competitors who use the same investment style.  For example, until just before the 1987 crash, managers specializing in small-capitalization stocks had to endure a five-year drought as smaller issues trailed far behind the soaring big-company stocks.  But even though their results were poor by comparison, small-cap managers who maintained their investment style were considered "good performers" by investment professionals.  Dissecting performance numbers is a challenge in itself.  "You could write a book about how to lie with investment statistics," says money manager Dean LeBaron of Batterymarch Financial Management in Boston.  Big investors rely on consultants to translate these numbers; smaller investors who can't afford such services have to rely more on trust.  Industry groups such as the Financial Analysts Federation and the Investment Management Consultants Association have developed standards for reporting performance statistics.  But there is disagreement within the industry about some of these proposals, and adoption of uniform procedures by the U.S.'s 15,000 registered investment advisers has been slow.  Tucson Electric Power Co., which slashed its common dividend more than 50% last week, told analysts that no additional cuts in the quarterly pay-out should be expected.  Speaking to the financial community in New York, Tucson Electric's president and chief executive officer, Thomas C. Weir, said the lowering of the dividend to 40 cents a share from 97.5 cents a share followed a study of projected cash flows and earnings.  Mr. Weir added that Tucson Electric "intends to develop improved relations with the Arizona Corporation Commission as a necessary step in returning the company to financial health."  At the same time, Mr. Weir informed the analysts that Tucson Electric "will lose money on its utility operations until adequate rate relief and additional sales of capacity can be achieved."  The company, in a statement based on Mr. Weir's presentation, said its next rate increase application will be filed shortly after a decision in the pending rate case, expected in the next few weeks.  The pending rate action asks for a 22% increase in base rates and an additional surcharge to recover fuel and purchased power costs.  The analysts also were told that subsidiary results may reflect additional provisions for losses, which may further reduce earnings in 1989.  The large West German retailing group Asko Deutsche Kaufhaus AG failed in an attempt yesterday to persuade Dutch retail group Koninklijke Ahold N.V. to abandon anti-takeover defenses erected on Monday.  An Ahold spokesman said Asko offered to forgo the voting rights attached to the 14% stake it has accumulated in the Dutch supermarkets and drugstore group, providing Ahold withdraw a block of 107,130 preferred shares it has placed with a friendly foundation.  The spokesman said Asko offered to transfer the voting rights to the same foundation, Stichting Ahold Continuiteit, which is controlled by a board made up of two Ahold directors and three representatives from outside the company.  But Ahold said it had turned down these suggestions and would maintain its defense tactics to deter any further efforts by either Asko or other parties to secure a dominant stake in the company.  Tokyo stocks ended firmer after five consecutive daily losses.  London share prices closed lower.  In Tokyo, the Nikkei index of 225 selected issues was up 80.24 points at 34687.65.  The index lost 132.52 points Monday.  In early trading in Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index added 11.63 points to 34699.28.  Tuesday's volume on the First Section was estimated at 550 million shares, up from 313.6 million Monday.  Advancing issues slightly outnumbered decliners, 468 to 427, while 204 issues were unchanged.  The morning session opened firmer as the market responded favorably to the New York stocks' advance to record highs on the Dow industrials overnight.  Efforts by major brokerage houses to underpin the market helped it recover from Monday's depressed mood, traders and fund managers said.  On Monday, the lowering of Kyocera's earning forecasts by major brokerage firms discouraged a recent main trend of buying issues with strong earnings prospects.  Kyocera declined sharply Monday and brought similar high-priced, small-capitalization issues down with it.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which fell 12.41 points Monday, was up 5.34 points, or 0.20%, at 2615.63.  The Second Section index, which fell 0.99 points Monday, was up 23.98 points, or 0.73%, to close at 3312.40.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 30 million shares, up from 20 million Monday.  Shigeru Akiba, head of equity trading at UBS Phillips & Drew International, said advances made by pharmaceuticals and Sony helped the market avoid further losses yesterday.  Pharmaceuticals were helped in part by a favorable report by a "big four" brokerage firm on the industry's earnings prospects, he said, adding that investors feel safe buying these issues, as they are less subject to the influence of external market factors.  Sankyo was up 70 yen (50 cents) at 2,950 yen ($20.40), helped by news reports that the company developed a new product that is expected to bring 50 billion-yen yearly sales, a trader at Yamaichi Securities said.  London share prices suffered a technical correction as the market was dented by technically inspired selling pressure after its recent surge to fresh post-crash highs.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended down 16.6 points at 2380.8, down from an intraday high of 2394.4.  At its lowest, the index touched 2378.5, a fall of 18.9 points.  Dealers said the downturn was set in motion by market makers, who trimmed prices in a bid to shake out a few sellers.  "Market makers are still short of stock and they hoped a fall would rattle a few nervous investors," one trader said.  Market sentiment was also hurt by a weak opening on Wall Street, as well as an absence of buying interest above the 2390-point level.  After opening weaker, the market ticked lower in thin, dismal trading.  Several attempts to engineer a mini-rally during the afternoon failed to gather momentum, traders said.  "There was very little corporate or economic news out today," one dealer said, "and I think the market's lackluster tone is likely to continue all week."  At the close, the narrower Financial Times 30-share index was down 8.3 points at 1972.7.  Turnover at the close registered a slim 383.1 million shares, compared with 431.2 million Friday.  London markets were closed Monday for a bank holiday.  Of the FT-SE 100 stocks, 11 finished higher, 12 ended unchanged, and the remaining 77 closed lower.  B.A.T retreated 14 pence (22 cents) to 843 pence ($13.19) on volume of 1 million shares in follow-through reaction to news Friday that a U.S. district court judge had ruled against a Hoylake request to remove state regulators from the process of reviewing the change in ownership of insurance companies.  Pearson, a conglomerate, ended 15 pence lower at 775 pence, after reporting a slim 4.5% rise in interim pretax profit.  Dealers said profit-taking was in evidence after the stock's recent rally.  Drug companies Reckitt & Colman and Wellcome, which have both recently enjoyed sharp price gains on the back of new "discovery" drugs, both went into reverse gear as investors took profits.  Reckitt fell 21 to 1253, and Wellcome shed 20 to 693.  Storehouse closed 10 firmer at 148, on rumors that U.S. financier Asher Edleman had sold part of his 29% stake in the company.  Rolls-Royce defied the market's downward bias, and rallied 1 to 186.  Dealers said the move forward was in anticipation of the company's emergency general meeting scheduled for Sept. 15 in which shareholders are expected to support plans to raise the limit on foreign shareholding in the company to 29.9% from 15%.  Reuters benefited from a renewal of U.S. buying interest, and closed 11 firmer at 967.  "It's a very tight market and one major buyer can have a big impact," one trader noted.  SmithKline Beecham jumped 7 to 592 as at least "one major broker pushed the shares," traders said.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Frankfurt and Stockholm; lower in Paris, Zurich, Amsterdam and Milan and mixed in Brussels.  South African gold stocks closed mixed.  Share prices closed higher in Sydney, Seoul, Taipei and Wellington, and were lower in Hong Kong, Singapore and Manila.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 28 Aug 25 Year  @ U.S. ................ 323.9 322.5 + 26.5  @ Britain ............. 719.3 719.3 + 31.7  @ Canada .............. 431.6 432.5 + 17.6  @ Japan ............... 1538.6 1547.6 + 8.3  @ France .............. 536.2 539.6 + 21.1  @ Germany ............. 252.4 252.9 + 21.4  @ Hong Kong ........... 1873.6 1873.6 - 7.7  @ Switzerland ......... 239.9 239.6 + 38.8  @ Australia ........... 354.5 352.7 + 22.1  @ World index ......... 536.4 538.8 + 8.5  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Albertsons Inc. $ .68 ... $ .63 (4) 7.94  @Agnico Eagle $ .39 ... $ .12 (13) 225.00  @Amer Software clA $ .26 ... $ .24 (5) 6.33  Source: Zacks Investment Research  William E. Smith, who had been president of Ryder International Freight & Customs Services until the unit was sold in May, was named vice president, development, of the Airline Services Division of the highway transportation, aviation services and insurance management company.  MICHAEL MILKEN'S children owned about 40% of the Storer Communications Inc. warrants held by an entity known as MacPherson Partners.  MacPherson held only a portion of Storer's warrants.  A previous edition incorrectly stated that Mr. Milken's children owned 40% of all the warrants.  (See: "Milken Arranged for His Three Children to Make Millions Using Storer Warrants" -- WSJ Aug. 28, 1989)  Allen S. Greene, president of Allen S. Greene Co., a New York consulting firm, was named a director of this suburban Philadelphia bank.  Dudley D. Johnson, 50-year-old president of Young & Franklin Inc., was elected a director of this power conversion equipment maker, increasing board membership to nine.  Your Aug. 8, page-one story "New Yorkers Face a Trial to Get a Pet From the ASPCA" does a disservice to New York's most successful pet-adoption program.  The ASPCA has no problem finding good, responsible homes for all of the healthy, adoptable kittens and puppies we receive.  We don't have to euthanize healthy kittens for lack of adoption possibilities.  There are two kinds of health: psychological health and physical health.  Unsocialized animals come back to us in a week if we place them.  But we have an enormous problem finding suitable homes for the tens of thousands of older cats and dogs.  Since most people prefer to adopt a kitten or a puppy, we can be very selective in finding them suitable home environments.  Those whom we judge not ready for kittens and puppies are counseled to consider an older cat or dog.  Since we can place in suitable homes all of the healthy kittens we receive, to imply that our preference is to kill a kitten rather than place it is incorrect.  The article would have performed a real service had it focused on why those individuals not ready for kittens refused more suitable older animals who also desperately needed good companionship and care.  While we do prefer that a sick animal not be taken home with a healthy animal, nothing precludes an adopter from taking home a sick animal, nursing it back to health, and returning to adopt a second animal after the sick one has recovered.  There is no humane society in the country that does not carefully screen potential adopters.  Ms. Davis, one of the "rejected" adopters referred to in your article, never went on an ASPCA adoption "blacklist."  Because of her inability to be home to care for a kitten, she was counseled instead to adopt a cat.  We do everything possible to discourage animal mating because we are aware of the tragic results of animal overpopulation (70,000 unwanted animals are brought to our shelters each year).  Too often, having a pet is thought of as a right rather than a privilege.  Our commitment, however, is to the animal and its well-being, not to the preference of the adopter.  John F. Kullberg  President  ASPCA  New York ---  How can the ASPCA, which claims to prevent cruelty to animals, destroy a kitten rather than let a working man or woman adopt it and give it a loving home?  I can't understand the logic of the statement by the ASPCA's Jeffrey Hon that "A humane death is sometimes preferable to a life of neglect or abandonment."  I adopted two kittens two years ago (both under 12 weeks old) from a league that does not destroy and has a much more "humane" screening process, and I work all day.  The cats are male and female, both neutered at an early age.  I'm proud to say they are content, lovable and well-adjusted.  If you call that a life of neglect and abandonment, that explains the ignorance of your policies.  Joan Kyros  Whitestone, N.Y.  ---  No kitten under eights weeks of age should ever be offered for adoption since its dietary requirements in lieu of its mother's milk almost mandate veterinary supervision.  Once past this threshold, the adoption of a pair of kittens would allow for proper socialization of the animals, as well as alleviate the boredom factor for cats of any age whose owner works.  Refusing adoptions of animals of different genders by the same person serves no practical purpose since the prospective adopter could obtain an animal from another agency, whereas the institution of a free spay/neuter service would serve to mitigate the chances of unwanted litters.  Christine Carroll Hartman  New York  ---  My two cats ("abandoned" every day so I can go out and bring home the Friskies) have asked me to send a message to the humans who set policy at the NYC ASPCA -- a loud Bronx MEOW]  Katie Evans  Bronx, N.Y.  ---  While I trust that the ASPCA is well-intentioned, I do not believe that preventing working people from obtaining kittens is in the animals' best interest -- especially when the alternative is death.  The society's actions are even more deplorable if, as the article suggests, kittens are becoming ingredients for soap.  I work full time and adopted an eight-week-old kitten from a shelter almost 10 years ago.  No one can tell me that his weekday routine of sleeping, eating, and bird watching in air-conditioned comfort is in any way cruel or inhumane.  Amy J. Layton  Bethesda, Md.  ---  As a long-time volunteer on the ASPCA Pet Adoption Van, I could hardly believe the tone your article.  I take great pride in the fact that last year I placed more than 100 animals.  Only two of the animals were returned, and I attribute my success to the screening process the ASPCA has developed after many years of experience.  We can afford to be more selective when placing kittens because so many people want young animals.  If someone wants to adopt a kitten younger than 16 weeks, we like to make sure they will be home to feed the kitten four times a day.  Leaving dry food in an empty apartment just isn't sufficient.  We've seen too many cases of kittens choking on the food, and of male kittens developing kidney trouble from it.  The ASPCA may not make it easy to adopt a pet, but I think anyone who spends a little time with us knows we have the animal's and the adopter's best interests at heart.  That can hardly be said for the woman who says we rejected her.  After all, she could have saved the life of a cat older than 16 weeks.  Unfortunately, she showed no more understanding for the ASPCA than your reporter.  Sissy Arnhold  New York  ---  I'm the manager of an animal shelter.  On the surface, your points are well taken.  However, if one delves further into ASPCA policies, it becomes apparent that those practices are based on experience.  Many times I have seen people obtain a pet when they are routinely away from home for several hours at a time, only to eventually find themselves with a destructive, unhousebroken animal.  The pet is then thrown outside to fend for itself or chained to a dog house or taken to a shelter where it is deemed unadoptable because no one wants to take on someone else's "problems."  While people who adopt young animals of different sexes are generally well-meaning at the time of adoption, sterilization becomes a problem if and when a female is impregnated due to a minor age miscalculation or a slight delay in spaying and/or neutering.  Due to a lack of understanding on your part, a painful and difficult job has been made more so for those of us who work hard every day to try to educate pet owners regarding their responsibilities.  Having witnessed the many problems of adoption firsthand for many years, I could not agree more with Mr. Hon of the ASPCA -- there are many fates worse than death.  Lynn K. Moore  Traverse City, Mich.  Rep. Henry Waxman's Aug. 15 letter to the editor claims that "health experts from the Harvard School of Public Health tell us that air pollution contributes to one out of every 20 premature deaths in the country."  This statement is not an accurate account of what we recently reported to the Congressional Research Service.  Here are the facts:  1.  EPA has estimated that as many as one in every 1,000 deaths each year (not one in 20) may be attributable to inhalation of air toxics.  2.  After a careful scientific review, we found that the EPA estimate does not account for recent mechanistic information showing that low levels of air toxics are not as bad as originally thought.  3.  We recommended that EPA revise their risk estimates to reflect the new scientific knowledge, and to perform more research on the effects of air pollution on nonfatal illnesses.  After reading our report, EPA administrator William Reilly wrote Congress on Aug. 10 and promised that the agency would improve its risk estimates in light of new scientific knowledge.  We encourage EPA to fulfill Administrator Reilly's commitment to the use of science in risk assessment.  John D. Graham  Associate Professor  Harvard University  School of Public Health  Boston  In trying to deal the historic rehabilitation tax credit into the high stakes fight over capital-gains taxation your Aug. 7 editorial "Gentrification's Flying Wedge" got part of the historic preservation story exactly right.  I did say "this tax credit saves old buildings," many of which do anchor successful center-city commerce; for example, the Union stations in Washington, D.C., and St. Louis, Lit Brothers in Philadelphia and the Oahu Farmers Market in Honolulu.  But the gentrification rap is a bum one.  In presenting one of his coveted Private Sector Initiative Awards, President Reagan cited the historic-rehabilitation tax credit as a successful affordable housing and neighborhood revitalization program.  The National League of Cities, Time magazine and 165 congressional co-sponsors have recognized that historic preservation, powered by the economic engine of the historic rehabilitation tax credit, brings life back to our cities.  J. Jackson Walter  President  National Trust for Historic Preservation  Washington  The South Korean government plans to increase its annual per capita income from $4,040 last year to $10,000 by 1996 through an average economic growth rate of 7.5% a year, government officials said.  The Seventh Five-Year Economic and Social Development Plan, to be implemented from 1992 to 1996, will target an annual economic growth rate of 7.5% during the period so that per capita income reaches the $10,000 level by the completion year, officials said.  The gross national product will reach $450 billion by 1996 from $169.2 billion last year, while exports will amount to $145 billion from $60 billion, according to the plan.  Ametek Inc. of Paoli, Pa., said it agreed to acquire Schlumberger Industries Inc.'s Weston unit, a maker of aircraft cockpit instruments.  Terms weren't disclosed, but Ametek indicated the purchase would be made for cash.  The Weston unit, which employs about 200 workers at a plant near Newark, N.J., has annual sales of about $12 million.  Ametek, a manufacturer of industrial products, said Weston makes a line of display gauges that complements the instrument line Ametek already supplies to the same aircraft builders.  Schlumberger Industries is a unit of Schlumberger Ltd. of the Netherlands, which makes oil field service equipment and electronic products.  Winston Resources Inc. said it plans to buy as many as 150,000 shares, or 5%, of its common stock outstanding in the open market from time to time.  The personnel recruiting company said the shares may be used to meet requirements under its employee stock option plan.  In composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, Winston's stock closed yesterday at $1.875 a share, up 12.5 cents.  Panhandle Eastern Corp., a natural gas transmission concern, said it agreed to sell all of the capital stock outstanding of its Youghiogheny & Ohio Coal Co. unit to a subsidiary of closely held Quaker Coal Co., Prestonsburg, Ky., completing the divestiture of all of its coal assets.  Panhandle said it will disclose the purchase price when the deal closes, before year end.  Youghiogheny has total reserves of about 500 million tons of recoverable coal in eastern Ohio, western Pennsylvania and West Virginia.  Quaker produces about six million tons of coal annually.  Hughes Supply Inc. said it acquired closely held Tri Plumbing Supply Inc., a Rockville, Md., wholesale plumbing materials distributor, in a stockswap transaction.  Terms of the swap weren't disclosed.  Hughes, based here, is a wholesale distributor of electrical, plumbing and utility supplies.  If the Webb family of Farmington Hills, Mich., ever held a family reunion it would not be much different from an ordinary working day, which is one reason they never have family reunions.  The Webbs own and operate Jervis B. Webb Co., a world-wide enterprise engaged in engineering, fabricating and installing materials handling equipment.  Fourteen top management jobs are held by descendants of the original Jervis B. or their spouses.  Jervis B. Webb is hardly a mom-and-pop operation.  It grosses between $300 million and $450 million a year, depending on how many projects it has working.  At any given time, it might have as many as 5,000 employees in the field, including its permanent staff of 3,000.  Some of what it produces is fairly high-tech.  For example, it makes computerized, unmanned automatic guided vehicles (AGVs) that shuttle goods around factory or warehouse floors.  The company is growing as it tries to keep up with the world-wide drive to automate manufacturing and distribution systems.  At the top of the family and the company are two engaging gentlemen.  Jervis C. Webb is chairman and his younger brother, George H., is president.  They are sons of the original Jervis B., who founded the company in 1919.  A sister, Joy, doesn't have a title, but her husband, David C. Clark, is third-ranking officer as vice president and treasurer.  On down the line, Jervis C. has three sons, two daughters and a son-in-law and a grandson in the company; George has a daughter and son-in-law and the Clarks have a son and son-in-law in the organization.  The two Webbs take some delight at questions about how it's possible for a family to run a large company without having everyone in a constant state of war.  One gets the impression that they have been so busy doing it that they haven't really thought about it very much.  No doubt having a sense of humor helps and both have that, often answering questions with quips, and asking each other, "Who's going to handle that one?"  Do you have a family trust?  I ask.  "We don't need a trust," replies Jervis C.  "They trust us."  At what point does a family member decide whether he or she wants to be part of the family business?  "Daily," says Jervis C.  Do you have a board of directors?  They seem a little puzzled but then acknowledge that there is indeed a board, made up of five people including one non-family member with a small holding of shares.  "But they don't do anything," says Jervis C. Years ago the brothers decided to fulfill their obligation to have a directors' meeting by going together to opening day of the baseball season at Tiger stadium.  "But our accountants, Cooper & Lybrand, said we couldn't get by with that," says Jervis C.  Despite their joviality about how they run the company, it is quite clear that both approach their responsibilities to family members, employees and customers with all seriousness.  Jervis C. surely must have one of the longest tenures of any CEO in the country.  He had only recently graduated from college when, in 1938, Jervis B. suffered a breakdown in health, thus putting a heavy burden on his eldest son's shoulders.  He officially became chairman in 1952 when his father died.  George came out of college in 1942, helping his brother with the heavy demands the company experienced while industry was tooling up for the war effort.  But George points out that both had a head start in the firm, having begun working for their father during school vacations when they were in their early teens.  Today's laws prevent that, and George says it's annoying because they would like to have some of the grandchildren down in the shop learning the business.  What about the younger generation?  "They're all better than we were," says Jervis C.  "They have talents we didn't have."  Jervis C.'s son Christopher is legal counsel, a job that didn't seem all that important 15 years ago.  "We had to go out and get him," says George.  "He had been through law school and had had five years practicing law.  But we knew we needed somebody.  When he talked to us one night he said, 'You'll never have enough for me.'"  The brothers laugh about that today.  "What have we got now?  Three in-house lawyers and 27 law firms working for us."  It's the defense team, dealing with product liability and all the other issues that face companies in this litigious age.  Chris has no problem finding things to do.  How do other employees feel about family members occupying top spots?  Jervis C. doesn't think it is much of a handicap in attracting talent.  Non-family members run some divisions and subsidiaries and seem happy with the responsibility that entails once they have accepted the limits on advancement.  "I should tell you," says George, "that this is not only the Webb family company, but the whole company is a family company.  We have many third- and fourth-generation people working here.  A father may have worked in the shop, then his son aspired to engineering and his son to sales.  The offspring find that their parents or their grandparents are a lot tougher on them than we are.  We try to promulgate the same feeling with regard to ours."  How do you generate family loyalty?  "The only way we get family feeling in this company is from the company itself and the only way that is accomplished is by practicing what you preach," says George.  The Webbs go their own separate ways, with their own hobbies and interests, but they are essentially a close-knit family.  "I used to be Mr. Outside," says George, who in the early days liked to fly his own plane around the country to make business calls.  "But in 1964 I had a heart attack, so we just switched jobs.  I came inside and he went outside.  Later, we had grown to the extent that we realized it took two of us to do it."  Brother-in-law Clark took over a lot of the things the two had done for civic organizations, business groups and the like.  "He is very good at it," says George.  "It's necessary.  There's no answer to why but it just has to be done.  It's like public relations.  It pays dividends."  The company keeps two Learjets going seven days a week as its managers tend to their world-wide responsibilities.  The younger Webbs are building relationships with customers, some of which have used Webb equipment since the '20s.  That was when Jervis B. began making and selling a "Keystone" conveyor chain that could go from slack to taut without breaking and yet could be disassembled by hand.  It was called "Keystone" not because of design but because of its origin in Pennsylvania.  Ford Motor Co. gave Jervis B. his first big deal when it adopted the Keystone chain for all its conveyors.  At the last family wedding, George's wife counted the total number in the family, including children and in-laws.  It came out to 56.  Without being explicit, the brothers seem to have a fairly clear idea of what the lines of succession will be when they are no longer in charge.  Will Jervis B. Webb survive as a family enterprise?  "It will for at least one more generation," says George.  In today's age of takeovers, LBOs and restructurings, that's about as much continuity as anyone could ask.  Blockbuster Entertainment Corp. said it completed the acquisition of Video Superstore MLP in a stock swap.  The Ft.  Lauderdale-based video-store operator said it turned over 7,875,573 shares of its common stock and reserved another 346,655 shares for issuance when certain stock options by Video's employees are exercised.  Diana Corp. said its 93%-owned unit, Farm House Foods Corp., will use Diana debt in offering a settlement to holders of about $21 million in defaulted Farm House debt.  Holders of Farm House's defaulted 11 1/2% subordinated capital notes due 1989, and its 11% subordinated debentures due 1997, will be offered $75 principal amount of a new Diana 7% convertible debenture due Dec. 1, 1992, for each $100 of their current holdings in the defaulted bonds.  A Diana official said the bonds went into default because Farm House's losses made it impossible to meet required payments.  Farm House, like Diana a Milwaukee holding company, reported a net loss of $26.6 million on revenue of $626.3 million for the year ended April 1.  The latest year included an $11.2 million charge the company took when it sold an investment.  In exchange for the new notes, Farm House will give Diana all its assets, which consist primarily of its about 80% stake in two publicly held companies, Retailing Corp. of America and Entree Corp.  The exchange offer won't be made "for several months," Diana said.  Quick Study  This most concerns me  About "the good read,"  As for info and data I yearn:  If all this reading is  Absorbed and sinks in  Will I end up with "a good learn"?  -- Duane Dewlap.  ---  Morose Prognosticator  As an economic forecaster,  He's known for his gloomy obsessions,  Having confidently predicted  Ten of the last two recessions.  -- George O. Ludcke.  Manville Corp. said its Brazilian unit, Manville Produtos Florestais Ltda., agreed to purchase Papelok S.A., a forest products company of Sao Paulo, Brazil.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The acquisition will add a paper mill and corrugated container plant to the company's operations.  In addition, the agreement gives Manville the use of 22,000 acres of forest land in Brazil.  Daewoo Heavy Industries Ltd. said it signed a $100 million contract with the Lockheed Aeronautical Systems Co. division of Lockheed Corp., Calabasas, Calif., to supply the outer wing for the P-7A long-range, anti-submarine warfare capability aircraft.  The contract, which has the potential of being the largest aircraft parts order awarded to a South Korean company, calls for Daewoo to deliver complete outer wings, beginning in 1991.  Daewoo's contract with Lockheed is significant for the South Korean aerospace industry, because it is the first opportunity to supply fully assembled wings and to be involved in the initial stage of development of the new aircraft model, analysts said.  Daewoo expects to receive more orders for P-7A parts from Lockheed Aeronautical Systems, because the Navy, which designated Lockheed last year as the P-7A manufacturer, will need to replace its current P-3s with the P-7As.  MGM/UA Communications Co. said it set Sept. 23 as the date for its special meeting to approve the company's merger agreement with Qintex Australia Ltd.  The company is mailing proxy materials to shareholders of record Aug. 11.  Under terms of the agreement, Qintex will acquire MGM/UA's United Artists studio and related assets in a transaction valued at around $600 million.  MGM/UA also said that there will be no reduction in the $20 a share to be paid to its shareholders.  A clause in the merger agreement had allowed for an adjustment in the price if the difference between MGM/UA's measured assets and measured liabilities on March 31 was less than $50 million, or if MGM/UA's cash on that date was less than $50 million.  Valeo S.A., under its strategy of reinforcing its electronic auto parts business, said it acquired a 54% controlling interest in closely held G. Cartier Systemes S.A., a French maker of vehicle signaling systems and electronic parts.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Cartier employs 750 people at two factories in France.  It had 1988 revenue of 350 million French francs ($52.9 million).  Banner Industries Inc., a New York-based supplier of replacement parts to the aerospace industry, said it completed the sale of the Space & Defense Electronics business segment of Fairchild Industries Inc. to a unit of Matra S.A. of France.  The company said the operations were sold for $261 million, which includes interest and payment of certain corporate overhead expenses.  Proceeds from the transaction will be used to expand businesses and allow for additional acquisition opportunities, the company said.  Banner acquired Fairchild Industries in an $18-a-share, or $400 million, tender offer last week.  Major Japanese trading companies signed contracts to export 9.59 billion yen ($66.7 million) of goods in July, up 6.2% from a year earlier, partly based on a continuing surge in plant exports, the Japan Foreign Trade Council said.  Import contracts, meanwhile, amounted to 10.29 billion yen, a 3.3% decline from a year earlier.  The July export contracts fell 11.5% from June, and import contracts skidded 35%.  The council's monthly data are based on contract statistics furnished by 18 major Japanese trading houses.  The figures are considered good short-term indicators on trade, as these companies handle about half of Japan's general exports and about two-thirds of imports.  Toshiba Corp., a maker of electronics and consumer products, said its U.S. subsidiary in Irvine, Calif., started producing facsimile equipment for the U.S. market.  Toshiba America Information Systems Inc. began producing desktop facsimile equipment Sunday at an initial production rate of 1,000 units a month, Toshiba said.  Production of the equipment, with functions such as office phone and copier capabilities, will be increased as demand in the U.S. warrants, it said.  Chevron USA Inc., a division of Chevron Corp., received a $220.8 million Defense Logistics Agency contract for jet fuel.  The agency also awarded jet-fuel contracts to Mobil Oil Corp. for $15.6 million, Pride Refining Inc. for $15.5 million, and Crysen Refining Co. for $12.3 million.  FARM & HOME FINANCIAL Corp. won't pay its third-quarter dividend on common stock as a result of the previously announced third-quarter loss related to the restructuring of the balance sheet of a subsidiary.  The company last paid a quarterly dividend of 25.5 cents a common share on June 30.  Farm & Home also omitted the third-quarter dividends on its Series B and C preferred shares, but declared a dividend of 81 1/4 cents a Series A preferred share, payable Sept. 29 to stock of record Sept. 15.  The Nevada, Mo.-based bank holding company said its board plans to resume payment of dividends at an "appropriate" level by the first quarter of 1990.  Asarco Inc., New York, said its Lac d'Amiante du Quebec Ltee unit sold its one-third interest in a limited partnership that mines asbestos in Quebec.  The producer of non-ferrous metals said the unit sold its interest to a company formed by Jean Dupere, chairman of LAB Chrysotile Inc., the limited partnership's general partner.  Asarco said the purchase was made for $11.7 million in cash and notes.  Asarco said the sale will result in an after-tax charge of about $12 million against Asarco's third-quarter earnings.  Asarco declined to forecast third-quarter earnings; in the year-ago quarter, the company earned $46.2 million, or $1.10 a share, on sales of $499.4 million.  Asarco said its unit ended its direct involvement in asbestos mining in July 1986, when it contributed its asbestos operations to a limited partnership formed by the owners of other asbestos-mining operations in the vicinity of Thetford Mines, Quebec.  The sale of the one-third interest in the limited partnership has ended the company's investment in asbestos mining.  The board named three senior vice presidents to the new posts of president of their respective businesses.  The three are Jon E. Cornell, who becomes president, semiconductor sector; Phillip W. Farmer, president, electronic systems; and Guy W. Numann, president, communications sector.  Walt Disney Co. said it acquired Henson Associates Inc., owner of the Muppet characters.  Terms weren't disclosed, but sources placed the transaction, which had been expected, at $150 million to $200 million.  Disney thus gathers up a whole host of new characters to use in its various businesses all over the world.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Disney closed at $116.75, up 25 cents.  Disney management has vastly increased the value of its regular characters like Mickey Mouse and Donald Duck, but needs to expand the company's character base and guard against any of these characters going out of fashion or being overexposed.  Kermit the Frog, Miss Piggy and the rest of the Muppets are known by children all over the world because their TV shows have been widely syndicated.  And Disney, more than perhaps any company, will know what to do with them.  "I don't know if it's a marriage made in heaven," says analyst Lee S. Isgur of PaineWebber Inc., "but both sides are going to benefit."  Henson founder Jim Henson couldn't be reached to comment, but sources said it was he who started the process, contacting Disney's chairman, Michael Eisner, with the idea four months ago.  Mr. Henson had deflected approaches from other companies in the past, including Disney rival MCA Inc., which tried again to get back into the bidding recently, but too late.  Mr. Henson wanted to free himself from administrative pressures, and was eager to gain access to Disney's technological know-how in computer animation and theme park engineering.  Most of all, say those close to Mr. Henson, the transaction was an opportunity for him to ensure that his characters would live forever.  The Henson film library includes five feature films, a total of nearly 300 episodes of three television series, "The Muppets," "Fraggle Rock," and "Muppet Babies," as well as a hodgepodge of other programs.  "And they're all evergreen -- you're dealing with material that does not age," says Walt Disney Studios President Jeffrey Katzenberg.  Disney needs programming to feed its cable service, the Disney Channel, and would take over the world-wide syndication of the properties as soon as existing agreements expire.  Another Henson asset is merchandising potential.  Disney's consumer-products division operates more than 100 retail stores and licenses rights for products like diapers and toys.  Mr. Katzenberg said music and publishing were areas Disney would further explore with the Muppets.  Disney won't own Henson's production company, but will have exclusive rights for its work: Disney says Mr. Henson will create motion pictures and television for the three U.S. networks, for syndication and for the Disney Channel, as well as made-for-home-video.  Mr. Henson also can create new characters, Mr. Katzenberg says.  Mr. Henson will retain the royalty he collects from the Sesame Street characters he helped create but that are owned by the nonprofit Children's Television Workshop.  In other words, Disney has no claim on Big Bird.  The Muppet characters also will populate Disney's theme parks.  Work has already started on a Muppet-based attraction to open in May at Disney/MGM Studios at Walt Disney World in Orlando, Fla., which is seeking more activities for young children.  C. Coleman McGehee, chairman of the executive committee of this bank holding company, will retire Thursday.  Mr. McGehee, 65 years old, has been with the company 41 years.  Albert B. Gornto Jr., president and chief executive officer, will succeed Mr. McGehee as chairman.  John W. Caffry, executive vice president, finance and administration, of Northern Telecom Inc., was named a director of this maker of industrial work clothing, increasing board membership to 11.  Wickes Cos. said it completed the sale of its Elco Corp. unit, Laguna Hills, Calif., to Kyocera Corp., Kyoto, Japan, for about $250 million.  Elco, which has about 1,200 employees, produces electrical connectors and connection systems in the U.S., West Germany and Japan.  Kyocera makes ceramic products, electronic equipment and optical instruments.  Wickes, jointly owned by Blackstone Capital Partners L.P. and Wasserstein Perella Partners L.P., makes automotive and industrial products, wall coverings and decorative fabrics, and operates a home-improvement retail chain.  Monday, August 28, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 13/16% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.75% 30 to 44 days; 8.725% 45 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.875% 30 days; 8.78% 60 days; 8.69% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.29% three months; 8.25% six months; 8.22% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market:8.80% one month; 8.75% three months; 8.70% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.55% 90 days; 8.47% 120 days; 8.42% 150 days; 8.35% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 28, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94%, 13 weeks; 7.88%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.24%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par). 10.18%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.10%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.12%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  The California State Bar moved toward supporting legislation that would allow non-lawyer "legal technicians" to do legal work, but activists asserted that the endorsement was unexpectedly half-hearted.  The bar's governing board approved a resolution acknowledging an "overwhelming unmet need" to make it easier for consumers to obtain legal services and that non-lawyers "may provide greater access so long as their activities do not pose an unreasonable risk of harm to the public."  It also established a 10-person commission, including lawyers and laymen, to recommend areas of practice that might be suitable for non-lawyers, along with training and regulatory plans.  While the step is significant -- California has far more licensed attorneys than any other state, as well as a lively network of non-lawyer practitioners who've been heretofore operating on the edge of the law -- some people had expected the board to outright endorse the concept rather than subjecting it to much further study.  The bar's professional standards committee last month approved what appeared to be a more liberal resolution, drawing plaudits from proponents of legal deregulation -- and a campaign by some lawyer groups to kill or redraw the plan.  About four years ago, Eric Giler's young start-up, Brooktrout Technology Inc., took its first stab at the facsimile technology market.  But the product -- a circuit board that allowed personal computers to send and receive faxes -- seemed too far ahead of its time and so was mothballed.  The facsimile market, after all, was still developing.  A few years made a big difference.  In 1987 the time seemed right to revive the fax attachment.  Using a trade show in Japan as a springboard, Brooktrout launched the device to instant success.  Today, the Wellesley Hills, Mass., company has revenue of $4 million, largely owing to sales of its fax board.  And it's ready to unveil another new fax product, a circuit board that connects a batch of personal computers together and allows them to receive and transmit faxes to one another.  Fax machines are creating new opportunities for entrepreneurs and small businesses.  From companies that use fax machines for mass mailings to those that franchise fax vending machines, "there's a boom in providing new kinds of services through faxes," says Judy Pirani of Bis Cap International, a Norwell, Mass., market-research concern.  Not that fax machines are new.  They've been in use in the U.S. since the early 1970s.  But their popularity grew slowly because transmission often was sluggish, printing messy and machines couldn't "talk" to each other efficiently.  Businesses were also wary of fax projects after a highly touted Federal Express venture to provide fax service floundered and was jettisoned in 1987.  The Federal Express service, which allowed businesses and individuals to send faxes from the company's stores, came too early and was too expensive, analysts say.  But with the adoption of a technology standard known as Group III fax protocol, which came into wide use about two or three years ago, fax transmission has become both fast and simple.  What's more, increasingly sophisticated and faster systems are being developed constantly.  As it is, the installed base of fax machines and the rate of growth are enough to create a booming new industry.  Bis Cap expects the U.S. to have 3.4 million fax machines in use by the end of this year, up from about two million at the end of last year.  There were just one million fax machines in use in the U.S. in 1987.  The large installed base has prompted many companies that previously did mass mailings to switch to fax technology.  Instant Information Inc. is one.  The Boston-based company maintains mailing lists for big corporations and used to handle big mailings.  But it has since switched to faxes for those mailings because they are "more effective and strategic," says Randy Cabell, president of Instant Information.  Because big companies such as Western Union Corp. and MCI Communications Corp. already were offering bulk fax-mailing services to customers, Instant Information had to position itself differently.  With computer integration of the faxes, customers can personalize each fax communication.  When a Boston tour operator sends notices of last-minute vacancies to its 700 agents every week through Instant Information, the notices are specifically addressed and include only travel information relevant to each agent.  Customers can send specific messages to each recipient without any additional cost.  And unlike Western Union and MCI, which are responsible only for transmission, "we do everything from finding fax numbers to {determining} why things don't work," such as if a fax can't be received on the other side, Ms. Cabell says.  Other small businesses are trying to meld the fax revolution with the franchise boom.  Fax Corp. of America is selling distributorships for what is essentially a fax vending machine operated by credit card.  The Little Falls, N.J., company charges each distributor a flat $20,000 plus about $4,000 for each machine installed.  Users are billed directly through their credit cards at the end of each month.  Fax Corp. collects that revenue, and sends each distributor a check for its billings minus 15% in management fees.  Entrepreneurs also are creating a niche helping fax users to cut costs.  Robert Ryan is linking up with a major telecommunications company to create Faxnet Inc., a Rockville, Md., company that promises to lower fax transmission costs and provide higher quality prints.  By using telephone lines exclusively for fax, transmission costs could be cut by as much as 25%, Mr. Ryan says.  And the use of proprietary technology within the network will allow for faster transmission and better printing.  Faxnet, which has received about $10 million in capital from private investors, plans to offer its service early next year.  Two other entrepreneurs saw an opportunity in marrying fax and publishing.  Harvey Golomb and James Rutt started their company, Pinpoint, in 1988 to offer what they call "customized electronic publishing via facsimile."  In September, Pinpoint will begin publishing Computer Focus, a daily computer-industry newsletter that will be delivered by fax.  It may be more convenient, but it's not as cheap as stopping by the newsstand: The subscription price is $1,800 annually.  Why the high cost: Each subscriber can specify subjects and companies he is most interested in, and "we will tailor the newsletter for him," says Mr. Golomb.  Pinpoint's venture isn't risk-free, considering the price and the glut of computer-industry writings.  A well-backed computer industry daily launched by Ziff-Davis Publishing Co. failed in 1986.  Agency Rent-A-Car Inc., already embroiled in a management and operating crisis, announced the departure of its second president in less than a year.  The sudden resignation of 42-year-old Kenneth J. Lorek, who also was chief financial officer, surprised some analysts.  Mr. Lorek, who joined the company as chief financial officer in 1984, was considered a loyal protege of Agency's founder, Sam J. Frankino.  He was named president last October, after the abrupt resignations of former President Vincent T. Garrenton Jr. and Treasurer Edward D. Hammer.  "The resignation comes as a complete surprise," said Elliott L. Schlang, an analyst at Prescott, Ball & Turben Inc., Cleveland.  He said it appeared Mr. Lorek was fired.  But Charles H. Finnie of Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. said Mr. Lorek "may have gotten worn down" as the company has struggled to improve earnings.  Mr. Finnie said he was surprised by Mr. Lorek's departure because the former president "had been with the company for a long time and was believed a loyal disciple of Frankino's."  Others interpreted Mr. Lorek's resignation as a sign that the Solon, Ohio, concern may be closer to being sold.  Rumors about a possible sale have dogged Agency for the past five months, since Mr. Frankino disclosed he might sell his 54% stake in the company.  The speculation has helped prop up the price of Agency's stock in the wake of a 47% decline in profit for its first quarter ended April 30.  Analysts forecast that fiscal-year earnings, excluding extraordinary charges, might decline for the first time since the company went public in 1983.  Some analysts are estimating that Agency in the year ending Jan. 31 will earn about 85 to 95 cents a share, compared with fiscal 1989 net income of about $23.4 million, or $1 a share.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Agency shares closed at $17.25, up 12.5 cents.  The 65-year-old Mr. Frankino, the chairman and chief executive officer who founded the company in the early 1970s, assumed the title of president.  Mr. Frankino declined to be interviewed.  A company spokesman said that Mr. Lorek's resignation was accepted Friday.  Mr. Lorek couldn't be reached for comment, and the spokesman refused to offer any reason why he stepped down.  Agency is in the business of renting cars to insurance companies' clents whose own vehicles have been wrecked or stolen.  In June, Agency said sales of rental cars could result in a $5 million charge against earnings for fiscal 1990.  Analysts earlier said a significant part of Agency's fleet of about 41,000 cars were Chrysler Corp. K-cars, which haven't fared well in the resale market.  The Agency spokesman said the company has made "significant inroads in rapidly depleting the inventory of K-cars."  Agency also has been plagued by competition from such companies as Action Auto Rental Inc., which was formed by four former top Agency executives.  Jon Hendricks, Dave Lambert, and the wittiest of all hipsters, Annie Ross -- but in a club or concert hall, there were nights when they sounded like a big band in full cry.  Neither before nor since has there been a jazz vocal group with so much infectious delight in its swinging vocation.  Unlike singing groups that used the lyrics of standard tunes as launch pads for improvisation, this trio's basic repertory consisted of putting lyrics to celebrated, and not so celebrated, jazz instrumental solos.  For instance, Peanuts Holland's trumpet solo on Charlie Barnet's "Charleston Alley" or Ben Webster's roller-coaster tenor solo on Duke Ellington's recording of "Cottontail."  The resident lyricist was Hendricks, whose years inside the jazz scene gave him an easy command of the spoken jazz idiom backstage and in bars.  For all the fun they obviously were having as they sang and scatted, members of the trio tried to do justice to the instrumental inventions they were appropriating.  The musicians whose horn solos had been transformed into vocal flights by Lambert, Hendricks & Ross listened to the changes with much proprietary interest.  Usually, they were not disappointed.  Once, at the Newport Jazz Festival, trumpeter Buck Clayton said to Hendricks, "That solo of mine you sang on 'Goin' to Chicago' is the prettiest thing I ever heard in my life."  "Well, Buck," Hendricks replied, "I didn't do anything but put words to what you played."  Clayton looked at him.  "Did I play all of that?"  On the other hand, there was the time Ross vocalized a Miles Davis solo on "Now's the Time" in a way characterized by Hendricks as "fatuous" and "limp."  Months later, Hendricks -- as he recalled in an interview in the jazz magazine, Cadence -- was in a Toronto restaurant about to address a steak.  Miles Davis walked in, sat down, pushed Hendricks aside, and ate the steak.  "Man," said the astounded and aggrieved Hendricks, "you ate my steak]"  "You mess with my solos," said Davis, "I mess with your food."  The audience for Lambert, Hendricks & Ross consisted of far more than musicians checking out the use of their inventions.  During its life, 1957 to 1964 (Ross left in 1962), the trio had an enthusiastic following here and abroad.  A key element of its appeal was the scat-singing prowess of all three vocalists.  This form of high-speed wordless improvisation requires instant imagination.  In Columbia's current release of Lambert, Hendricks & Ross -- "Everybody's Boppin'," in its Jazz Masterpieces series -- there is a particularly jubilant scat-singing duel between Lambert and Hendricks on the title track.  But exultant scat singing abounds on most of the other cuts as well.  The sounds the group made on recordings could be so complex and multilayered that I was sure much of it was overdubbed until I first saw and heard Lambert, Hendricks & Ross in a club.  The foundation of this natural light show was the original, actual sounds of the horn solos they chose to illuminate.  "I insisted," Hendricks told me recently, "that they try, with their voices, to get the timbre of the instrument that played the original solo."  But the result went beyond imitation.  In the ensemble passages and in the solos themselves, the irrepressible temperaments of the singers brought textures, flavors and dynamics to the music that was the sole property of Lambert, Hendricks & Ross.  Dave Lambert, a gentle man, died in 1966, characteristically trying to help somebody.  He saw a motorist struggling to change a tire, stopped to help, and was hit by a passing car.  Ross, originally from England, moved back there for a while but now is based in Los Angeles.  Although she still occasionally sings, she now works mostly at film acting.  Included in this Columbia Lambert, Hendricks & Ross retrospective is one of Ross's abiding triumphs, "Twisted," based on Wardell Gray's tenor solo.  Its message, as Dave Lambert used to say, is: "Anybody who goes to a psychiatrist ought to have his head examined."  Hendricks is still the precise director of a singing group, Jon Hendricks and Company.  It consists of his wife, Judith, his daughter, Aria, and Kevin Burke.  "Each night we work," Hendricks says, "I say to the audience that we are dedicated to the perpetuation of the sound of Lambert, Hendricks & Ross, the greatest vocal group ever to perform on the planet Earth."  "After I say that," Hendricks laughs, "I wait for someone to contradict me.  And it never happens."  ---  Mr. Hentoff is a New York-based writer and jazz critic.  Compaq Computer Corp. said it reduced prices on some of its desktop 386-based computers.  The reductions, ranging from 3.6% to 13% or $300 to $1,300, were in line with analysts' expectations.  Compaq said the lower prices on these models "will maintain their competitive position as superior performance alternatives to other 80386-based personal computers."  International Business Machines Corp., Compaq's main competitor, cut prices on some of its models earlier this year.  Compaq's price reductions were the first since the models were introduced about a year ago, said Michele Preston, analyst with Salomon Brothers Inc.  "They were due for price reductions," she said.  Other analysts also noted that prices on new computer models are usually reduced as much as 20% after about a year on the market.  Furthermore, Compaq has recently introduced a higher-powered 386-based model and plans to introduce a 486-based model later in the year.  With new models coming on the market, "there's always repositioning of older products," said Ms. Preston.  Prices were cut on the Deskpro 386/25 Model 60 about 3.6%, the Model 110 about 13%, and the Model 300 about 10%.  Prices on the 386/20E Model 40 were cut about 7.6% and Model 110 by about 12.5%.  A large chunk of plaster crashed down from the ceiling of the Berlin Philharmonic concert hall one afternoon, minutes before a rehearsal.  Bauhaus architect Hans Scharoun's creation has started to crumble, and a film-thin net now protects audiences from the falling debris.  The hall, with its exterior of bumpy gold-colored aluminum that gives it the look of a garish egg box from outer space, is to close in 1991 for a year of radical restoration work.  The orchestra that calls it home is also about to experience some changes.  Helmless since Herbert von Karajan died in July, three months after his controversial resignation, the Philharmonic has decided to select a new permanent conductor by the end of October.  When Karajan was elected by unanimous vote during the 1955 American tour (he later negotiated a lifelong pact), he was the only obvious candidate.  Today, the orchestra has a fistful of top-flight musicians to choose from.  Various conductors, like Zubin Mehta, Claudio Abbado and Daniel Barenboim, had been mentioned.  Lorin Maazel heads the short list, which also includes Bernard Haitink and Riccardo Muti.  Leonard Bernstein's stock has risen, and Semyon Bychkov delighted the orchestra when he conducted it in Shostakovich's Sixth.  Seiji Ozawa is spoken of, although he seems likely to want to concentrate more on his work in Japan.  James Levine gave a thrilling concert with the orchestra last May in East Berlin.  More exciting still was the earlier concert by Carlos Kleiber that led some musicians here to declare that he is the only conductor today who has that Karajan magic.  All these conductors have worked at least once, if not more frequently, as guests with the Philharmonic.  Some of them don't speak German, a handicap in an almost exclusively German orchestra.  Even if no clear trend is yet detectable, a few things are certain.  Karajan's successor will have a classical romantic repertoire, from Beethoven to Mahler and Richard Strauss, and he needs charismatic appeal to ensure the continuation of Karajan's brilliant handling of the recording and video industry.  He will spend much more time with the orchestra than Karajan did in his later years.  He also is thoroughly unlikely, this time, to be given the autocratic authority of a contract for life.  Whoever takes over after Karajan's 34-year reign will be stepping into some pretty big shoes -- before Karajan the orchestra was led by Hans von Bulow, Arthur Nikisch and Wilhelm Furtwangler.  Over more than a century, the Philharmonic has developed into a perfectly tuned instrument with a distinctive silky sound, even if its critics have sometimes called the Karajan style technocratic.  Conductor Karl Bohm once declared that the Berlin Philharmonic was unique among great orchestras in that it "never falls below the standard of Alpha."  The relationship between Karajan and his orchestra was often compared to a marriage.  Some even went so far as to analyze the conflicts of recent years in psychoanalytic terms, describing them as the rebellion of sons against a powerful father figure.  Opinion in Berlin is that Karajan died of a broken heart.  "It was a psychologically induced death," conductor Erich Leinsdorf has said.  "The circumstances of his resignation in Berlin hit him hard because he was so proud of what he had done for the city's musical life."  Founded in 1882, the Philharmonic enjoys the unique status of having worked under only four conductors.  This may go some way toward explaining the confidence of its sound, and the extreme self-assurance of its 115 musicians as a group of professionals in an institution that has always been run along democratic lines.  When members of the orchestra state their profession on official documents, they simply call themselves Philharmonikers, a job title holding prestige similar to that of surgeon or judge.  The Philharmonikers are also among Berlin's highest-paid citizens.  And a rotating system gives them generous time off to work in chamber ensembles, teach or simply go skiing.  The same musicians make up two different, autonomous orchestras.  As the Berliner Philharmonisches Orchester, they are the concert-playing orchestra of West Germany's City State, employed as public servants by the Cultural Senate of Berlin.  The Berliner Philharmoniker, on the other hand, is a musicians' collective, working as a private company under various lucrative recording contracts.  Until the early '80s, it recorded exclusively with Karajan for Deutsche Grammophon and EMI; later, it broke away from his hegemony and worked under several conductors with other recording companies.  The orchestra has always chosen its own permanent conductor.  Karajan's successor will be selected through a series of carefully established voting procedures.  Cellist Hans Haussler, one of the orchestra's two official representatives to the Senate, explains that several rounds of votes, followed by discussions, will involve every instrumentalist who has finished the two-year probationary period.  Herr Haussler will then approach the conductor before negotiations on contract terms are handed over to the Senate.  Although that body has right of veto, it's unlikely to exercise it.  "Any new conductor will necessarily be much more expensive than Karajan," says Anke Martiny, the new Social-Democratic Senator for Culture, who forks out the Philharmonic's 20 million DM ($10.2 million) yearly subsidy.  "We will probably have to pay him as much as he wants, although we hope that he will consider the prestige of the job."  The going had been rough between Karajan and his musicians over the past few years.  The first series of conflicts arose over Karajan's exclusive recording contracts and his private deals with concert organizers.  The major battle of wills occurred when Karajan hired clarinet player Sabine Meyer in 1982, against the musicians' insistence that her sound did not blend with theirs.  Ms. Meyer quit before the end of her probationary period, but the conflict continued until the ailing Karajan resigned in April.  Though the relationship had irremediably soured, the dissonance was never reflected in the music.  Says Michael Jenne, head of the Berlin-based Jeunesses Musicales World Orchestra, "Even weak and ill, Karajan was still able to galvanize.  His performance of Brahms' First Symphony two years ago is the most exciting I have ever heard."  Despite the Meyer contretemps, the Philharmonic has begun to change with the times.  Since then, three women, all strings, have joined the once fiercely sexist orchestra, and a lot more women are expected in the future.  Next year, in another first, the Philharmonic will play in Israel, under Daniel Barenboim.  The contract was signed shortly after Karajan resigned.  "For years, the orchestra has had an open invitation to play in Israel, but without Karajan because of his suspected Nazi connections," says Helge Grunewald, the Philharmonic's press officer.  Even if Karajan has left the orchestra with some feeling of resentment, it seems to be subsiding into mellow retrospective admiration.  Horn player Stefan Jezierski, one of two Americans in the group, qualifies Karajan's musical temperament in a few words: "Charisma, class, beauty of sound, depth of phrasing and a capacity to communicate with the audience, like a wire conducting electricity."  As the names of possible replacements drift about like clouds, the special spirit that characterizes the Berlin Philharmonic appears to live on.  "The Philharmonic was a great orchestra before Karajan," says Mr. Jezierski, "and there's no reason why this should ever change."  ---  Ms. Grauman lives in Brussels and covers the arts in the European Community.  Bobby Jones, who was every inch a golfer and whose swing was classic, won two of his five U.S. Amateur championships at the tight, rugged old Merion course in this Main Line suburb of Philadelphia.  The two fellows who had it out for that title here on Sunday were a bit, uh, un-Joneslike.  The winner, 21-year-old Chris Patton, is some kinda golfer all right, but there are a lot of inches of him, both vertically (he stands 6-foot-1) and horizontally (he weighs 300-odd pounds).  His form bespeaks long drives and longer meals, but appearances can be deceiving.  The best parts of his game last week were iron shots and short putting.  As for food, the Clemson University senior who resides on Scuffletown Road in Fountain Inn, S.C. (pop. 4,200), expressed himself thusly:  "I'm really not that big an eater. {Pause} Don't get me wrong, I can eat, but not a lot at one time.  I could put away a meal every hour if I let myself."  The runner-up was Danny Green, a 32-year-old three-handicapper from Jackson, Tenn.  He's a stocky guy with a self-taught swing that's more of a lunge than a stroke, and he aims every shot to the right of his target to compensate for what he calls a "natural" pull.  "I saw myself play on TV once, and thought, 'Oh, I'm a disgrace to the game of golf]'" he confessed.  But Green pulled the upset of the tournament on Saturday when he defeated two-time champion and local favorite Jay Sigel of Berwyn, Pa., on the first extra hole of their 18-hole quarter-final, and he lasted until the 35th hole of Sunday's final before a buried lie did him in.  The score on Sunday was 3-and-1, which is match-play talk for three holes up with one hole remaining.  The U.S.  Am is settled via the sort of head-to-head tussles that make up the bulk of average-guy play.  It's a long haul -- the two finalists played a 36-hole medal qualifying round and five 18-hole matches before their 36-hole showdown -- but what the heck, it's golf, and the amateurs play for fun, or so it says here.  The sponsoring U.S. Golf Association was formed to conduct the Amateur, and first did so in 1895.  That was 30 years after Merion was organized as a vehicle for young Philadelphians to play cricket.  It was as the Merion Cricket Club that it hosted the 1926 and '30 tourneys that Bobby Jones won.  The latter title capped Jones's famous "Grand Slam" when the Amateur was part of golf's regal quadrumvirate, along with the U.S. and British opens and British Am.  In recent, more mercenary, times, the pro-based Masters and PGA championships have supplanted the simonpure outings in "Slam" status.  The U.S. Amateur has reflected that orientation of late, with collegians (read that "apprentice pros") usually prevailing.  This time the working guys got a bit the better of it, Patton excepted.  Three of the four semifinalists survive, if not prosper, on their own paychecks.  Jerry Courville, who bowed to Green, two up, in the penultimate round, is an expediter for Pitney-Bowes Inc. in Norwalk, Conn.  His victims included Scotsman Jim Milligan, a member of the recently victorious British Walker Cup team.  Patton's semifinal foe, Michael Brannan, is a golf club manufacturer's rep who made an early-week splash by defeating British ace and tourney medalist Eoghan O'Connell in round two and U.S. Walker Cupper David Eger in the third.  Green is a sometime insurance and real estate broker who helps out in his father's optician shop when he works at all, which he admits isn't much during golf season.  He's wise in other ways too, as evidenced by his reason for switching from tennis, his collegiate sport, to golf upon graduation.  "Why," he asked, "should I run around on hot cement when I can ride a cart on cool grass?"  Patton's easygoingness is best expressed in his swing.  He can convert his pork to torque when the occasion requires, but, mostly, he seeks accuracy; more often than not he drove with irons last week.  The key to his win, he said, was this ability to temporize.  "Sometimes you have to hit the middle of greens and get par," he noted, in a comment worthy of Curtis Strange.  Patton had all he could do to hold Green even early on Sunday.  His drives hit only one fairway on the first six holes, all of which were halved.  He gained his first advantage on the 11th hole, which was to be Green's bugaboo all day.  Both players hacked up the picturesque, 369-yard par four in the morning, but Green's six overhacked Patton's five.  Patton was ahead by two when 11 was approached again, as the day's 29th hole.  This time, Green's nine-iron second shot splashed into a creek in front of the green to set up another double-bogey.  Patton hit the green in two and was conceded his birdie putt.  Patton's best shot of the day came on the next hole, a 378-yard par four.  After Green hit an eight-iron to within 10 feet of the cup, Patton smacked a nine iron to two feet, and made his birdie putt after Green missed his.  That gave him a four-hole edge with six holes left, and although he lost two of them the lead held.  The match ended after Green's two-iron on the par-three, 222-yard 35th buried itself in the lip of a greenside trap.  He took a penalty and chipped on, but conceded the hole, and the match, after Patton putted to within two feet of a par.  The new champ doesn't think he's any relative of Billy Joe, the old golfer, or George, the late general, "because they don't show up at family reunions."  He said he took up golf at age 13, out of boredom and because other kids kept going for his knees in football.  He said he's an "OK" athlete generally, and not much of a worker.  He thanked his parents, Clemson golf coach Larry Penley, and an unnamed ex-girlfriend for "getting on my butt when I got lazy."  Penley was on hand to say that big Chris isn't really lazy, and a far better than average jock.  "For hand-eye coordination, 'feel' and composure, he's the best I've seen," said the coach.  "People like him, too; he's got charisma.  The pros can use him."  That they can.  Summit Technology Inc. said it received approval from the Food and Drug Administration to begin clinical trials of a special laser that removes blockages in coronary arteries.  Trials will be conducted on about 100 patients over 18 months to two years, the medical products maker said.  The laser method vaporizes deposits within the arteries, as opposed to the widely used balloon angioplasty technique, which compresses deposits.  If approved for general use, the laser system would allow doctors to operate on patients who wouldn't normally be candidates for bypass surgery because of extensive arterial blockage or because these patients' arteries are too thin.  Summit also said it was issued a patent by the Patent Office for a coupling device that guides the beam to the clogged mass, away from normal tissue.  The patent provides the company protection on its fiber-optic system for angioplasty.  Each unit is to sell for about $220,000, the company said.  Although Ken Follett's new novel is a chore to read, it is easy for a reviewer to put down.  Throw the book anywhere (being careful to see that pets and small children who might be crushed by its bulk are out of the way) and it likely will fall open to a quotable passage.  It is a cornucopia of banality.  First, a few words from the beautiful and brave Aliena:  -- "But William was a real servant of the devil.  Aliena thought: When will we be rid of this monster?"  -- "Oh, Richard, you're caught in a terrible web, and it's all because you saved me."  Now, William's point of view:  -- "Torturing a man without killing him was like stripping a girl naked without raping her."  The monster reflecting in old age:  -- "William had lost count of the alehouses they had wrecked, the Jews they had tormented and the virgins they had deflowered."  If you want to learn more, such as whether one of those deflowered virgins was the brave and beautiful Aliena, or whether she ever does get rid of monster William, rush $22.95 to your nearest bookseller for a copy of Mr. Follett's 973-page 12th-century historical romance "The Pillars of the Earth" (William Morrow).  A problem in writing about times long ago is a novelist's uncertainty about his voice.  How did people talk way back then?  How did they express affection, anger, lust?  The writer must invent his diction and create his tone.  Mr. Follett seems to have decided that 12th-century Englishmen favored 20th-century cliches ("mindless brute," "hot and bothered"), and, while their diction was simple to begin with, they nevertheless took terrible pains to make everything very clear, as though explaining themselves to children.  Here, for example, is a mother's advice to her son: "Don't start asking me who accused him and why.  Don't get caught in that trap.  You could spend the rest of your life trying to put right a wrong done before you were born.  I didn't raise you so that you could take revenge.  Don't make that your life."  Occasionally, though, facial expressions save a few words of such explanations: "William stared at Waleran, mesmerized, despite his own fear, by the naked ambition revealed on the bishop's normally stony face.  Waleran as pope?  Anything was possible."  Any metaphor, for example.  Here is a prior thinking about sex: "Lust never completely ceased to afflict him, but it did eventually become less important, so that it bothered him only now and again, on the rare occasions when his mind and body were idle; like an old injury that still hurts in wet weather."  Not only metaphors make merry here.  Characters often summarize the action, a habit that might prove helpful to anyone skimming the novel, but is only tiresome or ridiculous to the diligent reader getting through "The Pillars of the Earth" one page at a time.  The brave and beautiful Aliena provides one of the more ridiculous examples of this motif:  "She stared miserably at the old, cold ashes in Richard's fireplace, wondering why she always had such bad luck.  Here she was trying to make the best of a bad marriage and she had the misfortune to be pregnant by another man, after one single act of intercourse."  Mr. Follett has written six No. 1 best-selling spy stories in which his voice was confident and his plotting sure.  He explains in a brief note that cathedrals have always fascinated him and that "The Pillars of the Earth" is the result of his long-held desire to write a novel about building a cathedral.  Mr. Follett's note might lead one to expect that this is a novel about cathedral-building as "Moby Dick" is a novel about whaling, but its architectural elements, the birth of Gothic style and 12th-century building techniques, are submerged beneath the sex and violence.  "The Pillars of the Earth" is being launched with the kind of publicity only a six-time leader of the best-seller lists warrants.  William Morrow has ordered a 400,000-copy first printing and a $400,000 advertising and promotion budget.  With such buttresses, who cares about its internal, between-the-covers supports?  It will not settle into the obscurity likely to envelop John Andrews's first novel, "A Viking's Daughter" (Doubleday, 307 pages, $18.95).  Yet, "A Viking's Daughter" can make claims for our attention every bit as vivid as "The Pillars of the Earth."  It offers plenty of 11th-century Viking sex and violence and what its publisher describes as "a feminist bent."  The bent, I suppose, is that its hero is Gudrid, a remarkable woman, and its sex includes lesbianism.  Mr. Andrews, a physicist at Brookhaven National Laboratory on Long Island, has drawn his fiction with care from Icelandic sagas.  His Gudrid is one of the Vikings to reach North America, Vinland, as they called it.  The tale is high adventure, albeit encumbered by some patches of prose that would not seem out of place were they pasted into "The Pillars of the Earth."  Vikings, of course, by their choices of names did not make it easy for us to take them completely seriously.  It's hard not to smile and wonder whether Robin Williams is in charge upon encountering a woman named Aud the Deep-Minded.  Or upon reading this paragraph: "In the morning Sigunna brought porridge to Gudrid and to Hakon, Runolf's son, and Mord, the son of Floki." ---  Mr. Lescaze is foreign editor of the Journal.  Someone probably thought it was a good idea at the time: Contract to private industry the vital but dangerous task of manufacturing nuclear weapons.  And, during the late 1940s and early 1950s, the Atomic Energy Commission did just that.  The contractors were among the biggest, most respectable names in American business -- Du Pont, Dow, National Lead, Westinghouse, Rockwell, Martin Marietta.  The commission remained in firm control, however, and the weapons manufacturers simply followed orders.  Congressional oversight was as much an oxymoron then as now and, 40 years later, the consequences of that decision, made in the secrecy engendered by the mood of the Manhattan Project, are appallingly apparent.  The Atomic Energy Commission and its successor, the Department of Energy, have presided over a nuclear weapons program that has poisoned both the environment and two generations of Americans who work at or live near the 17 major facilities in 12 states where nuclear weapons and their components have been produced.  Why did it all go wrong?  Retired Adm. James D. Watkins, the new secretary of energy, admitted earlier this summer that the Energy Department simply did not have enough technically qualified people to oversee nuclear weapons production.  But blaming the fiasco on incompetent or unqualified personnel is too pat an answer.  Worse, the solution this explanation points toward -- greater funding, technological fixes -- only paper over the basic mistakes the government has made and continues to make in the nuclear weapons program.  Involving private industry was not a bad decision.  Government does it all the time.  But, in this case, the companies were insulated from legal liability by a provision in their contracts indemnifying them against damages caused by operation of the weapons facilities, including negligently inflicted damage.  The nuclear weapons program's private contractors, unlike firms in the marketplace, did not have to self-insure or to obtain insurance in connection with their manufacturing operations.  The manufacturers simply did not have a vested interest in the safe operation of their plants.  Not only did the contracts indemnify the weapons manufacturers, they also contained incentive clauses that rewarded production without regard to the environment, safety and health.  The contracts provided that the Energy Department would cover costs, plus an annual fee composed of a guaranteed base payment and a performance bonus.  The achievement of production goals made up 40% to 50% of the bonus; safety less than 10%.  Once confronted with the consequences of their first two mistakes -- lawsuits from individuals whose property or person had been poisoned -- the government and the contractors tried to hide behind national security and sovereign immunity.  The litigation was drawn out by government lawyers.  One landmark case was filed in federal court in 1975; the government managed to delay the handing down of a decision until 1981.  The plaintiff, Charles McKay, told the National Law Journal: "There were 38 or 40 lawyers for the other side, beating on my one guy and maybe his associate.  The U.S. government had unlimited stakes and just kept raising the ante."  The court dismissed the plaintiff's charges, but the following year an appellate panel overturned that ruling and held that weapons manufacturers were liable for their negligence.  Even after that appellate ruling, the government continued to defend the bombmakers under the indemnification provisions of their contracts, most recently in federal litigation brought by neighbors of the Fernald, Ohio, weapons facility.  A principal element of the defense was the contention that the manufacturers should not be held liable for the consequences of their conduct because they were only following the government's orders.  This Nuremberg defense failed to persuade the jury: In a non-binding summary trial, a federal panel in Cincinnati rendered a verdict against NLO Inc., a subsidiary of NL Industries, and the former operator at Fernald, of $81 million in compensatory damages and an additional $55 million in punitive damages.  Within two weeks, the government agreed to a settlement of $73 million.  Last month, the Energy Department proposed spending $21.5 billion over the next five years to clean up contamination at weapons sites, repair equipment and fund research into new methods of disposing of nuclear waste.  Earlier this summer, Secretary Watkins stated that future contract bonuses would be based on safety and environmental performance, not production goals.  But these reforms are not enough.  Memories can fade.  The media spotlight will shift, Congress will occupy itself elsewhere, and 20 years from now we may face a new scandal.  Essentially, the proposed reforms depend far too much on one tentacle of bureaucracy policing another.  The same Justice Department that sent its FBI agents this summer in a raid on the Rocky Flats nuclear facility seeking evidence of unsafe and illegal practices contemporaneously employed the lawyers who argued to that Cincinnati jury that NLO Inc. should not be responsible for the harm it had caused because it was just following orders.  Any program of lasting reform must have the protection of individual rights as a cornerstone.  Here is how to do it:  First, Congress should insist that the Department of Energy remove indemnification clauses from all future contracts with weapons manufacturers and negotiate a buy-out of those clauses from existing contracts.  The makers must have a financial interest in the safe operations of these facilities.  Negligence should have consequences.  Today there are none.  Tomorrow, there will be none so long as the manufacturers can rely on the Justice Department to send its lawyers into court to defend them while the Energy Department pays the monetary judgments that result.  Even under the present rules of tort law, and their creative and excessive damage awards, such a reform should not drive bombmakers out of business, leaving Washington in the lurch.  The government can continue to indemnify them against verdicts based upon strict liability, the doctrine of liability without fault that has been imposed upon ultra-hazardous activity by the common law, rather than negligence.  The government may have to pay more for nuclear weapons in lieu of an indemnifaction against negligence, but there will still be companies with sufficient confidence in their competence to take the risk -- if the reward is large enough.  Second, Congress should amend the Federal Tort Claims Act and retroactively waive the sovereign immunity defense in all litigation involving nuclear weapons facilities.  Under the act as interpreted by the Supreme Court, a harm inflicted by government while discharging a "discretionary duty" (undefined in the act), is not covered.  As one sympathetic federal judge noted in a case seeking to recover for injuries and deaths from radioactive fallout after open-air atomic bomb tests in Nevada in the 1950s and 1960s: "It undoubtedly will come as a surprise to many that two hundred years after we threw out King George III, the rule that 'the king can do no wrong' still prevails at the federal level in all but the most trivial of matters. . . .  This case dramatically illustrates that the FTCA (and for that matter Congress' injunction that a program be carried out safely) is largely a false promise in all but 'fender benders' and perhaps some cases involving medical malpractice by government doctors."  So long as weapons manufacturers are indemnified by the government for their negligence and the government can hide behind sovereign immunity, the individual rights of victims will be discounted.  That was not a good idea 40 years ago.  It has not improved with age.  ---  Mr. McMenamin is a lawyer in Cleveland and a contributing editor at Reason magazine.  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ Aug. 25, Aug. 18,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.98 7.95  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.66 8.66  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.76 8.76  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 9.01 9.04  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.83 8.75  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 8.36 8.30  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 8.33 8.23  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 8.26 8.20  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 8.23 8.18  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 8.19 8.17  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, August 23, 1989 and Wednesday August 16, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  A federal judge dismissed Twin Laboratories Inc.'s antitrust lawsuit against Weider Health & Fitness, a rival in the market for nutritional supplements for bodybuilders.  The suit, filed in February, had charged that Weider, Woodland Hills, Calif., was preventing competition in the companies' industry by refusing to sell advertising space to Twin Labs in two magazines published by Weider-Flex and Muscle & Fitness.  Twin Labs, Ronkonkoma, N.Y., said its own magazine, Muscular Development, isn't an effective alternative because it doesn't reach as large an audience as Weider's publications.  U.S. District Judge Michael B. Mukasey in New York found that Weider made a "legitimate and responsible business decision" in halting sales of ad space to Twin Labs.  Grant Clark, an attorney for Twin Labs at Rivkin, Radler, Dunne & Bayh in Washington, said Twin Labs disagreed strongly with Judge Mukasey's ruling and expects to file an appeal.  Gulf Resources & Chemical Corp.'s proposed reorganization, which would make it a subsidiary of a newly formed Bermuda-based holding company, may allow it to avoid environmental liability under the Superfund law.  The reorganization proposal has caught the attention of lawyers at the Environmental Protection Agency and the U.S. Justice Department, who are discussing the possible consequences of the reorganization with Gulf Resources' lawyers.  "If a company reorganizes {in a foreign country} it can affect liability to the U.S. and our ability to collect money related to Superfund cleanups," said Allan Bakalian, an assistant regional counsel of the EPA involved in the negotiations.  Lawrence R. Mehl, Gulf Resources' general counsel, confirmed that the company is in talks with the EPA but declined to comment further.  In a June 27 filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Boston-based Gulf Resources proposed to become an indirect subsidiary of Danbury Ltd. Gulf Resources' stockholders are expected to vote on the proposal in September.  In the filing, the company acknowledged it was doubtful that foreign courts would enforce judgments obtained under U.S. securities law because Danbury is incorporated under the laws of Bermuda and the majority of Gulf Resources's directors are not U.S. residents.  In March, a unit of Inoco PLC, a publicly traded British real-estate concern, bought a 33.9% stake in Gulf Resources.  Four Inoco executives were appointed as Gulf Resources directors.  Corporate lawyers said the reluctance of foreign courts to enforce U.S. judgments might extend to those obtained under the federal Superfund law, which holds companies responsible for the cleanup of hazardous waste they have generated, transported or stored.  That could effect the EPA's ability to collect from Gulf Resources for the cleanup of the now-defunct Bunker Hill smelter in northern Idaho.  The company operated the smelter from 1968 to 1982.  The 21-square-mile Superfund site, one of the largest in the nation, is contaminated with high levels of lead, zinc and other metals.  In 1984, the EPA notified Gulf Resources that it was potentially liable for paying a portion of the cleanup bill as one of the former owners of the smelter.  In May 1987, Gulf Resources, without admitting liability, entered into a consent order with the EPA and agreed to evaluate contamination at the site and surrounding unpopulated areas, and suggest possible remedies.  According to the SEC filing, Gulf Resources is currently negotiating with the EPA over its share of the study's costs and the cleanup.  John Meyer, the EPA manager of the site, said the federal government has so far spent about $9 million on the site.  He said the bill for the cleanup could reach "tens of millions of dollars and maybe beyond $100 million or more."  The EPA and the Justice Department aren't the only government agencies studying the consequences of Gulf Resources' proposed reorganization.  The SEC sent a comment letter to the company's general counsel Aug. 9, asking Gulf Resources to expand its filing to address the effect of the reorganization on the company's liability for the Bunker Hill cleanup.  Corporate lawyers said it is still too early to determine whether Gulf Resources could avoid Superfund liability as a result of the reorganization.  But, said Barry Ostrager, a corporate lawyer at Simpson Thacher & Bartlett, a New York law firm, "It opens the door on a potential problem for Superfund and the EPA."  Unisys Corp. said James A. Unruh, an executive vice president, was elected president and chief operating officer, putting him in line to succeed W. Michael Blumenthal, the 63-year-old chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. Unruh, 48, is little-known outside the company because Mr. Blumenthal casts such a long shadow, but he had been the front-runner.  He has worked closely with Mr. Blumenthal since 1982, when he joined Burroughs Corp., and he was heavily involved in the merger of Burroughs with Sperry Corp. to form Unisys three years ago.  In addition, though Mr. Unruh is a much quieter, more conservative manager than Mr. Blumenthal, he shares Mr. Blumenthal's strength in finance.  The loser in the succession battle was Curtis A. Hessler, 45, the other executive vice president at the computer and defense-electronics company.  Mr. Hessler, an engaging man, was the fair-haired boy at Unisys.  A Rhodes scholar and Supreme Court clerk, he was Mr. Blumenthal's executive assistant during his tenure as Treasury secretary more than a decade ago and had seemed to be Mr. Blumenthal's alter ego since joining Burroughs in 1984.  But Mr. Hessler has more legal and government experience than computer industry experience.  Ulric Weil, an analyst with Weil & Associates in Washington, D.C., said Mr. Hessler also may be catching some of the blame for Unisys' extensive recent problems.  Mr. Hessler was in charge of forecasting, and "he clearly was too optimistic about demand.  The announcement tells me he's being blamed for not having his feet on the ground," Mr. Weil said.  Messrs.  Blumenthal, Unruh and Hessler all were unavailable to comment, said a spokesman for the Blue Bell, Pa., concern.  Mr. Hessler was named vice chairman yesterday, and Mr. Blumenthal said in a statement that the "promotion recognizes the substantial contributions he has made."  Critics have argued that, while Mr. Unruh and Mr. Hessler are impressive executives, neither had enough experience actually running a business.  In addition, most chief executives in the computer industry have either technical or marketing backgrounds.  But Mr. Blumenthal has said his lack of industry experience and his financial background haven't hindered him, so his selection of Mr. Unruh merely affirms that belief.  None of this means that Mr. Blumenthal intends to retire soon.  Mr. Unruh, in his low-key way, said in an interview a year ago that "all I can say is he will retire. . . .  We're not pushing him."  Mr. Unruh also said he didn't think "retirement will be a function of some chronological event -- you know, he turns 65 or something."  Mr. Unruh said he thought Mr. Blumenthal would step down only after proving that merging the two old-line mainframe companies, Burroughs and Sperry, could produce a dominant force in the computer industry.  And the company's first-half loss -- caused primarily by weak demand, high inventories and product delays -- has raised serious questions that may take the company some time to address.  Steve Milunovich, an analyst at First Boston, said he thought Mr. Blumenthal wanted to end the succession battle now, so energies wouldn't be diverted from the restructuring and cost-cutting the company outlined a week and a half ago.  "It's probably better that this comes up today, as they work through their problems," Mr. Milunovich said, "so somebody will have a firm hand when he takes over."  The selection of Mr. Unruh also could serve to reinforce the company's recent message that, while it believes its basic strategy is sound, Unisys needs to execute much better and manage its assets more carefully.  Mr. Unruh is a nuts-and-bolts sort of manager with extensive financial experience: first at Fairchild Camera & Instrument; then at Memorex Corp., a maker of computer equipment; at Burroughs, which acquired Memorex in 1981; and at Unisys.  Two years ago, he was given marketing responsibility for Unisys' computer business, partly to broaden his experience.  He also was recently given responsibility for one of the three computer product groups.  As president, filling a post that had been vacant, he will pick up responsibility for the other two groups.  It is unclear whether Mr. Hessler will stick around after Mr. Blumenthal retires.  Colleagues have described him as "the perfect senator," given his Washington connections and his public-speaking skills, and have speculated that he could seek public office.  They also have noted that he was a partner in a major New York law firm, Paul Weiss Rifkind Wharton & Garrison, before joining Burroughs, and have said he could resume practicing law.  The Unisys spokesman responded that Messrs.  Unruh and Hessler worked well together and should form a good team.  In a related move, Reto Braun, previously a vice president, was named a senior vice president and the president of the new Americas/Pacific division, which combines two divisions into one.  G. Graham Murphy, a vice president and the president of the Europe/Africa division, was named a senior vice president.  The Communications Workers of America reached tentative agreement on local issues in a new three-year contract with Bell Atlantic Corp. units in Pennsylvania and Delaware, ending a 23-day strike.  The union, which represents about 41,000 Bell Atlantic employees, told its members to return to work at the start of their next regular shift.  A union spokeswoman said negotiators were still ironing out details of the agreement with Bell Atlantic's Diamond State Telephone Co. unit in Delaware, but that wouldn't stop employees from returning to their jobs.  A settlement on regional issues such as wages and benefits was reached Aug. 17, but the two sides remained far apart on some local issues such as work rules and conditions.  Tentative agreements on local issues were reached last week with Bell Atlantic's Chesapeake & Potomac Telephone companies in Washington, D.C., Maryland, Virginia and West Virginia, and with New Jersey Bell and Bell Atlantic Network Services.  In New Jersey, Bell Atlantic and the International Brotherhood of Electrical workers, which represents 9,000 New Jersey Bell Telephone employees, have scheduled negotiations for 10 a.m. today.  The CWA said its members won't cross IBEW picket lines.  A spokesman for Philadelphia-based Bell Atlantic said the company was happy with the settlements, and hoped to have management employees who had been filing in for strikers back to their regular jobs soon.  In Chicago, Ameritech reported that negotiators for Illinois Bell and the CWA reached tentative agreement yesterday.  The proposed contract covers 2,900 employees.  Over the weekend, tentative agreements were reached in Ohio and Wisconsin.  Negotiations continued yesterday afternoon in Michigan, where the CWA represents 12,800 employees, but talks with Indiana Bell appeared to hit a snag yesterday morning, the company said.  A company spokeman said the union abruptly increased its demands just when the company believed it was nearing an agreement.  Details weren't disclosed.  Meanwhile, Nynex Corp. planned to meet today with negotiators for the CWA and the IBEW.  The strike against the New York-based company has been the most combative; both sides met only briefly two weeks ago.  In this summer's celebrations, the French Revolution is depicted as a political and social upheaval.  What is largely overlooked are its economic origins.  The revolution began because the monarchy failed to control its deficit spending.  When the government exhausted its ability to borrow, Louis XVI was forced to convene a constitutional convention -- the Estates-General -- in the hope of securing new taxes.  Once assembled, the Estates-General moved beyond financial matters and seized political control.  Although far removed in time from current American policy problems, the events of 1789 reveal the potentially extreme consequences of failing to balance the budget.  The collapse of the French monarchy is directly tied to its inept handling of fiscal policy.  Expenditures often ran well ahead of revenues.  Attempts to control the budget were often frustrated by the numerous and independent venal officials who managed the king's finances.  In wartime, the deficit ballooned; afterward, it was common for the government to declare bankruptcy and suspend payment on some portion of its debt.  Following the partial suspension of interest payments in 1770, two finance ministers, the abbot Terray and the economist Turgot slashed expenditures and raised taxes to produce small surpluses.  In addition to reducing the debt outstanding, they gained greater control over the government's financial administration by replacing venal officials with a smaller modern bureaucracy.  The outbreak of the American War for Independence threatened to undo these reforming ministers' accomplishments.  Military expenditures to assist the Americans' revolt rose rapidly, but the Parlement of Paris agreed to only a few temporary tax increases.  The absence of any government paper money ruled out an inflation tax, and the crown was forced to finance the war almost entirely by borrowing.  Although all the necessary ingredients for a disaster were present, a crisis was averted.  The king took the radical step of appointing an able Swiss Protestant financier, Jacques Necker, as finance minister.  Necker continued to fund the war by issuing more securities, but he ensured that the growing debt could be serviced.  Rising interest payments were made by cuts in non-military expenditures and a continuing reform of the inefficient and wasteful financial administration.  The market responded favorably to Necker's policies.  The yields on government securities that had shot up in the early years of the war now fell.  In spite of his success, Necker was dismissed near the war's end, and the coveted ministry fell to less able French aristocrats.  The administrative reforms of Necker and his predecessors were gradually undone.  Worse yet, once peace arrived, high military expenditures were replaced by expenditures for public works and court favorites.  Instead of peacetime surpluses, large deficits appeared in the 1780s.  The new minister of finance, Calonne, found that he could continue to borrow, thanks to his predecessors' enhancement of the crown's financial reputation.  But interest rates soon rose, making borrowing increasingly expensive and difficult.  In a major policy shift Calonne attempted to raise taxes, but the Parlement and his own hand-picked Assembly of Notables refused to countenance a tax increase.  They insisted that only the Estates-General, a constitutional convention that had not met since 1614, could consent to new taxes.  The king refused to call an Estates-General until August 1788, when the government found itself unable to borrow any more.  The king also recalled Necker in the hope that he could turn around the kingdom's finances so that the Estates-General would not be able to dictate economic policy.  But it was too late, and Necker only bought time by borrowing banknotes from the Discount Bank and declaring them legal tender, thus creating the first government paper money in 60 years.  When the Estates-General met in May 1789, it discovered that it controlled the kingdom's future because it controlled the kingdom's finances.  The crown's worst fears were realized when the Estates-General transformed itself into the National Assembly and challenged the monarchy's political authority.  The storming of the Bastille on July 14 marks a breakdown in political and social control from above.  Henceforth, the Parisian crowd could influence and intimidate the government.  It was thus not in the political interest of the National Assembly to raise new taxes, and it allowed the old ones to go unpaid.  The revolutionaries did begin major economic reforms.  In the early years, they eliminated all internal barriers to trade, creating a unified national market, and permitted freedom of enterprise.  While this lay the foundations for later modern economic growth, the revolutionaries did not eliminate their inherited budget deficit.  This failure led to inflation, the confiscation of church and private property, price controls, and eventually a bankruptcy.  The revolution and its disastrous economic policies could have been avoided had the king the political will to support the policies of his reform-minded ministers.  The permissive growth of deficit spending ensured a momentous economic and political crisis.  ---  Mr. White is an associate professor of economics at Rutgers.  South Korea, seeking to revive its ailing shipbuilding industry, approved a $1 billion rescue package for three of the five largest shipyards.  The package gives Daewoo Shipbuilding & Heavy Machinery Co. -- 67%-owned by Daewoo Group -- $600 million in new, interest-free state loans and reschedules debt to keep it afloat.  Daewoo, the nation's second largest shipyard, also will get some tax exemptions and other benefits.  The Industrial Policy Planning Commission also agreed to a state-assisted takeover of heavily indebted Korea Shipbuilding & Engineering Corp. and to a rescue plan for the Inchon Shipbuilding Co.  The nation's other major shipbuilders are No. 1 Hyundai Heavy Industries Co., part of Hyundai Group and Samsung Heavy Industries.  Industry analysts consider the bailout plan a last-ditch bid by the government to revive the nation's flagging shipbuilding industry.  Despite ranking second in the world in terms of shipbuilding capacity, the South Korean industry recently has sustained chronic losses and huge debts largely as a result of a glut of ships and frequent labor disputes.  Under the plan, the state-owned Korea Development Bank, which owns the other 33% of Daewoo Shipbuilding, will grant the company a moratorium on an existing loan of 250 billion won ($372.7 million), allowing it to pay in installments over 10 years after a seven-year grace period.  The bank also will extend a new 150 billion won loan.  In return, Daewoo Group is to raise 400 billion won in new funds through the sale of some of its other subsidiaries and property belonging to its chairman, Kim Woo Choong.  A Daewoo spokesman said Mr. Kim has accepted the conditions.  "All we have to do now is to turn the yard into a profit-yielding firm," he said.  Daewoo shipyard has debts totaling $1.94 billion and had losses of $318 million last year.  As part of the rescue, Korea Shipbuilding & Engineering, which has total current debts of 587 billion won and had losses of 51 billion won in 1988, will be taken over by the Hanjin Group.  In the final part of the package, the government agreed to allow Inchon Shipbuilding to raise 40 billion won from two of its affiliates to relieve the shipyard's financial problems.  For nearly four years, Sharp Memorial Hospital has had the San Diego heart-transplant market -- and the attendant prestige of doing high-visibility, state-of-the-art medicine -- to itself.  No longer.  On July 1, the University of California at San Diego opened a heart-transplant program; this month, nearby Mercy Hospital announced plans to start another.  Sharp Memorial performed 20 heart-transplant operations last year.  That is well above the national average for hospitals with such programs, but hardly a market it wants to see fragmented.  The city can probably handle two programs, says Sharp Memorial administrator Charles Koch, "but three or four could be problematic."  In more ways than one.  Health-care experts fear an explosion in the number of transplant facilities -- for kidney, liver, pancreas and lungs as well as hearts -- is diluting expertise for these expensive and complex operations.  Nationwide, 251 hospitals offer at least one transplant service; 148 do heart transplants, up from just 12 in 1983.  Meanwhile, growth in the availability of a crucial commodity, donated organs, hasn't kept pace.  The resulting competition for organs means dozens of transplant programs are doing just a few procedures a year.  All this has touched off a controversy in the nation's health-care system.  On the one side, hospitals and medical schools that are newcomers to the transplant business say performing such operations is crucial to retaining their prestige -- and their patients.  On the other side, many insurers, convinced they can keep quality up and costs down, are steering patients to a core group of top medical establishments.  The debate is in its early stages, and neither side shows signs of relenting.  Hospitals throughout the U.S. have raced to develop transplant services.  Today, five hospitals in greater Chicago do heart transplants; a sixth plans to resume its service when it replaces a surgeon lost to another program.  Eight hospitals in Missouri and three in Nebraska do hearts.  Two in Des Moines do kidneys.  Seventy-two hospitals nationwide do pancreas transplants.  By last year, 141 hospitals offered heart-transplant services and performed 1,647 transplants, an average of fewer than 12 per hospital.  The ratio was better for kidneys, with 212 centers doing 9,123 transplants.  Still, 37% of the centers did fewer than 15 operations in 1988.  The numbers worry some experts.  "You're seeing a real proliferation of this technology where maybe there ought to be a concentration," says Janet Shikles, director of health financing and policy issues at the U.S. General Accounting Office, which did a recent study of heart transplants.  Adds William H. Frist, director of the heart transplant program at Vanderbilt University Medical Center, Nashville, Tenn.: "The potential is there to close down 60% of all the {cardiac} transplant programs in the country."  Until the early 1980s, transplant surgery was an experimental procedure confined to a handful of hospitals where doctors battled, usually in vain, against the human immune system's awesome power to reject foreign invaders, especially other human tissue.  Then in 1981, the development of an immuno-suppressive drug called cyclosporine gave doctors the ability to manage, if not control, the body's rejection mechanism.  Success rates for kidney and heart procedures soared.  Kidney transplants free patients from dialysis treatment, both improving their quality of life and saving medical costs.  Meanwhile, 83% of heart-transplant patients survive at least a year after surgery, and 73% survive 10 years, according to a recent study.  Most patients can return to near-normal lives.  "It works," says Dr. Frist.  The question remains whether it would work better if fewer hospitals got into the act.  "You worry about the quality and the experience of the personnel if they're not doing many transplants," says Robert J. Corry, director of the transplant service at the University of Iowa Hospitals, Iowa City.  Dr. Corry is also president of the United Network for Organ Sharing, or UNOS, a national clearinghouse that maintains the national waiting list for organs and matches donor organs with potential recipients.  Richmond, Va.-based UNOS qualifies hospitals, based in part on the experience of their transplant staffs, for membership in the national transplantation network.  But it has no mandate to contain the number of transplant programs.  Likewise, Medicare's clout is limited.  While it reimburses heart transplant costs only at programs that do more than 12 operations a year, few people over the age of 65 undergo such transplants.  Private insurers, which pay the bulk of transplant costs, may have more influence in determining which programs will thrive and which will wither.  Prudential Insurance Co., in a new program, directs those among its 24 million beneficiaries needing transplant surgery to about a dozen hospitals around the country.  The Newark, N.J.-based insurer selected the hospitals based on experience of their surgeons, the number of procedures and their results, among other things, and then negotiated packaged prices to get discounts of as much as 30%.  "As long as we keep this to a small number of high-quality institutions, we can generate a lot of volume for these folks," said Dan Dragalin, vice president, medical services.  The initial economic results were impressive.  Prudential and its client companies paid a total of $5.5 million for procedures that would have cost $7.2 million on a "retail" or fee-for-service basis, Dr. Dragalin said.  Similar results, based on an estimated 600 beneficiaries annually, would mean an annual savings of more than $22 million.  Health-care researchers are investigating whether such a program is also good medicine.  Recent research has established that for certain complex procedures, doctors who do more surgery achieve better results.  This volume-to-outcome relationship hasn't been proven for transplant procedures.  But, "Some people argue that research is jeopardized because the number of cases is diluted over too many institutions," says Roger Evans, a scientist who works in Seattle for the Battelle Memorial Institute of Columbus, Ohio.  "If we definitely found a relationship between volume and outcome, it may be that one or two transplant programs would be adequate in a metropolitan area with five transplant centers."  The two fledgling heart-transplant programs in San Diego believe there's at least one plus in their decision -- increasing the awareness of the need for donors.  "I think the number of hearts available will go up when more centers are in operation," says Richard Friedman, medical director of Mercy's cardiac service.  Without a transplant service, he adds, "You can't be recognized as a leader in cardiovascular surgery."  Gerard Burrow, vice chancellor for health sciences at UCSD and dean of the school of medicine, agrees.  "In 1989, it's simply impossible to be an academic department of surgery and not do transplantation," he says.  He puts the blame for the proliferation of services on private community hospitals that he says "will do anything . . . to improve marketing."  Sharp Memorial isn't taking this turf battle lying down.  Last month, three weeks after UCSD opened its program, Sharp Memorial announced plans for a kidney-transplant program, previously a UCSD monopoly.  Was it retaliation?  "Some may have interpreted it that way," says Sharp's Mr. Koch.  Actually, he insists, the new service has been in planning for three years.  "It's really becoming a standard of care for patients with kidney failure," he says.  ---  @ Hospitals With Transplant Programs Proliferate,  @ But Many Have Trouble Keeping Busy  @ Heart/kidney transplants in 1988  @ Number of NUMBER OF HOSPITALS PERFORMING  @ Procedures HEART KIDNEY  @ 1- 5 45 40  @ 6-10 21 21  @ 11-15 14 17  @ 16-20 13 14  @ 21-25 8 13  @ 26-50 9 53  @ 50+ 3 50  @ Total 113 208  @ Source: Battelle Memorial Institute  The U.S. Postal Service will probably seek to boost the first-class postage rate in 1991 to between 28 and 32 cents for a 1-ounce letter, Postmaster General Anthony Frank said.  Mr. Frank made that prediction on NBC-TV's "Today" show and in remarks to reporters after a speech at a regional postal meeting in New York.  But in an interview, Mr. Frank also said that he's confident the postal agency can trim its costs sufficiently through automation in coming years to be able, the next time, to achieve smaller rate rises than in 1991.  He also repeated earlier assertions that he would like to stretch out postage-rate increases beyond their typical occurrence of every three years.  The most recent rate increases, on April 3, 1988, included a boost in the first-class rate to 25 cents from 22 cents.  But any 1991 rate boost would reflect Postal Service cost increases of 20% or more, incurred in the 1988-1990 period, Mr. Frank said.  The 1991 round would very likely include increases of 20% to 25% for second-, third- and fourth-class mail, he said.  "I don't feel I can do anything about the next" round of rate rises, Mr. Frank said in the interview.  But he added, "That doesn't mean it has to happen in the future anymore."  The postmaster general doesn't believe the 1991 rate boosts would drive mailers to find alternative services faster than they're already trying to do.  The agency's average revenue for each piece of mail is 23 cents, Mr. Frank said.  "There are not a lot of people lusting to do that kind of work for 23 cents," he said.  But a failure to reduce Postal Service costs and to narrow rate increases in the future could be a different story, Mr. Frank said.  "Unless we can show the mailing public, and particularly large mailers" that costs can be held below the rate of U.S. inflation, the agency faces "an erosion of postal value, which will feed on itself," he said.  The Postal Service recently announced it would trim 1,000 regional administrative jobs, mostly through attrition, and Mr. Frank said the agency's total working hours in 1990 will decline despite a continued rise in postal delivery volume.  The service will be "leaner" and will be realizing increased benefits of automation, he said.  In 1990, the agency wants to bring its cost increases below an expected inflation rate of perhaps 4% to 5%, Mr. Frank said, following rises of 8% and 7% in 1988 and 1989, respectively.  If it could keep costs in tow, holding rate increases to, say, 9% to 12% over three years, or 15% to 20% over five years, that would do a lot "to head off any discussions of alternative delivery," he suggested.  The Postal Service faces another round of labor-contract negotiations next year, after current pacts expire in November.  It plans to seek rate increases next year.  Any rises would take effect in 1991, once it gained approval of the independent Postal Rate Commission.  The Postal Service is required by law to break even, which it usually does over a three-year period that involves labor-cost rises and subsequent rate increases.  First Toronto Mining Corp. said it plans to make a 157.7 million Canadian dollar ($134.4 million) offer for the 71% of Forsayth N.L. that it doesn't already own, despite the Australian mining concern's rejection of its proposed offer.  First Toronto said it plans to offer three of its common shares and one C$5 gold-indexed bond for every 10 Forsayth shares.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, First Toronto closed at C$5, down 25 cents.  Walhalla Mining Co. N.L., 96%-owned by First Toronto, currently holds 30.4 million of Forsayth's 106.2 million outstanding shares.  A spokesman for First Toronto said it hasn't decided whether the subsidary will tender its shares to the bid.  Forsayth said the bid is "completely unwelcome" and that the "form of the offer is quite unsatisfactory and it is totally inadequate in substance."  The First Toronto spokesman said the company doesn't plan to alter its bid unless a higher competing offer is made.  First Toronto said its bid is conditional upon acceptance by the holders of 51% of Forsayth's outstanding shares, including those held by Walhalla.  The First Toronto spokesman said directors of Forsayth and First Toronto plan to meet in Australia later this week to discuss the offer.  First Toronto is a holding company with investments in mining, technology and oil and gas concerns.  Lomas Financial Corp. said it doesn't expect it will be able to restructure its senior debt by Friday, when $145 million of its senior debt matures.  The real estate and financial services concern said failure to pay the debt on that day could result in acceleration of nearly all its senior debt.  Lomas said that it will ask for forbearance on the part of its lenders, while it continues to negotiate a restructuring of its debt, but that it hadn't any assurance this would be obtained.  Jess Hay, chairman and chief executive officer of the cash-strapped company, said the pace of the negotiations has been hampered by the large number of lenders involved.  But he added, "We're still reasonably optimistic that {the debt restructuring} will be accomplished, and I think the lead banks share that view."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Lomas Financial shares plunged $2.375, to close at $3.625, on volume of slightly more than 1.1 million shares.  Lomas, which has already sold its credit-card unit and is marketing its leasing subsidiary, said last week it was considering the sale of some additional assets to help repay some debt.  Among possible candidates for sale are some of the company's real estate, some parts of its short-term lending portfolio, and its life insurance unit, Lomas said at the time.  In an interview, Mr. Hay said a decision hadn't been reached on which, if any, of those assets will be placed on the block.  He said, "We haven't even started that process."  In response to yesterday's announcement, Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it downgraded its ratings on about $2 billion of debt of Lomas, its leasing unit and its real estate investment trust.  The rating concern also said it put Lomas's debt under review for possible further downgrades.  Moody's cut its ratings on Lomas's senior notes to single-B-2 from Ba-2 and on subordinated debt to Caa from single-B-1.  It lowered its ratings on Equitable Lomas Leasing Corp.'s senior notes to single-B-1 from Baa-3, preferred stock to single-B-3 from Baa-3, and commercial paper to not prime from prime-3.  Lomas & Nettleton Mortgage Investors' subordinated note rating was lowered to single-B-1 from Ba-3.  Resorts International Inc. said it will halt interest payments on $925 million of secured and unsecured notes, setting the stage for a battle with bondholders.  Merv Griffin, the company's chairman, sent a letter to bondholders that says the casino-hotel company's cash flow is less than expected and that it is taking longer than anticipated to sell certain assets.  Mr. Griffin, the well-known entertainer who purchased Resorts for $365 million in November after a takeover battle with developer Donald Trump, said the company will unveil a recapitalization at a Sept. 19 bondholders meeting at its casino in Atlantic City, N.J., the company's base.  "It has become clear that Resorts is a much bigger challenge than we anticipated," Mr. Griffin said.  David P. Hanlon, Resorts president, said the experience of running a casino so far has been "a disappointment" to Mr. Griffin, who had experience running hotels, but not casinos.  Asked if Mr. Griffin is prepared to put up more than the $60 million in cash he has already committed, Mr. Hanlon said, "He is willing to put in a lot of energy and time."  Mr. Griffin wasn't available to comment.  The Sept. 19 unveiling of the recapitalization couldn't come at a worse time for the company.  On Sept. 25, Mr. Griffin is scheduled to appear before the New Jersey Casino Control Commission to obtain a permanent casino license.  Resorts officials are arguing the commission should concentrate on Mr. Griffin's suitability for a license, not the company's financial state.  Such a strategy is likely to be opposed by the state's Division of Gaming Enforcement, which makes recommendations to the commission.  "The {financial} plan proposed to us when Merv Griffin was given a provisional license has come up short," said division chief Anthony J. Parrillo.  "You can't ignore the day of reckoning -- these issues have to be dealt with."  The announcement didn't come as a complete surprise to bondholders, many of whom were aware the company's anticipated cash flow this year couldn't meet the company's $133.6 million in interest payments on its debt.  Surprised or not, holders of the company's senior secured debt are certain to be enraged that they are being treated in the same manner as holders of unsecured debt.  The secured debt was sold by Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. in November to help Mr. Griffin to purchase Resorts.  Because the debt is secured by Resorts assets, holders assumed they would be paid before the unsecured debtholders were paid, analysts said.  "The secured holders are being stabbed in the back," said one analyst who declined to be identified.  Kaye Handley, a senior analyst with R.D. Smith & Co., a trading firm that specializes in distressed securities, said the announcement makes it more likely Resorts will eventually have to seek protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  Resorts said it has $100 million of credit lines and cash on hand, and has no intention of filing for bankruptcy protection.  Ms. Handley said that given the soft state of the casino industry, it's possible that the value of the Atlantic City asset is less than the $200 million for which it is secured.  Any restructuring proposal is sure to unleash a slew of bondholder lawsuits.  Prior to yesterday's announcement, at least one suit had already been filed against both Mr. Griffin and Drexel Burnham, alleging that Resorts' financial condition was misrepresented when the secured bonds were sold.  Future lawsuits are expected to focus on whether a "fraudulent transfer of assets" occurred when Mr. Griffin bought Mr. Trump's Resorts stake.  Such a charge would rest on the claim that in selling the unfinished Taj Mahal casino and other assets to Mr. Trump, the company was left with insufficient assets to continue operating and pay off debt.  Both Mr. Trump and the senior secured bondholders could be the targets of such a suit, analysts say.  Mr. Trump has noted that Mr. Griffin's acquisition began as a hostile takeover, making such a claim groundless.  In anticipation of a restructuring proposal, bondholders of about $300 million of company debt formed a committee to discuss their options, but the panel hasn't yet taken any action.  Duncan Darrow, an attorney representing the committee, was unavailable to comment.  Last month, Resorts reported a second-quarter loss of $27.9 million.  Also, a 99-year lease the company holds on the Showboat Hotel Casino in Atlantic City has proven difficult to sell.  Originally, the company said it expected to sell the lease for between $95 million and $120 million.  Raymond E. Neidl, a junk bond analyst with Dillon, Read & Co., said the Showboat lease will garner between $50 million and $60 million.  Resorts bonds didn't trade yesterday, though traders reported that bid orders were about 15% below what the bonds sold for Friday.  Separately, Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it lowered the rating of Resorts' unsecured debentures to Ca from Caa and its first mortgage notes and senior secured notes to Caa from single-B-3.  With his longish blond hair and a dark tan, Albert "Bud" Furman III seems more suited to a surfboard than his regular spot on the floor of the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  Those who know the 38-year-old trader say he sometimes even talks of a trade as if it were a wave: "It was so mammoth and so there."  Never was it so there for Mr. Furman as during the week of the October 1987 stock-market crash.  While many investors were losing their shirts, Mr. Furman was racking up profits of more than $1 million by trading in Standard & Poor's 500 stock index futures.  Today, however, those trades are threatening to destroy Mr. Furman's career.  Disciplinary officials at the exchange now believe the trades were part of a scheme to steal money from futures customers.  The exchange itself has been stung by an ongoing federal investigation of its trading pits, and has been hard-pressed to prove to outsiders -- including investors, Congress and the Bush administration -- that it is capable of policing itself.  So, say people familiar with the case, the exchange may well make an example of Mr. Furman and others involved in the suspect trades.  Following a hearing that began yesterday, these sources say Mr. Furman could be stripped of his livelihood.  They expect the Merc to fine him as much as $500,000 and ban him from trading -- "the death penalty," as one lawyer in the case puts it.  They also say Patrick J. Shannon, the other main target of the case, is likely to receive similar penalties.  Says one exchange official sympathetic to the traders' plight: "The timing couldn't be worse.  We're going to show how tough we are."  Before a broader federal probe of futures pit trading was disclosed here last Jan. 19, the case involving Messrs.  Furman and Shannon appeared headed for an uneventful settlement.  But then politics came into play.  The Merc, which won't comment on the case, has since: brought additional charges; moved the case from a routine disciplinary committee up to the exchange's board, the only body that can vote to expel members; and made clear to the traders involved that the penalties imposed will be much tougher than initially thought.  Last month, Leo Melamed, who heads the Merc's executive committee, waved a clenched fist during a news conference and vowed to "instill the fear of God" in any traders who might think of stealing.  The Furman/Shannon case is one step toward that end.  The case also is an opportunity for the Merc to at least temporarily upstage U.S. Attorney Anton R. Valukas, the aggressive prosecutor overseeing the government's probe of pit trading.  Although Mr. Valukas has already brought indictments against 46 Chicago traders in that separate investigation, the total amount of money that customers allegedly lost in those cases doesn't add up to the amount involved in the Furman/Shannon case alone, attorneys say.  In Mr. Furman and Mr. Shannon, the Merc can also boast of catching big-name, well-connected traders.  Known by his trading badge "JOK," the 33-year-old Mr. Shannon is already a Merc legend of sorts.  In one now-famous trade, unrelated to the Merc's investigation, he mistakenly sold a big stock-index position instead of buying, just before the market plunged.  The lucky error netted him and his customer nearly $1 million, which they split.  Mr. Shannon is a member of one of Chicago's most prominent Southside Irish families.  His grandfather was accountant and financial adviser to the late mayor Richard J. Daley.  In the S&P pit during the market crash, Mr. Shannon brokered big orders for E.F. Hutton, now part of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  Mr. Furman is one of the Merc's most successful "locals," meaning those who trade for themselves rather than for customers.  Locals operate like middlemen, buying contracts from one trader and then trying to sell them at a higher price to another.  The Shannon and Furman families go way back.  The Shannon accounting firm for decades did work for the Furman Funeral Home, owned by Mr. Furman's father. (Mr.  Shannon and Mr. Furman both refused to comment on the charges against them.)  During October 1987, they worked in the S&P pit, the nation's second largest arena (after the New York Stock Exchange) for speculating on stock prices.  The S&P's 500 stock index futures contract is based on the prices of 500 commonly traded stocks.  The index contract closed yesterday at the Merc at 353.20.  A single S&P contract is worth 500 times the index, or $176,600 at yesterday's close.  Trading records and internal Merc charges obtained by this newspaper, as well as interviews with some people involved in the case, show how the traders allegedly ran roughshod over the industry's vaunted "open-outcry" system, which is designed to protect outside investors and give all pit traders an equal crack at trades.  Essentially, the two men are accused of stealing customer funds by prearranging a series of trades -- circumventing open outcry -- that gave Mr. Furman automatic profits.  Some of the money ended up in the hands of Mr. Shannon's brother and some in the hands of another trader Mr. Shannon may have owed money to, according to Merc allegations.  In all of the transactions, the traders took advantage of the knowledge that a profitable spread existed in the price at which some customers were willing to buy and others were willing to sell, according to the Merc's internal charges.  If one customer wanted to buy a contract at an index level of 208 and another wanted to sell at 206, the traders would capture the two-point spread by doing two trades and intentionally giving the middleman's profit to Mr. Furman.  These spreads can be large and therefore lucrative in the hectic trading of a fast market -- and were especially so the week of the stock-market crash.  The exchange alleges that trading documents were even altered.  For instance, in one episode the morning of Oct. 19, 1987, another broker's trading card was allegedly changed to redirect a big trade with Mr. Shannon to Mr. Furman.  The trade netted Mr. Furman $77,500.  He then traded away $50,000 of that -- part to Mr. Shannon's brother and part to another Merc trader.  The Merc called these "alleged money transfer trades."  The broker whose trading card was changed, John L. Oberman, participated in many of the questionable transactions cited by the Merc's disciplinary case.  Mr. Oberman heads one of the exchange's most successful broker groups, Oberman Mininni & Associates.  But while his trading cards show he was involved in the suspect trades, it isn't clear whether he benefited from them, and the Merc hasn't charged him with any wrongdoing.  Mr. Oberman wouldn't comment.  Another example of a questionable Furman/Shannon transaction cited by the Merc came on Oct. 20, 1987.  On that day, Mr. Shannon walked across the pit to ask a broker with Refco Inc., one of the world's biggest commodity firms, to "redirect" a trade to Mr. Furman, according to testimony given to the Merc.  Mr. Shannon bought a like number of contracts at a higher price from Mr. Furman, who wound up making $75,000 on these and related transactions.  Trades that are intentionally "redirected" outside of open outcry are illegal.  The Refco broker wasn't charged with wrongdoing.  But Mr. Shannon was charged by the Merc with withholding an order and prearranged trading.  Mr. Furman was charged with making prearranged trades.  Mr. Furman and Mr. Shannon are both aware of the exchange's plan to make examples of them.  Normally, traders facing disciplinary action make settlement proposals directly to the Merc's compliance department.  But in this high-stakes case, lawyers for the traders have bypassed the staff to negotiate directly with the Merc's influential outside counsel, Jerrold Salzman.  Mr. Salzman won't comment on the case, but says it isn't uncommon for traders' lawyers to contact him.  Eight days before the exchange and the public learned of the government's broader investigation of the trading pits last January, the Merc accepted a $252,500 settlement offer from Mr. Furman.  He paid a $125,000 fine, made restitution to E.F. Hutton customers of $127,500 and accepted a three-month suspension.  The exchange agreed to reduce the number of charges against Mr. Furman to four counts of prearranged trading from a total of nine major counts of misconduct.  And the trader agreed to cooperate with the exchange's continuing investigation.  But it quickly became apparent that federal prosecutors were looking at the exchange's disciplinary cases, and that cooperating with the Merc was likely to involve self-incrimination in any subsequent federal case, a person familiar with the Merc case says.  Mr. Furman stopped talking.  Mr. Shannon, then facing 12 major Merc charges of misconduct, canceled a meeting with exchange investigators scheduled for May 3, according to Merc documents. (A person familiar with the federal investigation says the Merc case is, in fact, being reviewed by an assistant to U.S. Attorney Valukas.)  On May 10, a Merc body, known as the probable-cause committee, broadened the case to include more trades, and leveled additional charges against Mr. Shannon and Mr. Furman.  The committee notified Mr. Furman that he also will be charged with failure to cooperate, a major violation of exchange rules.  The Merc regularly builds prearrangedtrading cases without eyewitnesses, relying solely on trading records.  The standard of proof in Merc disciplinary hearings is the "weight of the evidence," not the more difficult "beyond a reasonable doubt" that criminal proceedings require.  Traders who are the targets of disciplinary action can appeal to the industry's primary regulator, the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, and then to the federal courts.  But few cases, about a quarter, even get to the stage of a full-blown hearing at the Merc; the rest are mostly settled, for a fine and sometimes a suspension, with no admission of guilt.  Fellow members, who sit on disciplinary committees or the Merc board, judge the accused.  When it's all over, a brief account of the charges and penalties is posted for members and made available to news organizations.  The big firms, whose S&P orders helped enrich Mr. Furman, aren't talking.  Shearson Lehman Hutton won't comment on Mr. Shannon.  Salomon Brothers, which uses Mr. Oberman to broker S&P trades, also won't comment.  Mr. Oberman was found guilty in late 1985 by the Merc of prearranged trading on some large Salomon Brothers orders in the S&P pit, according to files at the CFTC.  He was fined $15,000 and suspended for 15 days.  Matthew Wolf, a Salomon employee, was fined $5,000 and suspended for five days for "possible participation in the prearrangement" of those trades.  The 26-year-old Mr. Wolf is currently Salomon's vice president in charge of S&P operations at the Merc and the man who gives Mr. Oberman trade for the firm.  He won't comment, either.  Since the invention of the income tax, the trend has been ever upward -- that is, until recently.  Listed below are 86 countries with an income tax; 55 have cut their top rates in the past five years.  In 29 countries there was no change and only two -- Luxembourg and Lebanon -- raised their top rates.  A word of caution should be kept in mind when analyzing this data.  Social security, health and local income taxes are excluded.  In many cases they can raise the tax burden significantly.  For example, in Canada, which has a top federal income tax rate of 29%, the top rate of overall taxation for someone living in Quebec is 49.1%.  Moreover, many countries have non-income taxes, such as value-added taxes, which may be more economically significant than the income tax.  It is also important to remember that the threshold of income at which the top rate begins is very important.  In Honduras, for example, a taxpayer doesn't begin paying the top rate of 45% until he earns $500,000.  By contrast, Mexico has a lower top rate -- 40% -- but it kicks in at $13,170.  While the trend toward lower taxation is especially evident when looking at top rates, a country's top rate is an important indicator of its overall tax and economic system.  Countries with confiscatory rates at the top generally also tax those in the middle and the bottom more heavily.  As F.A. Hayek once remarked, the principal function of high marginal income-tax rates is to justify higher taxes on everyone.  ---  Mr. Bartlett is deputy assistant secretary for economic policy at the Treasury.  ---  @ 1985 1989  @ Argentina 45% 35%  @ Australia 60 49  @ Austria 62 50  @ Bangladesh 60 50  @ Barbados 60 50  @ Belgium 71.5 55  @ Belize 50 50  @ Bolivia 30 10  @ Bophuthatswana 40 40  @ Botswana 60 50  @ Brazil 60 25  @ Canada 34 29  @ Channel Islands 20 20  @ Chile 56 50  @ China 45 45  @ Columbia 49 30  @ Costa Rica 50 25  @ Cyprus 60 60  @ Denmark 73 72  @ Dominica 55 45  @ Dominican Republic 73.1 73.1  @ Ecuador 46 46  @ Egypt 65 65  @ El Salvador 60 60  @ Fiji 50 50  @ Finland 51 44  @ France 65 56.8  @ Ghana 60 55  @ Greece 63 50  @ Guatemala 48 34  @ Honduras 40 40  @ Hong Kong 25 25  @ Iceland 44 28.5  @ India 61.9 50  @ Indonesia 35 35  @ Ireland 65 58  @ Isle of Man 20 20  @ Italy 65 50  @ Ivory Coast 37.5 37.5  @ Jamaica 57.5 33.3  @ Japan 70 50  @ Kenya 65 50  @ Lebanon 44 50  @ Liberia 73 73  @ Libya 35 35  @ Luxembourg 57 58.8  @ Malawi 50 50  @ Malaysia 45 45  @ Malta 65 65  @ Mexico 55 40  @ Morocco 60 60  @ Netherlands 72 72  @ New Zealand 66 33  @ Nigeria 70 55  @ Norway 40 27.5  @ Pakistan 60 45  @ Panama 56 56  @ Papua New Guinea 50 45  @ Paraguay 30 30  @ Peru 50 45  @ Philippines 60 35  @ Portugal 76.6 40  @ Puerto Rico 67.5 38  @ Senegal 65 60  @ Singapore 40 33  @ South Africa 50 45  @ South Korea 70.1 63.7  @ Spain 66 56  @ Sri Lanka 55 40  @ Sudan 70 40  @ Swaziland 50 45  @ Sweden 80 72  @ Switzerland 11.5 11.5  @ Taiwan 60 50  @ Tanzania 95 55  @ Thailand 65 55  @ Trinidad & Tobago 70 45  @ Turkey 55 50  @ Uganda 70 60  @ U.K. 60 60  @ U.S. 50 28  @ Venezuela 45 45  @ West Germany 56 56  @ Zaire 60 60  @ Zambia 80 75  @ Zimbabwe 61.1 60  @ Unweighted Average 55.5 46.7  @ Source: Compiled by author from Price Waterhouse and Coopers & Lybrand tax guides.  As one of the most popular entertainers on television, Arsenio Hall can easily afford to pay for his own clothes.  But when word got out that Mr. Hall was looking for a new wardrobe for his late-night talk show, nearly a dozen companies vied for the chance to dress him for free.  Early this month, a Beverly Hills boutique called Sami Dinar won the competition.  In exchange, the store gets a publicity bonanza: its name flashed across millions of television screens at the end of the show.  The competition among fashion businesses to provide clothes and accessories for TV stars is hot.  Because many fashion businesses can't afford TV commercials, credits are the only way some young designers and tony local boutiques can reach the masses.  Nicole Miller, a designer of career women's clothes, says her two-year association with talk-show hostess Sally Jessy Raphael has boosted her image and sales.  "I'm always shocked when I run into women on the street dressed head to toe in the same outfit that Sally wore on an earlier show," Ms. Miller says.  But the clothes-for-credit swap can be a mixed blessing.  The shows often get greedy, says Susan Kramer, a publicist who has negotiated wardrobe deals for such designers as Robert Stock and Henry Grethel.  For example, "Entertainment Tonight" expects to receive about 80 suits, a couple of dozen shirts, ties and accessories for its male host every year.  And although some companies maintain that clothes are only loaned to the stars, perspiration, makeup and alterations often prevent the outfits from being resold.  Furthermore, while designers usually spell out in their contracts that their clothes must be worn as coordinated outfits and not paired with other clothes, the stars often make changes.  And some deals backfire: One menswear designer, a source says, was itching for his contract with a television host to end because the jowly and pot-bellied celebrity turned out to be no credit to the clothes.  Four years ago, the Perry Ellis organization jumped at the chance to costume the actors in "Paper Dolls," a weekly prime-time series about a Manhattan model agency.  Grief Cos., maker of some Perry Ellis menswear, furnished $70,000 of suits, ties and shirts in exchange for a wardrobe credit at the end of the show.  But when Pieter O'Brien, a Grief vice president, visited the set, "everybody but the actors -- the production people, the directors -- was wearing the clothes," he says.  Even so, he sighs, "it was worth it to get the credit."  Established retailers like R.H. Macy and Bloomingdale's avoid clothes-for-credit deals, saying they aren't worth the bother for just a one-line plug.  And big-name designers say they get enough free publicity from socialites and celebrities who wear their clothes.  But for the upscale retailer Barneys New York, which is outfitting comedian Joan Rivers for her new talk show this fall, the wardrobe credit couldn't have come at a better time: Barneys is in the midst of a big expansion beyond the New York area.  Designers often get more than a line zooming by as the credits roll.  Retailer Fred Hayman of Beverly Hills (formerly known as Giorgio of Beverly Hills), costumer to TV shows for more than 20 years, sees its name frozen on the screen for about three seconds at the end of "Wheel of Fortune."  In some cases, announcers also read the credit.  But that's only the formal part of such deals.  Because TV personalities are often interviewed by magazines and newspapers, they have many chances to drop the name.  When "Wheel of Fortune" host Pat Sajak talks to reporters about his new talk show, he sometimes slips in that the loud print ties he now favors come from Rick Pallack, a Sherman Oaks, Calif., designer who gets a wardrobe credit on the program.  Although fashion businesses would love to dress newscasters such as ABC's Diane Sawyer, the networks generally don't allow journalists to participate in such arrangements.  But there are loopholes.  Last year, menswear designer Joseph Abboud outfitted "Today" show host Bryant Gumbel when he was serving as host of NBC's Summer Olympics coverage in South Korea.  Because sporting events aren't handled by the news division, the network allowed wardrobe credits.  Mr. Gumbel, one of televison's nattiest dressers, packed more than a dozen Abboud suits, shirts and accessories.  Mr. Abboud was showered with publicity, including a Washington Post article headlined, "Gumbel's Seoul Designer: Joseph Abboud Suits Man of 'Today.'"  ---  Haagen-Dazs to Margeotes  Haagen-Dazs Co., Teaneck, N.J., awarded its $5 million ad account to Margeotes Fertitta & Weiss, New York.  Haagen-Dazs is a unit of Grand Metropolitan PLC.  The account was previously handled by Doyle Graf Raj, a New York agency that folded earlier this summer when several top executives defected to set up their own shop.  The turmoil that ensued forced a number of clients to conduct agency searches.  Other Doyle Graf companies that haven't yet selected replacement agencies include J.P. Morgan & Co. and Steuben Glass.  In winning the Haagen-Dazs business, Margeotes Fertitta & Weiss bested three other agencies that all presented creative projects: TBWA Advertising; Scali, McCabe, Sloves; and Chiat/Day/Mojo.  All three are based in New York.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   ACQUISITION: TBWA Advertising, New York, acquired Kerlick & Switzer, a St. Louis agency with annual billings of $54 million.  Terms weren't disclosed.  TBWA will merge its St. Louis office with Kerlick to form an agency with combined billings of $75 million.  The new agency will be known as TBWA/Kerlick & Switzer.  NEW ACCOUNT: Playboy Enterprises Inc., Chicago, awarded its $2 million Playboy magazine account to Keye/Donna/Pearlstein, New York.  General Motors Corp. said it is delaying until January adding a second shift of production of a new medium-duty truck at the company's Janesville, Wis., assembly plant.  The move means that about 370 of the 1,150 workers at the Janesville truck facility will be laid off beginning Sept. 1, the company said.  Another 50 workers will be assigned to non-production jobs.  Workers at the Janesville truck plant returned to work only yesterday after a five-month layoff to re-tool for the new truck model.  GM said the decision to delay adding a second production shift at Janesville "reflects a recent downturn in the total medium-duty truck business."  The Janesville plant is building a new line of GM medium-duty trucks, to be sold as the GMC TopKick and the Chevrolet Kodiak.  After the end of the year, all of GM's conventional medium-duty trucks will be built at the Janesville facility, the company said.  GM said production of its old line of conventional medium-duty trucks at the Pontiac Central facility in Pontiac, Mich., will be cut to one shift from two, beginning Sept. 16.  That action will result in the layoff of about 800 of the 2,900 workers currently employed at the facility, a company spokesman said.  The Pontiac work force will be cut even further at the end of this year, when the facility shifts to building specialty vehicles such as school buses.  The plant is scheduled to close completely by the end of 1990, the spokesman said.  However, the spokesman suggested GM is looking for a way to save jobs at the Pontiac facility.  "There's still a lot of discussion going on as to what happens to the people in Pontiac," he said.  "The end of history will be a very sad time.  The struggle for recognition, the willingness to risk one's life for a purely abstract goal, the world-wide ideological struggle that called for daring, courage, imagination, and idealism, will be replaced by economic calculation, the endless solving of technical problems, environmental concerns, and the satisfaction of sophisticated consumer demands."  -- Francis Fukuyama  Would someone tell Mr. Fukuyama to go outside tonight, stare up into the night sky, and, as former Washington Redskins fullback John Riggins once said, lighten up.  Francis Fukuyama is a U.S. State Department official who has written an article for National Interest magazine called "The End of History?"  He thinks that democratic liberalism has triumphed (a good thing), that ideologies are disappearing (also good, he feels), but that the new order may bring on "centuries of boredom."  Our main purpose here is to consider Voyager 2's flight past the planet Neptune, but we open with Mr. Fukuyama's thoughts because readers may wish to know that his article is a subject of discussion now among policy intellectuals who think about what the United States is doing or should be doing.  Not all of them agree with the State Department analyst, but one can't help but note all the effort to affirm or refute his thesis about centuries of boredom at the very moment that most other people are absorbing this little spacecraft's communication with its Earth-bound creators some 2.8 billion miles away.  Maybe Voyager 2 knows something about the human spirit that Mr. Fukuyama doesn't.  This is not to deny that some earthlings might ask what place remains for acts of courage, daring and imagination.  U.S. policy makers do seem to have developed a knack in our time for biting off more than they can chew.  Given the grim, routine hand-wringing of our public officials, one might wonder whether they will "solve" the drug crisis, the S&L crisis, the foreign-debt crisis or the health-care crisis any time before Voyager 2 stops beeping back signals, an event estimated to occur in the year 2015.  Congress will return soon enough to remind us of what centuries of boredom may look like, so let us savor the events of our summer.  Before Voyager's Neptune visit, for example, many of us looked up and out a fortnight ago at Earth's only Moon.  Earth, with all of its human travelers, had maneuvered itself between the Sun and the Moon, producing a lunar eclipse.  The eclipse didn't darken the Moon entirely, but instead, like a celestial rheostat, turned down its illumination.  The flat, white disk with which we were so familiar suddenly transformed into a gray globe, its round sides curving back into the darkness.  It looked more like the slightly ominous place Neil Armstrong could canter across than what we normally see.  This brief lunar eclipse wasn't boring.  And it was more than a little humbling.  And now Neptune and a week of steady transmissions from 1,800 pounds of circuitry and metal that for most of us now seems as alive as R2D2 was in "Star Wars."  We mere laymen were awed alright, but look what Voyager 2 did to those scientists: They were struck dumb, or reduced to gurgling in monosyllables, such as "wow."  But earthlings are a resilient species, and within days of their confrontation with a planet that existed before history and now has been encountered in "post-history" they were, as usual, trying to explain it.  They confronted Neptune's moon, Triton, whose volcanoes blow nitrogen ice 20 miles out.  Its valleys ooze ice.  Shortly, NASA will release Voyager's color photos of all this.  On Sunday, at the edge of the hubbub around Voyager, McDonnell Douglas achieved the first private launch of a rocket into Earth's orbit.  Voyager's fly-by of Neptune dazzles us in no small part because it involves time and scale that are beyond normal reckoning.  Voyager travels at 61,000 miles an hour; its images take four hours to reach us, traveling at the speed of light.  But of course other of Earth's land-bound voyagers are also at work -- amid the organs of the human body, deciphering the genetic code, discovering the most fundamental origins of disease; or squeezing additional billions of bytes of data onto the computer chips that make it possible to think seriously about understanding unknown frontiers out there and down here.  These events may rightly be called victories for the idea known as Western liberalism.  We are not surprised that some intellectuals, especially those such as Francis Fukuyama at the Department of State, stare into the face of these triumphs and see mostly melancholy.  But while Washington's wheels keep their noses pressed to their grindstones, the rest of us are free to look up and out, a simple act that lately has produced awe -- and most likely the courage -- to press forward into, for lack of a better word, history.  A federal court here denied a motion to dismiss an amended shareholder suit charging that 18 current and former directors and officials of Sundstrand Corp. were responsible for the company's involvement in a defense procurement scandal.  Judge Paul E. Plunkett said the plaintiffs' amended complaint contained "sufficient allegations" to allow the case to proceed in court without first being presented to the company's board.  The judge earlier this year had dismissed the case, saying the plaintiffs hadn't alleged adequate reasons for filing their complaint in court.  Sundstrand, based in Rockford, Ill., pleaded guilty last year to four counts of fraud against the Defense Department and agreed to pay $115 million in fines.  Richard M. Schilling, Sundstrand's general counsel, said the ruling "means that the allegations of the complaint are sufficient to prevent the outright dismissal of the case, but the decision does not address the merits of the plaintiffs' claims."  A spokesman explained that the plaintiffs had amended their complaint to raise "reasonable doubt," in the view of the judge, that the company's directors were "disinterested parties."  Holed up in slick chrome and glass offices in southwest Washington, a stubborn rear guard of Reaganites is still fighting a guerrilla war against big government.  Mr. Reagan may have gone back to California, but a majority of his appointees to the board of the Legal Services Corp. are continuing his battle to slash federal support for legal assistance to the poor.  The Reaganites at LSC, which provides about 77% of all funding for local poverty-law agencies, still have a key ally in the White House.  Though he lacks his predecessor's zeal for eliminating federal legal aid to the indigent, George Bush has quietly sheltered the Reagan appointees.  His tactic: failing to nominate replacements, even though the appointments of 10 of the 11 current board members have expired.  The White House attributes the delay in part to legal requirements about the makeup of the LSC board, such as the rule that no more than six members can be from one party.  Nominations probably won't be made until late fall, says Chase Untermeyer, President Bush's personnel director.  Foes of the LSC, meanwhile, are lobbying hard to block the expected nomination of former Rep. Caldwell Butler, a Virginia Republican attacked recently by the conservative newspaper Human Events as having been "frequently on the wrong side of the pro-life battles, right along with LSC-funded attorneys."  The slowness in choosing a new LSC board has permitted a six-person majority of holdover directors to step up efforts to discourage class-action suits on behalf of groups such as farm workers and inmates in overcrowded prisons.  The Reagan loyalists contend that for two decades, federally funded poverty lawyers have improperly pursued a liberal political agenda, rather than focusing on individual matters such as child-support disputes and landlord-tenant disagreements.  "Joe and Sally Taxpayer don't realize that their money is going to stop mechanization of agriculture or to promote homosexual rights or to promote abortion," argues LSC President Terrance Wear, a former aide to Sen. Jesse Helms (R., N.C.).  The current board has asked Congress to cut its budget by $13 million, to $295 million, for the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1.  In recent months, the LSC board has approved regulations prohibiting local grantees from suing over voter-redistricting plans or to protect prisoners' rights.  The board has required grantees who win attorneys' fees in successful cases to turn over part of the money to the government.  And the board has restricted representation of certain aliens seeking permanent-residence status.  The LSC even paid $77,000 to a former Reagan administration Justice Department official to research and write a memo arguing that the agency's independent status violates the Constitution.  Mr. Wear contends that the LSC improperly encroaches on executive authority because the president can't fire board members.  One solution, he says, would be passage of a pending bill that would make the LSC part of the Justice Department.  The American Bar Association and prominent legal educators have berated the LSC board but haven't gotten enough support in Congress to rein in the Reaganites' activities.  Sen. Warren Rudman (R., N.H.) angrily accuses the board majority of "absolutely bad faith" for repeatedly disobeying Congress.  His main objections: the board majority's advocating appointment of like-minded replacements and its attempt to start a program that would encourage private lawyers to compete with legal-services offices for federal grants.  Mr. Rudman added an amendment to a recent spending bill requiring the LSC to suspend the competitive-bidding policy until President Bush appoints new directors.  But that hasn't stopped Mr. Wear and his colleagues.  They held more public hearings last week at which witnesses testified the LSC should follow other federal agencies, such as the Education Department, in distributing money competitively.  Competition, says Mr. Wear, will yield more-efficient service to the poor because low-cost law partnerships, such as those offering prepaid legal-services plans to corporate employees, will replace entrenched, wasteful grant recipients.  Since the April announcement of plans to solicit competitive bids, he adds, the LSC has received more than 400 responses from interested lawyers.  Sen. Rudman backs the general concept of competition but charges that the "board defied the Congress and the law" by initiating the program without permission.  "There is absolutely no trust in the present board," he adds.  "They have adopted regulations that hinder legal services, they have held secret meetings . . . and they have done audits {of local grant recipients} that were actually harassment."  Democratic critics go even further.  They say competitive bidding is a thinly disguised move to drive career poverty lawyers out of business.  These critics contend that competition will attract low bids from lawyers unfamiliar with the special problems of the poor, such as the difficulty of obtaining welfare benefits.  Federal funding for indigent legal services began under President Lyndon Johnson and has been a favorite conservative target ever since.  As California governor, Ronald Reagan had bitterly opposed lawsuits brought by legal-services lawyers attempting to block his cuts in state welfare budgets.  As president, he urged Congress to deny the LSC any funding.  When Congress continued to appropriate money anyway, Mr. Reagan appointed LSC directors who shared his view that the agency shouldn't support lawyers interested in bringing class actions with political implications.  But boosters of the LSC say such suits actually improve efficiency.  Several recent surveys estimate that only 15% to 20% of the legal needs of the indigent are currently being met.  "You can conserve resources with one big lawsuit on behalf of a whole group of people," argues Thomas Smegal, a Republican Reagan appointee to the LSC board who nevertheless has consistently dissented from actions taken by what he calls "the Reagan gang of six."  Moreover, Mr. Smegal contends, while legal-services work has traditionally attracted liberal lawyers, "there are no real numbers" to support the charge that federal grantees spend too much time on "ideological" work.  As an example, he points to the internal debate that preceded passage of the regulation barring suits over voter redistricting.  The LSC majority expressed outrage that federally funded lawyers had recently spent 28,000 hours on such cases.  But, says Mr. Smegal, that number actually referred to the work of hundreds of lawyers over a 12-year period.  "It worked out to six hours per lawyer per year," he adds.  While the LSC's recent restrictions will force some grant recipients to abandon lawsuits on matters such as prison overcrowding, advocates for conservative causes are enjoying new support from the agency.  "The {board majority's} attitude," says Mr. Smegal, "is that liberal groups had their chance in the '70s under Carter; now we're going to get ours."  For example, the National Legal Center for the Medically Dependent and Disabled, which represents the indigent in efforts to prevent the cessation of hospital life support, began receiving LSC grants in 1984 and now gets $432,000 a year.  James Bopp, who heads the Indianapolis-based group, also serves as general counsel to the National Right to Life Organization, a leading anti-abortion lobby.  He attributes the relatively recent federal generosity toward the Indiana center to "President Reagan's advocacy . . . for interests that weren't previously being served" by the LSC.  ---  @ Recent Moves by Board  @ Of Legal Services Corp.  -- Barred voter redistricting suits  -- Barred prisoners' rights suits  -- Restricted representation of certain aliens  -- Concluded the agency's structure is unconstitutional  Votrax Inc. said Peter C. Schmitt, chairman and former chief executive officer, and two other directors resigned, as part of a continuing restructuring.  The company said it named to the board Walter Cunningham, 57 years old, managing general partner of the Genesis Fund, and Robert Klumpp, 65, a limited partner in Klumpp Investment L.P.  A new chairman hasn't been named, a Votrax spokeswoman said, adding that the venture capital funds represented by Messrs.  Cunningham and Klumpp "are contemplating" investments in Votrax.  Votrax designs and makes interactive telephone response systems, such as those that allow a customer to call a bank and perform transactions using a touch-tone phone.  The resignations of the directors, Mr. Schmitt, Richard P. Whitney and Gary D. Johnson, were effective immediately, the company said, citing their decision to "pursue other interests."  The Votrax board now has five directors, including the company's president and chief executive, Larry W. Jernigan.  Votrax said further additions to the board are expected.  In 1981, Messrs.  Schmitt and Whitney joined with a third investor to buy Votrax from Federal Screw Works.  Mr. Schmitt was the company's chief executive until last November.  His departure comes in the wake of a turbulent year for Votrax.  The company had a loss of about $3.2 million in its year ended June 30, compared with net income of $321,686 a year earlier.  Since last March, the company has cut its work force 40% to just 35 employees.  When Archer-Daniels-Midland Inc. talks, politicians listen.  Last year, both George Bush and Michael Dukakis supported increased subsidies for ethanol, a grain alcohol fuel additive used to make gasohol.  Now ADM is close to getting taxpayers to subsidize a new chemical additive to gasoline without even having Congress vote on it.  ADM has always been dependent on its political pull.  Its three main businesses -- producing ethanol fuel, corn sweeteners and soybean products -- all rely heavily on government subsidies.  Its ethanol business benefits from free surplus corn and a 60-cent-a-gallon tax credit Congress passed in 1980 to solve the "energy crisis" and win some farm votes.  Even with such massive subsidies, ADM's ethanol business is barely profitable.  Enter ethyl tertiary butyl ether (ETBE), a new chemical gasoline additive that uses ethanol in its manufacture.  The company would sell a lot more ethanol if ETBE could somehow qualify for the 60-cent-a-gallon alcohol fuels credit, even though the ethanol disappears in the manufacturing process before any ETBE is added to gasoline.  A normal company would despair of getting such a blatant subsidy through Congress in an era when Members are trying to show their independence from special interests.  Not ADM.  It and other ethanol producers have persuaded no fewer than 75 Senators, including 61 who voted on the original 1980 tax credit, to write the Treasury Department asking it to rule that ETBE is eligible for the tax credit.  The Senators admit ETBE didn't exist when the credit was enacted but claim they meant to "provide flexibility for new applications."  Senator Bill Bradley of New Jersey fears that Treasury will view the letter as congressional pressure to rule in favor of ETBE, especially since Congress has demanded that Treasury issue a ruling no later than Oct. 15.  At least one of the Senators who lobbied Treasury is having second thoughts about this arm-twisting.  GOP Senator Bill Roth of Delaware says he now thinks Congress should itself decide if ETBE deserves a subsidy, not unelected bureaucrats.  Congress is afraid to vote on the ETBE subsidy because it would cost $500 million or more over the next five years.  Opponents would also no doubt bring up a recent General Accounting Office study that noted that ADM has received more than $4 billion in subsidies since 1985, and currently accounts for 66% of ethanol capacity.  Subsidizing ETBE would only fatten its coffers more.  Even though ethanol tax subsidies don't expire until 1992, ADM and other producers are already talking about using the favorable political climate to extend them during this session of Congress.  Some even want to increase the 60-cent-per-gallon subsidy.  ADM has stepped up its schedule of pro-ethanol ads on the Sunday-morning interview shows and last year expanded its ethanol-producing capacity.  The Treasury Department should resist Congress's blatant attempt to micromanage a tax ruling on behalf of a politically powerful lobby.  Far too many special-interest subsidies already pass in the form of legislation.  If Congress can establish a precedent allowing it to expand the pork barrel by merely dictating to the executive branch what it really "meant" years before in some 1,000-page continuing resolution, there will be no end to the number of pigs at the trough.  After Pete Rose, a lot of sports enthusiasts probably thought it was safe to enjoy the national pastimes again.  Ready for the NFL steroids scandal?  The National Football League plans to identify players who test positive for using steroids, the stuff sprinter Ben Johnson used to make himself look like a character in a superhero cartoon.  The NFL apparently doesn't think steroids produce superheroes; it'll suspend users for 30 days.  The players' union sued in federal court to stop the testing program, but Judge Thomas Hogan ruled yesterday that the players had been given enough time to make themselves able to pass the steroids test.  Flattened quarterbacks no doubt have long wondered what their sackers were eating.  U.S. business failures fell 14.5% in the first half of 1989, reflecting improvements in the nation's weakest regions as well as overall stability, according to a Dun & Bradstreet Corp. survey.  The business information concern said failures decreased to 26,234 from 30,697 the year earlier, marking the best improvement in over a decade.  The only industry segment to report significantly higher failures was the finance, insurance and real-estate sector, where failures rose 11.7% to 1,431 from 1,281.  "The troubled savings and loan industry, as well as stress in the real-estate sector, contributed to the increase," said Joseph W. Duncan, corporate economist and chief statistician.  In other sectors, mining failures fell 25.4% and agriculture failures fell 23.5%.  Both industries had reported a surge in bankruptcies over the past few years.  Regionally, failures were down substantially in seven of the nine U.S. Census regions.  Only the South Atlantic states reported a significant increase in bankruptcies.  Failures in that region rose 10.2%, driven largely by a sharp rise in Georgia, where they escalated 50.1%.  Mr. Duncan attributed this, in part, to "fallout after high levels of entrepreneurial activity in and around Atlanta."  The largest percentage decrease occurred in the agricultural states of the West North Central region, down 31.3%, followed closely by the Middle Atlantic states, down 29.2%.  Midway Airlines said directors amended the company's shareholder rights plan, reducing the point at which an outsider's stake would trigger the plan's dilutive poison-pill measure.  Under the revised plan, holders of the previously issued rights will be allowed to buy Midway shares at half-price if a third party acquires 15% or more of the company's shares outstanding.  Under the earlier plan, the rights would take effect until an outside party acquired a 20% position.  As is typical in such defensive measures, the rights attached to shares of the party holding the triggering stake are voided when the 15% threshold is reached.  The amended plan is "intended to enable all Midway Airlines stockholders to realize the long-term value of their investment in the company," said Chairman David R. Hinson.  The company said the amendment "is preventive in nature" and is "not being adopted in response to any known effort to acquire control of the company."  However, Ampco-Pittsburgh Corp. holds a 6.6% stake in Midway, which it acquired in late July and early August.  The buy-in sparked rumors that Ampco may seek to take control of Midway.  United Auto Workers union members at Diamond-Star Motors Corp. ratified a three-year contract that contains some of the strongest job protection provisions ever in a U.S. auto industry agreement.  A UAW spokesman stopped short of saying that the pact with Diamond-Star, a 50-50 joint venture of Chrysler Corp. and Mitsubishi Motors Corp. of Japan, could be used as a precedent when the union and the Big Three U.S. auto makers negotiate new three-year contracts next year.  However, he said, "the principle of making job security more and more absolute is one we're working on."  In effect, the UAW is trading its old job-protection strategy -- strict rules about which tasks a worker may perform -- for a more straightforward approach: A flat guarantee in the Diamond-Star contract that workers will stay on the payroll unless there is an imminent corporate collapse.  The UAW seems determined to use this contract to signal its resolve to press the job-security issue in contract talks next year with General Motors Corp., Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler Corp.  The Diamond-Star contract is particularly important for the union in the wake of its failure last month to organize Nissan Motor Co.'s U.S. assembly plant.  Nissan turned back the UAW in part because the Japanese auto maker convinced employees at the Tennessee facility that job-security guarantees the UAW negotiated with the Big Three in 1987 hadn't stopped thousands of workers from being laid off during the past two years.  But the new Diamond-Star agreement's job-security provisions appear close to ideal from the UAW standpoint, and go beyond similar agreements between the UAW and two other Japanese-managed U.S. plants: Mazda Motor Co.'s facility in Flat Rock, Mich., and New United Motor Manufacturing Inc., a GM-Toyota Motor Corp. joint venture in Fremont, Calif.  The contract, which was ratified Saturday with 76.5% of a rank-and-file vote, prohibits layoffs at Diamond-Star's Normal, Ill., plant except when the "long-term viability of the company" is threatened.  Further, should any employees be laid off, they will receive a guaranteed 80% of their salary for 52 weeks.  By comparison, the UAW agreements with Ford, GM and Chrysler allow the companies to idle workers when sales go soft.  Special supplemental unemployment benefits funds are supposed to provide the laid-off workers with as much as 95% of their take-home pay for as long as two years.  However, the GM fund that pays these benefits has been so depleted by repeated sales-related production cuts that many laid-off GM workers are getting the extra benefits for as few as six weeks.  Many have had their payments cut by one-fifth.  In return for the tough job-security language in the Diamond-Star contract, the UAW agreed to give the joint-venture company considerable flexibility in managing its operations.  The plant will have just three union job classifications, instead of the dozens still found in Big Three plants.  This means Diamond-Star managers can have the plant's 2,300 union "associates" work in teams, with each worker performing several different tasks.  This flexibility made the no-layoff provisions "more palatable," to the company, a Diamond-Star spokesman said.  In addition, the new contract calls for Diamond-Star workers to achieve pay parity with their Chrysler counterparts by 1992.  The UAW said it expects base pay for Diamond-Star assembly workers to be about $17.01 an hour by 1992, up from $12.79 an hour now.  As of Sept. 4, Chrysler assembly workers will earn an average of $15.26 an hour, a Chrysler spokesman said.  A late surge of computer-driven buying helped the Nasdaq over-the-counter market rise fractionally on weak volume.  After declining for most of the day, the Nasdaq Composite Index got a boost from a burst of computer-driven buying.  Traders said stock-index arbitragers bought the OTC's largest stocks that are part of the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index.  The arbitrage traders buy and sell stocks and stock futures, trying to take advantage of price discrepancies between the two.  Movements in the S&P 500 often trigger such "program" buying of stocks.  As a result, the Nasdaq composite improved 0.44 to 467.19.  The Nasdaq Financial Index declined 0.03 to 463.10, while the Nasdaq 100 Index of large nonfinancial stocks rose 1.28 to 442.92.  Among the big stocks that were briskly traded, MCI Communications dropped 1/8 to 39 1/8 on 1.4 million shares.  First Executive eased 3/8 to 11 1/2 on slightly more than one million shares.  Volume totaled almost 954,000 shares in Intel, which slipped 1/4 to 30 3/4.  But Micron Technology added 3/4 to 14 3/4 on 584,000 shares and Seagate Technology improved 1/4 to 12 3/4 on 571,000 shares.  Class A shares of Tele-Communications jumped 1 1/4 to 40 on 518,000 shares.  Tele-Communications called for early redemption of the $114 million outstanding of its 12 3/8% senior subordinated debentures due 2003.  In a statement, the company said that the retirement of this debenture issue, coupled with a previous debt retirement, should result in Tele-Communications saving $12 million annually over the next 10 years.  Additionally, Barney Schotters, vice president of finance at Tele-Communications, said that the debentures slated for redemption contained covenants that restrict the company's purchase of its common shares.  He said the company currently has no plans for a big stock repurchase.  But, he acknowledged that the company will have much more flexibility regarding a stock repurchase than it did in the past.  Another large-capitalization OTC issue, Ashton-Tate also gained on heavy volume.  Overall, trading activity, which often is calm on Mondays, was particularly sedate yesterday.  Many traders and investors were either vacationing or beginning the Labor Day holiday early, traders said.  Share turnover totaled only 100.2 million shares.  For the month, average daily volume stands at roughly 132.2 million shares.  That's just below the daily average of 132.9 million shares so far this year.  Meridian Bancorp, which last Friday offered to buy First Pennsylvania for about $704 million in stock, said it agreed to purchase about $30 million in First Pennsylvania warrants held by Marine Midland Banks.  The warrants represent 24.9% of First Pennsylvania.  On the news, Meridian lost 2 1/4 to 23.  More than 900,000 Meridian shares changed hands.  The transaction hinges on Meridian's reaching an agreement to acquire the balance of First Pennsylvania.  Marine Midland has an agreement to acquire First Pennsylvania for $15 a share, or $600 million, in 1990.  In other takeover news, Bel Fuse was unchanged at 6 1/4.  The company said it rejected a proposed $7.50-a-share acquisition offer from Santa Monica Partners and Initio Inc.  Shares of Durr-Fillauer Medical, a medical supply distributor, slipped 1/4 to 19 on 489,000 shares.  The company said there is no news that would have prompted the selling.  Cordis gained 1 1/4 to 14 1/4 after Prudential-Bache reiterated a "strong buy" recommendation for the company, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Flight International Group plunged 2 3/8 to 6 3/4 after saying it may report a first-quarter loss of about $1.6 million for the period ended July 31.  The company earned about $548,000 in the year-earlier quarter.  Duty Free International added 3 1/2 to 45, spurred by the company's report that it earned 69 cents a share in the second quarter, compared with 49 cents a share a year earlier.  Canonie Environmental dropped 2 to 17 1/2 after it said it expects to report a small loss for the second quarter ending Thursday.  In the year-earlier second quarter, the company reported net income of $1.7 million, or 30 cents a share, on revenue of $13.5 million.  The environmental waste management company said delays in completing a major project resulted in added costs and lower profit margins.  Groundwater Technology lost 1 to 26 1/4.  Late Friday, the company announced that its president and chief executive officer, Paul Sanders, intends to resign this fall.  Radiation Systems rose 1 3/8 to 11 3/8.  The company, which earlier this month announced a big order to supply antennas for news programs to schools, is the subject of a favorable article in the current issue of Barron's.  United Parcel Service Inc. said it agreed to purchase a Boeing Co. 747 aircraft from Japan Air Lines.  The price wasn't disclosed.  UPS expects to take delivery of the plane next April.  The company currently has six 747 freighters; the plane will increase its jet fleet to 115 aircraft.  A federal judge threw out a Texas Air Corp. affiliate's antitrust lawsuit against United Airlines's computer-reservation system.  The Texas Air affiliate, which competes with United in the computer-reservation business, claimed that United was discouraging travel agents from using the Texas Air system.  The Texas Air company, System One Direct Access Inc., alleged that United threatened the travel agents with punitive damages and employed other tactics in violation of antitrust laws.  But U.S. Judge Milton Pollack said System One had presented no evidence that United's computer-reservations system had engaged in anti-competitive practices.  Ruling in favor of United, the judge also ordered 20 travel agencies that had dropped the United system in favor of System One to pay damages to United for breaking their contracts with the UAL Corp. subsidiary.  Chicago-based United sued the 20 travel agencies after they broke their contracts and switched to System One.  Under the agencies' contract with System One, the Texas Air affiliate agreed to defend the agencies in any lawsuits brought by United for breach of contract.  The System One suit and the suits against the travel agencies were consolidated in federal court in Manhattan to expedite the litigation.  A spokesman for Houston-based Texas Air said he hadn't seen the judge's ruling and couldn't comment.  Attorneys for the travel agencies couldn't be reached and a spokesman for United said he couldn't comment  Texas Air and the travel agencies had claimed the contracts with United's Apollo system were unenforceable because they allegedly violated antitrust laws.  Attorneys for the travel agencies also had claimed that some of the contracts were executed under duress and coercion.  The suit, filed in February in Texas and later moved to federal court in Manhattan, was part of Texas Air's effort to challenge the dominance of United and American Airlines in the computer-reservation business.  The reservation subsidiaries are important for the airlines because they collect fees on the reservations that they book.  The systems are considered powerful marketing tools as well because travel agents are more likely to book traffic with the airline that supplies the reservation system that the agent uses.  Cornell University astronomers said they believe they have discovered a galaxy in the making, possibly undermining theories of the universe's evolution.  "We found a galaxy without stars," said Martha Haynes, a Cornell astronomer who made the discovery on a giant radio telescope at Arecibo, Puerto Rico.  "This galaxy is just getting ready" to become a profusion of stars.  Ms. Haynes found the unborn galaxy along with Riccardo Giovanelli, another Cornell astronomer.  Galaxies are clusters of billions of stars; the Earth and the sun are part of the cluster known as the Milky Way.  By the prevailing theories of the origin of the universe, galaxies started to form shortly after the Big Bang, a cataclysmic explosion of gases about 16 billion years ago that launched the universe, and they continued forming for about 10 billion years.  So every galaxy should have been born billions of years ago.  The Cornell observations contradict this time theory.  Ms. Haynes said she found the unborn galaxy -- a massive cloud of hydrogen gas 10 times larger than the Milky Way -- 65 million light years away.  In astronomy, distance translates into time, so the cloud observed by Ms. Haynes actually corresponds to the cloud as it was 65 million years ago.  Because these clouds take hundreds of millions, perhaps billions, of years to form stars, the cloud is now evolving into a galaxy.  "This is the first time a galaxy-sized thing has been caught in the act of forming," said James Gunn, a Princeton University astrophysicist familiar with the work, which was conducted in March but will be published in the Astrophysical Journal of Letters in November.  "This is the Rosetta stone of galaxy formation."  Galaxies form from the collapse of dust and hot gases, mostly hydrogen, under the weight of their own gravitation.  Ms. Haynes theorized that this particular galaxy, which she calls simply "The Cloud," is taking so long to form because it's only slightly more dense than necessary for matter to collapse.  "It's forming right now, under our noses," said Mr. Gunn.  K.Y. Lo, a University of Illinois astronomer, who also has searched for unborn galaxies, cautioned that the discovery needs to be confirmed.  He said astronomers must make sure that the hydrogen cloud isn't leftover material associated with another galaxy, or that the cloud isn't inhabited by faint stars.  "The evidence is tantalizing," he said.  "But it might not be a proto-galaxy with pristine {hydrogen} gas."  Ms. Haynes attributed the discovery largely to luck.  She said that she and her colleague, Mr. Giovanelli, were studying the galaxy UGC-7394, when they turned the radio telescope to what they thought was empty space to calibrate the instrument.  To their surprise, they found the empty space emitted radio signals indicating a huge hydrogen cloud.  The radio signals "looked like they would if there was a galaxy there," Ms. Haynes said, "but there was nothing there."  The hydrogen cloud, which isn't detectable by optical telescopes, is just south of the Virgo cluster -- the cluster of galaxies nearest the cluster containing Earth.  Mr. Gunn said he expected that the Cornell finding would lead to the discovery of other unborn galaxies in different parts of the universe.  After scientists have a number of hydrogen clouds to compare, he said, they should be able to learn more about what happened in the first sliver of a second after the Big Bang, when the primordial matter from which galaxies were formed exploded outward.  Jonathan Grindlay, chairman of Harvard University's astronomy department, said the Cornell work might indicate what will happen at the end of time.  Astronomers currently debate whether the universe will continue expanding forever or slow down and collapse into a cataclysmic Big Crunch.  The existence of unexpected hydrogen clouds would indicate there's more mass than previously believed in space.  "That goes in the direction that the universe will collapse," he said.  The Federal Communications Commission rejected an MCI Communications Corp. plan to offer a direct-calling service to the U.S. from Spain.  American Telephone & Telegraph Co. had contested MCI's service on the grounds that MCI had agreed to pay Spain's monopoly telephone company, Telefonica, an accounting rate at a substantial premium over AT&T service and that MCI hadn't submitted necessary FCC disclosures and a waiver request.  AT&T complained that Spain was trying to force the company into paying a higher accounting rate, too.  The commission rejected MCI's argument that its service from Spain was substantially different from AT&T's, and ordered MCI to file revisions to its plan with the agency by Sept. 5.  Under the service, a customer with an MCI credit card could place a call from any phone in Spain to a U.S. operator who would complete the call.  AT&T's service, USA-DIRECT, is available from only a few special phones.  A spokeswoman for MCI had no comment.  American Telephone & Telegraph Co. introduced a detailed billing service for business customers that will use new calling cards issued by the telephone giant.  AT&T executives said the service, Execu-bill, was designed to fight competitors that also issue bills that allocate charges by department and other variables.  Because customers using the service also will get new AT&T cards, the service too will help solve the problem of other long-distance companies' using AT&T card numbers.  Under a federal court order last year, almost any long-distance telephone company can use the numbers of about 32 million AT&T calling cards to execute bills.  This is because the initial AT&T cards were issued before the Bell System breakup in 1984, and billing is done by the Bell companies that were divested from AT&T.  Businesses and consumers have complained that long-distance companies that use the AT&T cards often charge exorbitant rates.  Merrill Tutton, an AT&T vice president, said about one-third of the 32 million AT&T cards are held by business customers.  About 100 customers holding about 100,000 cards have already signed up for the new service.  Mr. Tutton said he believes AT&T could enroll between 500 to 1,000 business customers within the next year.  Current customers can get the service free for the first two years, he said.  Billing for the new service is being done for AT&T under contract with Cincinnati Bell, Mr. Tutton said.  Execu-bill is the first of several new billing options AT&T plans to introduce in the next several months, he said.  Some new billing services will be for residential customers, and might or might not involve replacing existing AT&T calling cards.  Costly Housing Leads  To Condo Resurgence  CONDOS AND CO-OPs are making a comeback, thanks to unaffordable single-family housing in many cities.  For years consumers spurned condominiums because of widespread horror stories about shoddy construction and depreciation caused by overbuilding.  High-density living also turned off buyers, some of whom discovered that a condo is too similar to apartment living.  But in recent months, condo sales have gained, mainly because of affordability.  U.S. condo sales rose a seasonally adjusted 8.1% in the second quarter, to 386,000 from the 357,000 in the first quarter, and were up 21% from the 320,000 units sold in the 1988 fourth quarter.  "There's no question that the condo market has had a big resurgence," says Joel S. Singer, chief economist for the California Association of Realtors.  Condos still don't appreciate as quickly as single-family homes, and problems with construction quality persist.  But at a median of $84,800 in the U.S., they are the only opening for buyers in expensive markets such as the Northeast, California and parts of the Midwest, where the median house costs $145,000 or more.  Economists point to other reasons for the condo's resurgence: more sophisticated marketing and a growing number of "empty nest" parents.  Saving Property Values  From Drug-War Ruin  HOMEOWNERS and their allies increasingly are fighting drugs in their neighborhoods to protect property values.  Some campaigns, however, have been controversial.  Residents of a Houston neighborhood have taken to patrolling their homes in cars equipped with CBs, notifying police when they spot suspicious people.  Houston officials and apartment-house owners are razing decrepit buildings where drugs are dispensed when they can't afford to fix up the places.  In Chicago, Catholic churches have launched campaigns to persuade neighborhood stores to stop selling drug paraphernalia.  And in Oakland, police have moved against 111 residences in the past year by using a state law that allows the city to sue homeowners if their buildings represent a public nuisance.  If the city wins a suit, it can fine the owners $25,000.  Oakland also has the power to raze abandoned buildings where drug activity occurs, but a police official says destroying housing isn't the city's intent.  "We want to bring our housing stock back and make our neighborhoods as valuable as possible," he says.  All told, more than 1,800 groups in big cities have established drug-fighting programs, according to a recent survey by the National Center for Neighborhood Enterprises, a nonprofit group.  Most of the efforts are too new to show any appreciable effect, but some have created hard feelings.  The American Civil Liberties Union complained when the Atlanta police last year began stopping and searching residents in one neighborhood.  The ACLU said the police targeted young black men, regardless of suspicion.  Police, conceding they may have been overzealous, say the practice has been discontinued; they now rely on tips.  California Home Market  Is Taking a Breather  AFTER MORE THAN a year of torrid price increases and sales, California's housing market is showing signs of slowing down.  Sales have cooled since peaking in March, says the California Association of Realtors.  In June, the most recent month on record, sales fell to 486,645 units sold on a seasonally adjusted basis, a decline from the 536,158 units sold in May and off from the 548,273 units sold in April.  The slowdown, to the surprise of no one, is a result of high prices and the accompanying hefty down payments.  "The market has peaked.  We're going to see real evidence over the next three years," says Ken Rosen, chairman of the University of California at Berkeley Center for Real Estate and Urban Economics.  Some sellers have been forced to retreat from their asking prices.  The median state price fell slightly in June to $200,445, off from May's $201,930 median and down ever so slightly from the $200,784 median in April.  Even with the slowdown, California's housing market remains the healthiest among any state or region.  Price appreciation is still running in double-digits.  Nevertheless, many of the state's economists expect that the price increases will continue to slow to a range of from 5% to 10% in each of the next three years.  ---  @ Cooling in California  @ First-half home sales  @ MEDIAN EXISTING  @ PRICES HOME SALES*  @ Jan. $184,711 618,874  @ Feb. 191,352 588,418  @ March 195,815 638,005  @ April 200,784 548,273  @ May 201,930 536,158  @ June 200,445 486,645  @ *Seasonally adjusted annual rate  @ Source: California Association of Realtors  Odds and Ends  ATLANTA WAS VOTED the best city in which to locate a business by more than 400 chief executives, according to Cushman & Wakefield, a New York real estate concern.  Seattle, San Diego, Chicago and Tampa, Fla., rounded out the top five, which took into account quality of life and availability of skilled labor. . . .  Thinking big, Takenaka Corp. of Japan has completed blueprints for a $32.4 billion tower twice as tall as the 110-story Sears building in Chicago.  Completion date: 2003.  The Food and Drug Administration, continuing its crackdown on generic-drug makers, said it intends to withdraw its approval of one of Bolar Pharmaceutical Co.'s top-selling generic drugs.  The agency said there is confusion about whether the company's generic version of the brand-name blood-pressure drug Dyazide actually passed muster in 1987 laboratory testing to determine if it is as effective as Dyazide.  At the same time, the FDA indicated in a statement yesterday that it doesn't consider Bolar's product to be the therapeutic equivalent of Dyazide, which is made by SmithKline Beecham PLC.  The FDA also said its investigators didn't uncover any evidence that Bolar passed off Dyazide as its own in order to win marketing approval for its generic drug.  Eugene Pfeifer, an outside lawyer for Bolar, said the company was "happy that we were cleared of being crooks," but was "disappointed' by the FDA's action.  "Bolar intends to defend its product and the original FDA approval vigorously," Mr. Pfeifer said.  "At the same time, it will conduct another study to show beyond any shadow of doubt the equivalency of its drug to Dyazide."  The company asserted that its version of Dyazide "is safe, effective and may be used with assurance of clinical effectiveness."  The FDA's action could significantly hurt Bolar -- and help its competitors.  The Copiague, N.Y., company derives an estimated 30% of its earnings from its version of Dyazide.  Standing to gain from Bolar's loss of marketing approval would be SmithKline and Mylan Laboratories Inc., of Pittsburgh, which pioneered a brandname blood-pressure drug called Maxzide, as well as generic manufacturers of Maxzide.  Bolar is the third company in the generic drug scandal to face the withdrawal of marketing approval for a generic product.  Last week, the FDA notified Par Pharmaceutical Inc. of Spring Valley, N.Y., that it intends to disapprove three of its generic drugs, and it told Vitarine Pharmaceuticals Inc. of Springfield Gardens, N.Y., that it plans to withdraw approval of 25 Vitarine generics.  The FDA said the companies' drug-approval applications contained "untrue statements of material fact."  Both companies, in anticipation of the FDA's formal notices, voluntarily recalled or suspended production of the generic products involved.  Vitarine has admitted substituting Dyazide for its generic product in order to gain the agency's approval.  The FDA notified Bolar of its withdrawal plan in a letter from Daniel Michels, director of compliance.  "We invite you to advise us promptly of the processes of removing the drug from the market," the letter said.  In its statement yesterday, the agency said its investigators discovered that an independent laboratory hired by Bolar had run so-called bio-equivalence tests on two batches of the drug in early 1987.  One batch proved to be the equivalent of Dyazide; the other didn't measure up, according to the lab's records.  "On May 19, 1987," the statement said, "Bolar asked the lab to switch the batch numbers because, it said, there had been a mixup in the labels attached to the batch samples submitted to the lab."  The agency further said that its investigators haven't been able to "fully establish" which batch actually passed the bio-equivalence test.  Mr. Pfeifer, Bolar's lawyer, said that the FDA was aware of the mix-up in labeling when the drug gained approval two years ago.  "The facts haven't changed since then," he said.  Bolar will seek a hearing on the FDA's withdrawal plan, he said, adding that a "secretary's error shouldn't result in any withdrawal or downgrading for the product."  While withdrawal proceedings are under way, the agency plans to revise its rating of Bolar's blood-pressure drug on the official list of approved drugs.  "This change," the FDA said, "would tell pharmacists and physicians that the agency doesn't consider the generic to be of proved therapeutic equivalence to the brand-name drug Dyazide."  Yesterday, the FDA noted that a post-marketing test required by the state of Tennessee showed that Bolar's product isn't the equivalent of Dyazide.  CRAIG Corp., Los Angeles, declared a 2-for-1 stock split, payable Sept. 29 to stock of record Sept. 8.  The summer doldrums encumbered the bond market yesterday as prices fell in extremely thin trading.  The dull trading activity came ahead of several key economic reports due out this week.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond fell about 1/2 point, or about $5 per $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield, which moves in the opposite direction from its price, rose to 8.23% from 8.19% Friday.  Some analysts attribute the downward drift of bond prices to the continuing difficulty the market is having absorbing the glut of new supply.  "The market is still languishing under the supply it's taken on in the past three weeks," said Joseph Liro, a vice president and money market economist at S.G. Warburg Securities & Co.  He pointed out that slightly more than $100 billion of Treasury bills, notes and bonds have been sold during that period.  Others, however, cautioned against making too much of yesterday's performance because trading was unusually light.  Many domestic investors are on vacation while many European and other foreign investors were kept out of the market because British financial institutions were closed in observance of a bank holiday.  Other investors, traders said, were reluctant to invest ahead of the coming economic reports.  "People are nervous about the gross national product report" due to be released this morning, said Thomas Prapas, managing director of fixed-income investments at Clemente Capital Corp.  He said until more is known about the economy and the direction of interest rates, many investors will be hesitant to take new positions in the bond market.  In the meantime, said Mr. Prapas, "the bond market will trade in narrow ranges" with the yield on the benchmark bond fluctuating between 8.0% and 8.5%.  Real gross national product, the value of the nation's goods and services adjusted for inflation, is expected to be revised upward to show growth at a 2.5% annual rate in the second quarter, according to the average of estimates of 14 economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report.  In an earlier report, the Commerce Department initially reported second-quarter GNP at an annual growth rate of 1.7%.  Economists began to revise their GNP estimates Aug. 17, after the June merchandise trade report was released.  The report showed the nation's trade deficit contracted to $8.17 billion, the smallest shortfall in more than four years.  The reduction, which was driven in part by a 1.5% increase in exports, provided additional evidence that the U.S. economy retains some vigor, even if the growth isn't as strong as it was earlier this year.  Last week, the government revised the growth in June orders for new durable goods to 1.4% from 0.4%, reflecting a manufacturing sector that was stronger in June than had originally been forecast.  Also due out today is the latest estimate of corporate profits and new single-family home sales.  Tomorrow, a report on personal income and expenditures will be released.  On Friday, the Labor Department's employment report is due out.  Meanwhile, short-term interest rates were mixed at the government's weekly Treasury bill auction.  The average discount rate on new three-month Treasury bills was 7.94%, down slightly from last week's average auction rate of 7.99%.  The average discount rate on new six-month Treasury bills rose slightly to 7.88%, compared with 7.85% at last week's auction.  Treasury Securities  Treasury securities ended between 1/8 and 1/2 point lower in very light trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 98 23/32, compared with 99 5/32 Friday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted in when-issued trading at a price of 98 2/32 to yield 8.27%, compared with 98 13/32 to yield 8.22% Friday.  The new two-year notes were quoted in when-issued trading at a price of 99 19/32 to yield 8.4%.  Here are details of yesterday's Treasury bill auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon-equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @ Applications ......... $22,275,770,000 $21,461,310,000  @ Accepted bids ........ $7,232,805,000 $7,201,410,000  @ Accepted at low price 58% 6%  @ Accepted noncompet'ly $1,209,405,000 $1,130,850,000  @ Average price (Rate) 97.993 (7.94%) 96.016 (7.88%)  @ High price (Rate) .... 97.998 (7.92%) 96.026 (7.86%)  @ Low price (Rate) ..... 97.993 (7.94%) 96.006 (7.90%)  @ Coupon equivalent .... 8.21% 8.32%  Both issues are dated Aug. 31.  The 13-week bills mature Nov. 30, and the 26-week bills mature March 1, 1990.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds ended 1/4 to 1/2 point lower.  In the junk bond market, traders say news that financially troubled Resorts International Inc. won't make interest payments on $925 million of secured and unsecured notes was no surprise.  Resorts bonds are considered to be among the riskiest junk bonds in the market, with yields that exceed 30%.  In a letter to bondholders, company Chairman Merv Griffin said the casino-hotel company's cash flow was less than expected and that it was taking longer than anticipated to sell certain assets.  Mr. Griffin said the company will unveil a recapitalization plan at a Sept. 19 bondholders meeting at its casino in Atlantic City, N.J., the company's base.  "There's been a lot of talk about the restructuring, so the bonds have been trading lower for some time.  The news today wasn't too much of a shock and had been pretty much discounted last week," one trader said.  Resorts' bonds didn't trade yesterday.  Last week, however, the company's bonds lost as much as 5 1/4 points on rumors the company was having difficulty meeting interest payments.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were 1/8 to 1/4 point softer late yesterday.  A $114.7 million issue of Houston water and sewer system revenue bonds topped the primary market.  Underwriters led by PaineWebber Inc. set tentative reoffering yields for the issue between 6% in 1990 and 7.15% in 2003.  Among seasoned dollar bond issues, New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% securities of 2018 were off 1/4 point late yesterday at 97 5/8 bid to yield 7.37%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities ended 5/32 to 7/32 point lower.  Issues with premium coupons, such as 10% and 10 1/2% securities, fared better than discount securities, such as 9% issues.  This pattern is typical in a falling bond market as investors seek securities with shorter average lives and higher yields.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities ended at 96 18/32, down 7/32.  The yield was 9.63% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the Treasury 10-year note narrowed 0.02 percentage point to 1.36.  In derivative markets, traders said the market for high-yielding securities called "companion" bonds has been depressed because thrifts, which had been the major purchasers, are no longer in the market.  As a result, some Wall Street underwriters of real estate mortgage investment conduits are stuck with sizable inventories of unsold bonds.  Companion Remic bonds are created in tandem with highly stable and popular planned amortization class securities, which carry relatively low yields.  Foreign Bonds  Financial markets in Britain were closed for a bank holiday, and the absence of United Kingdom investor activity affected other European markets.  In West Germany, one trader said, "There's no force in the market.  There are simply no buyers."  A dealer in the Eurobond market said trading was "almost nonexistent."  West Germany's 6 3/4% bond due June 1999 ended 0.30 point lower at 99.50 to yield 6.82%, while the 6 3/4% issue due 1994 closed down 0.20 point at 99.28 to yield 6.924%.  In Japan, government bond prices were little changed after light trading.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 ended at a price of 97.20.  The yield fell slightly from Friday to 5.065%.  Meanwhile, Japan's Finance Ministry has decided to issue a three-month Treasury bill for the first time, according to a ministry official.  The decision had been widely expected.  The official said the first three-month bill could be issued as soon as about 10 days from now.  The official said the ministry, which already issues six-month Treasury bills, is looking to cut debt-service costs, diversify the mix of maturities in its debt and "build up the Japanese money market."  The last time South Africans came to this resort town on the edge of Victoria Falls, they rode in on motorcycles, under the cover of night, and shot up a suspected African National Congress guerrilla base, killing five people and destroying several buildings.  Yesterday, the South Africans, led by acting President F.W. de Klerk, returned.  This time, though, they rode through town in an official motorcade and were cheered by residents lining the streets.  They spoke of peace.  They pleaded for understanding.  And they shared their vision of regional cooperation and economic development.  The stark contrast of the two visits, separated by a little more than two years, illustrates the shifting nature of Pretoria's relations with its southern African neighbors, moving away from destabilization and toward negotiation.  And it underlines the belief of the South African government that the best way for the country to break its international isolation is through efforts in Africa, particularly southern Africa.  "The overwhelming majority of South Africans recognize the necessity of South Africa breaking through in southern Africa," Mr. de Klerk said after nearly three hours of talks with Zambian President Kenneth Kaunda.  "South Africa as a regional power has a role to play and it is more and more being recognized for that."  During their talks, the two leaders discussed ways to revive the faltering peace process in Angola, which is torn by a 14-year-old civil war, and they reviewed Mr. de Klerk's plans to reform South Africa's racial segregation known as apartheid and his promises to open negotiations with black leaders over a new constitution bringing the black majority into national politics.  Mr. de Klerk said that a position paper on negotiations drafted by the African National Congress, which is banned in South Africa and based in Zambia, wasn't discussed.  And Mr. Kaunda apparently didn't offer to serve as a mediator between the ANC and Pretoria, after hinting last week that he would.  But for the South Africans, the significance of the meeting goes beyond what was and wasn't discussed; more important is that it took place at all.  Mr. Kaunda is one of Africa's most venerated leaders, and as an outspoken opponent of apartheid he has led the push for economic sanctions against South Africa's white government.  Mr. de Klerk knows that if he and his country are to gain the respect of the rest of Africa, they will need Mr. Kaunda's nod.  "We're more excited about what it {the meeting} can do for the country's place in the world than about the immediate impacts in the region," said a senior South African banker.  Said another businessman: "We hope it's the beginning of our way back from isolation."  Although the Zambian leader described the meeting as "useful," he wouldn't give his impressions of Mr. de Klerk.  But the South African delegation was in high spirits after the talks.  "We are grateful that it went so well," said a South African involved in the discussions.  "The two leaders got on very well.  There was mutual understanding . . . a feeling of friendship."  He quoted Mr. Kaunda as saying that Mr. de Klerk, who is expected to win a full five-year term as president after South Africa's Sept. 6 parliamentary elections, "brings new hope to southern Africa."  For years, South Africa pursued a path of destabilization in southern Africa by supporting rebel guerrilla groups in Angola and Mozambique and occasionally launching raids aimed at destroying ANC operations in Zambia, Zimbabwe and Botswana.  According to the Southern African Development Coordination Conference, a regional economic group that excludes South Africa, these acts cost Pretoria's neighbors more than $10 billion in economic development from 1982 to 1987.  But now South Africa talks of the sovereignty of the various southern African nations, and Mr. de Klerk promotes a doctrine of noninterference in one another's affairs.  Last year, Pretoria pulled its troops out of Angola and agreed to start the independence process currently under way in Namibia.  It has revived negotiations with the Mozambique government.  And since the Livingstone raid, external forays against the ANC are rare.  Still, southern Africa remains wary of Pretoria's intentions, and overcoming this mistrust is the biggest regional challenge facing Mr. de Klerk.  His big carrot is the economic strength of South Africa, which, economists and business leaders throughout the region agree, should be the motor of regional development.  But before he can dangle the prospect of greater economic cooperation in front of his impoverished neighbors, he will have to resolve the racial conflict at home.  "Zambia would like to see us coming into Africa," said Sidney Matus, the president of the South African Chamber of Commerce, who recently led a delegation that discussed business prospects with Mr. Kaunda.  "But the only reason it doesn't happen is because of apartheid.  We were told in very definite terms that there will be no real movement in the region while apartheid laws are still on the books."  Tokyo stocks closed lower for the fifth consecutive trading day amid sluggish participation by both individual and institutional investors.  London's stock exchange was closed for a bank holiday.  In Tokyo, the Nikkei index of 225 selected issues, a 46.62-point loser Friday, fell another 132.52 points to 34607.41.  In early trading in Tokyo Tuesday, the Nikkei index added 70.76 points to 34678.17.  Monday's volume on the First Section was estimated at a thin 300 million shares, down from 418 million Friday.  Small-lot selling lowered prices in a broad range from the start of the day.  In addition, high-priced issues, which gained early in the morning, fell back rapidly following a rumor that a major brokerage firm had lowered its forecast of Kyocera's earnings.  Similar rumors afflicted TDK and Matsushita later in the day, causing a drop of not only these stocks but also of similarly popular high-priced, smaller-capitalization issues, traders said.  Declining issues outnumbered advancing issues, 562 to 328, while 210 remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which fell 8.27 points Friday, was down 12.41 points, or 0.47%, at 2610.29.  The Second Section index, which gained 6.82 points Friday, was down 0.99 points, or 0.03%, to close at 3288.42.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 20 million shares, down from 24.8 million Friday.  Kyocera fell from its intraday high of 6,400 yen ($44.45) to finish at 5,860 yen ($40.70), down 540 yen ($3.75) from Friday's close.  Matsushita was down 60 yen to 2,380 yen, after marking an intraday high of 2,450.  Sonyclimbed to 8,950 earlier but ended the day at 8,750, down 150 from the previous close.  TDK was down 120 to 5,950, off from an early high of 6,100.  The losses made by high-priced issues hurt the Nikkei Index on a day when trade volume was small, a trader noted.  Monday's distinctive winner was CSK, which announced unusually large 1-for-2 gratis distributions Friday after the market closed.  CSK advanced 1,000 to 8,430, stimulating gains made by related issues.  Intec, another leading software developing company, was up 220 to close at 5,150.  Pharmaceuticals ended mixed.  They gained last week partly due to brokerage house promotion of new products' bright earning prospects but some of them were easier as investors took profits, traders said.  Sankyo and Chugai were firmer yesterday, but Eisai, Mochida and Yamanouchi were easier.  Yesterday's losers included automobiles.  Honda was down 10 to 1,930.  Nissan lost 30 to 1,520 and Toyota was down 30 to end the day at 2,620.  Securities firms, down Friday, continued to fall.  Daiwa Securities declined 30 to 2,230.  Nikko shed 20 to 1,840.  Nomura was down 50 at 3,160 and Yamaichi closed at 1,780, down 60.  Elsewhere, share prices closed lower in Taipei, Manila, Singapore and Wellington, and were higher in Sydney and Seoul.  Hong Kong markets were closed for a holiday.  Stocks closed higher in Zurich, Brussels, Stockholm and Milan and lower in Paris, Frankfurt and Amsterdam.  South African gold stocks closed lower  Frenetic trading on the Taiwan Stock Exchange yesterday pushed volume to a record US$7.64 billion as optimistic small investors bought heavily and big investors took profits ahead of a possible change in tax rules.  The weighted price index, which gained 67.4 points Saturday, eased 11.41 points to 10011.2.  Aside from wanting to take profits, analysts said that some big investors started dumping their holdings because they had decided to pull some of their money out of the market while they devise new trading strategies.  The new strategies will be designed to cope with a possible 2% transactions tax that the Ministry of Finance has been talking about imposing on each stock sale to replace a capital gains tax enacted at the beginning of the year.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 25 Aug 24 Year  @ U.S. ............... 322.5 323.5 + 25.9  @ Britain ............ 719.3 718.4 + 31.7  @ Canada ............. 432.5 432.9 + 17.8  @ Japan .............. 1547.6 1553.6 + 8.9  @ France ............. 539.6 533.9 + 21.9  @ Germany ............ 252.9 251.2 + 21.6  @ Hong Kong .......... 1873.6 1860.5 - 7.7  @ Switzerland ........ 239.6 239.0 + 38.6  @ Australia .......... 352.7 349.4 + 21.5  @ World index ........ 538.8 539.2 + 9.0  @ ---  @ Weekly Percentage Leaders  Last week's best and worst performing stocks among those issues that make up 80% of the world's stock market capitalization (in local currency)  @ ISSUE (COUNTRY) CLOSE % CHG  @ WINNING ISSUES  @ Renouf (N.Zealand)................ 0.16 + 128.6  @ Groupe Victoire (France).......... 1761.00 + 70.1  @ Compagnie Industrielle (France)... 13520.00 + 38.7  @ Ingenico (France)................. 274.90 + 18.7  @ Asland (Spain).................... 1240.00 + 18.7  @ Holiday Corp. (U.S.).............. 81.375 + 16.7  @ Danto (Japan)..................... 2950.00 + 16.1  @ Immobiliere de Belgique (Belgium). 4345.00 + 15.9  @ Capital Markets (N.Zealand)....... 2.15 + 15.6  @ Colonia vers Vorzug (W.  Germany).. 965.00 + 15.6  @ LOSING ISSUES  @ Reading & Bates Offshore (U.S.)... 0.375 - 33.4  @ Prime Computer (U.S.)............. 12.25 - 31.9  @ McCarthy & Stone (Britain)........ 1.17 - 25.5  @ Ommercen Ceteco Van (N'thlands)... 34.50 - 21.9  @ Canada Northwest Energy (Canada).. 4.25 - 19.0  @ Bond Corp. (Australia)............ 0.61 - 12.9  @ Internatio-Muller (N'thlands)..... 97.20 - 12.8  @ Procordia B Fria (Sweden)......... 185.00 - 11.9  @ National Iron & Steel (Singapore). 7.70 - 11.5  @ Aga A Skr (Sweden)................ 240.00 - 11.1  @ Source: Morgan Stanley Capital Intl.  Perspective  The Hong Kong government lowered its economic growth projection for 1989 and said inflation would be worse than expected.  But it said the June 4 massacre in Beijing has had a less severe impact on the British colony's economy than originally feared.  In its mid-year economic report, the government said Hong Kong's gross domestic product will grow an inflation-adjusted 5% this year, slower than the 6% expansion projected in the annual budget in March.  GDP, which measures output of goods and services minus foreign income, increased 7.4% in 1988 after registering double-digit growth in 1986 and 1987.  Inflation is expected to moderate in the second half from the 10.1% average annual rate in the first half but still will exceed the March estimate.  For the year, the government forecasts a 9.5% increase in consumer prices, compared with 8.5% projected earlier and 7.5% recorded in 1988.  The report, released Friday, was in line with projections of private forecasters.  The main factors behind the slowdown were in place before the crackdown on prodemocracy demonstrators in Beijing, the government said.  Export growth is slowing, especially to the U.S., Hong Kong's biggest market, and a boom in domestic consumer spending is tapering off.  Still-sketchy statistics show the Chinese repression has hurt the colony's tourism industry, damped retail spending and knocked 15% to 20% off property prices.  Monetary statistics for June showed a 1% drop in total bank deposits from May, suggesting also that jittery residents moved money abroad.  Many people fear Beijing won't keep its promise of 50 years of autonomy and capitalism for Hong Kong after it reverts to Chinese sovereignty in 1997.  "The repercussions of the events in China can be expected to reinforce the trend of moderation in the Hong Kong economy, due to increased uncertainties in the conduct of trade and the possible adverse impact on domestic demand," the report said.  Nevertheless, a government spokesman said tourism and other economic sectors directly affected by the China crisis seem likely to recover in the next few months.  He noted that truck traffic between the colony and its increasingly interdependent neighbor, Guangdong province, has returned to normal after only slight disruptions in June.  The spokesman said the government is leaning toward the supposition that the U.S. economy is heading for a so-called soft landing, rather than a recession -- a favorable sign, given that the U.S. absorbs about a third of Hong Kong exports.  Even so, the government lowered its trade projections for 1989 from those made in March.  It expects domestic exports to grow an inflation-adjusted 4.5%, compared with the earlier projected figure of 7% and an 8.9% surge in 1988.  Thanks to Gilberto Ontiveros Lucero, the crumbling churches in this poor, polluted border city have fresh paint.  The injured ride in new ambulances.  A cancer fund is $5,000 richer, and federal prisoners play baseball with new gloves.  In Colonia Hidalgo, a middle-class enclave, his neighbors adore him.  Even after his pet tiger got loose, gifts of peaches, homemade stew and warm burritos kept coming.  "To me, he is a generous person," coos 75-year-old Eteloina Cobos, who keeps a picture of the 36-year-old ex-carpenter in her worn bible.  Yet just across the river in El Paso, Texas, the name Ontiveros is cursed.  "Sick," spits Moises Bujanda, nursing a beer in a hotel bar.  "This guy is perverting our society."  To local editorial writers, Mr. Ontiveros is a "bloody toad" and "Border Creep No. 1."  Mr. Ontiveros has made a fortune selling drugs to America.  He "is one of the most significant godfathers and Robin Hood figures along the U.S.-Mexico border," maintains Phillip E. Jordan, special agent in charge of the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration's regional office in Dallas.  This man known as "El Grenas", or Mophead, is a living explanation of why it is so difficult to halt the flood of illicit drugs across the Texas-Mexico border.  For no amount of law enforcement can offset the huge gap in attitudes toward drug trafficking that separates the U.S. and Mexico.  Mr. Ontiveros admits he became rich shipping marijuana by the ton to the Southwest, but says he no longer sells drugs.  He denies DEA allegations that he ships Colombian cocaine to dozens of crack zones in Houston, Dallas, New York and Chicago.  Twice indicted by El Paso federal grand juries, accused of kidnappings and beatings in addition to drug running, he has been in a Mexican prison since January pending trial on Mexican drug-related charges.  But his drug operations weren't halted until last month, say Mexican authorities.  Indeed, despite intensified anti-drug efforts by the government of President Carlos Salinas de Gortari, the DEA says Mexico is "the surest and safest pipeline to the U.S.," funneling one-third of America's cocaine and marijuana and considerable amounts of heroin.  To people like 58-year-old Willie Osborne of Houston, the suppliers of those drugs are a curse.  They "destroy the neighborhood and the minds of the young people" and make life dangerous for all, she complains, watching an arrest in her crack-infested Acres Home neighborhood.  But here in Mexico, citizens blame decadent American appetites, not those who feed them.  Many believe Mexico is culturally superior to the U.S., says Rodolfo de la Garza, a professor of Mexican-American studies at the University of Texas in Austin.  Some Mexicans view themselves as "Greeks and the people of the U.S. as Romans," with drugs being just another U.S. vice, he says.  It helps that Mexico isn't plagued by crack zones and 13-year-old addicts.  A $10 crack rock, a cheap high in the U.S., costs the equivalent of three days' pay here.  "Americans have created the problem," declares Albert Kenyon Wagner, the Mexican-born director of a rural Mormon school south of here.  It's unfair, he says, to expect "my country to solve the problem."  Even Mexican drug agent Jose Luis Lopez tells a visitor that if U.S. parents would only "teach their children the evils of drugs, it would make our job easier."  In addition, intractable official corruption makes it difficult to tell the bad guys from the good guys.  "Everyone knew" the "famous 'Grenas'" was a drug lord, says Pedro Contreras, who lived on Tepeyac Street with the Mophead.  But "I felt secure because I knew the guy was protected by police."  Then, in one of the ironies that abound along the border, Mr. Contreras earnestly explains that he would never live in the U.S.: "We're afraid our son would get involved in drugs."  Mr. Ontiveros embraces the popular wisdom.  "As long as there is drug demand, there will be drug supply," he reasons during a prison interview.  With his trademark longish hair tucked under a hat, a diamond-encrusted Rolex watch on his wrist, he argues that he is in jail only because of politics.  "The U.S. is putting pressure on Mexico to get tough and, because I'm so popular and outspoken, they come after me," he says.  The Mexican government counts Mr. Ontiveros as one of five major "narcotraficantes" it has nabbed this year.  It charges that he bribed officials with upwards of $800,000 and moved more than eight tons of marijuana across the border.  While he admits to having sold marijuana in the U.S., Mr. Ontiveros is contesting these particular charges.  In the U.S., a 1986 indictment in El Paso charges him with smuggling up to five tons a month of marijuana across the border and with kidnapping and torturing two men and attempting to kidnap a third.  Efforts to extradite Mr. Ontiveros to face U.S. charges consistently fail.  Mexican authorities assert the priority of their own case.  But along Tepeyac Street, no one talks of such things.  Neighbors were outraged when the Mexican attorney general's agents confiscated Mr. Ontiveros's elegant home and turned it into a makeshift jail and command post.  The morality of seizing Mr. Ontiveros's property was the issue, not Mr. Ontiveros's morality.  Explains Sara Villalpando, a college student who lives across the street: "In the United States, you must ask, 'How is it possible to respect someone who is a narcotraficante?' But here, we would respect someone like this because there is no law, the authorities have no morality."  Any doubt that Mr. Ontiveros is an important man in Juarez quickly vanished during a June 22 visit with him in prison here, where he was held until being transferred last month.  His "cell" consisted of two air-conditioned, carpeted rooms, well-stocked with middle-class amenities -- a microwave oven, a Nintendo entertainment unit, phones and baby formula for visits from one of his many illegitimate children.  In his bedroom, a woman fussed with her looks; outside, a carpenter worked on a patio, a puppy stepped in the fresh cement.  Mr. Ontiveros proudly displayed other trappings -- shirts, baseball caps, pens and lingerie with "I love Grenas" scrawled in green letters.  But he seemed proudest of his electronic communications gear, including regular telephones, cellular phones, walkie-talkies and a short-wave radio: "I hate surprises," he said.  "I want to know what's happening in my jail."  Mr. Ontiveros raised prison living standards considerably, arranging for a sauna, a racquetball court, a bakery, pigs for barbecues, and a canteen dispensing everything from cologne to corn flakes.  But two weeks after the interview, a new warden took over the prison, and on July 20, Mr. Ontiveros was hauled off to a more conventional Mexico City cell.  The new warden, state prison director Gabriel Nahas Ayub, alleges that Mr. Ontiveros was brazenly running a $400,000-a-month drug operation from the prison and that a weekly stream of four-digit bribes kept the previous warden from asking questions.  Mexican and U.S. authorities say they monitored Mr. Ontiveros on his cellular telephone directing an abortive February attempt to land 1,430 pounds of pure Colombian cocaine on a clandestine airstrip 70 miles away.  The previous warden couldn't be reached for comment.  As in Juarez, the influence of drug money is evident in Casas Grandes, a dusty agricultural town about 150 miles away whose economy was dead until drug lords arrived in the early 1980s.  Groves of apple trees were replaced with stalks of marijuana.  Jobs proliferated.  Workers, as young as 12, would wait each morning in front of a Catholic church for buses to the marijuana fields.  Recruiting was easy.  Employees got a free meal, transportation, beer and daily wages equal to a week's pay in the "maquilas", the U.S. factories up at the border.  Casas Grandes became a builder's paradise.  Restaurants boomed.  Asphalt poured.  New trucks sped down the city's main artery.  Many people headed for a discotheque called the Camelot, a castle-shaped venture alleged to be owned by drug kingpins including Mr. Ontiveros, though he denies being involved.  Marijuana provided stability, concedes the Rev. Abel Retano Valle, a local Catholic priest.  "Can you imagine?" he asks.  "Those of my parish no longer had to go to the U.S. to work."  Nonetheless, the priest adds, "It was a fictitious economy because sooner or later it had to end."  It did, when the Mexican federal judicial police arrived in March.  But now, federal agents toting pistols and automatic weapons say residents stare at them in disgust in restaurants.  At an Argentinian-style steak house, Mexican drug agent Jose Lopez and his commander, Salvador Chavez, brood over plans to burn a marijuana field in the Sierra Madre at dawn.  Mr. Chavez, a husky 44-year-old, stabs his beef tips but eyes two men in white cowboy hats suspiciously.  Suddenly, the electricity goes off.  Mr. Lopez clenches his assault rifle.  Mr. Chavez fingers his pistol.  The lights flicker on again.  False alarm.  "Businessmen urge us to ease off," says Mr. Lopez.  "They say we're hurting the economy."  All of this rankles in El Paso, the sunbaked city of 530,000 that stands cheek-by-jowl with Juarez.  Although crack isn't yet a crisis in El Paso, "We're right in the middle of this drug war," says Carmen Perez Humphreys, a mother of three.  "I can understand that in Mexico {Mr.  Ontiveros} helps provide jobs for people and with jobs people are able to eat," she says.  "But on this side, he's killing our people."  Perhaps because of such worries, justice is stiffening in El Paso.  In June, a first-time offender who had attempted to sell four pounds of cocaine to undercover agents was given a life sentence.  Still, Richard D. Schwein, special agent in charge of the Federal Bureau of Investigation's office in El Paso, keeps a cap behind his desk with a logo that reads: "The boss?  Grenas, of course."  What's the point?  It's a reminder, he says, that "we're losing the drug war."  The dollar, finishing slightly higher overall, gained considerable ground against its Japanese counterpart as dealers in Tokyo boosted the U.S. currency above 144 yen despite repeated intervention from the Bank of Japan.  Traders said political uncertainty in Japan continues to plague the yen, prompting the country's senior finance officials to say they would defend the flagging currency regardless of the cost to treasury coffers.  Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita met Prime Minister Toshiki Kaifu for the first time and said the central bank would cope with an excessive decline for the yen by participating in coordinated intervention with other central banks, according to Bank of Japan spokesmen.  But the Bank of Japan was on its own as it intervened at least twice in the morning in Tokyo, and was believed to be selling dollars in small amounts in the afternoon as well.  The dollar-yen rates moved little in response.  It was the first time since July 3 that the dollar had changed hands above 144 yen in Tokyo, and it finished there at 144.28 yen, with an intraday high of 144.60 yen.  With a holiday in London slowing European business and sparse activity in New York, the dollar spent the rest of the day hovering in a tight range.  In late New York trading, the dollar was quoted at 1.9633 marks and 144.55 yen, up from 1.9625 marks and 143.95 yen late Friday in New York.  Sterling was trading at $1.5637, down from $1.5670.  In Tokyo Tuesday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 144.58 yen, up from Monday's Tokyo close of 144.28 yen.  A string of political controversies, accentuated by the fall of several leading officials because of scandals, have contributed to the yen's retreat.  Most recently, former Chief Cabinet Secretary Tokuo Yamashita resigned Friday amid accusations that he had had an affair with a young office worker.  Some traders say the yen is likely to fall further, despite the Bank of Japan's efforts to the contrary.  Keiichi Udagawa, chief foreign exchange trader with Bank of Tokyo in New York, said a gradual fall below 145 yen to the dollar is distinctly possible.  "The Bank of Japan is doing what it can right now to stop it, but they can't use interest rates, so there's a limit to what they can do," he said.  Mr. Udagawa noted that Japanese interest rates aren't seen heading higher in the near future, given modest price pressures and the fact that the new administration probably is reluctant to initiate a tightening when the political balance is leaning toward opposition forces.  But he also noted that the yen is being battered by interest-rate differentials against other major currencies, particularly against the mark, "with West German interest yields around 7%, while Japan's are 5% to 5.5%."  The mark finished at 73.61 yen, up from 73.30 yen late Friday in New York.  Traders think the yen's near-term fate versus the dollar hinges on U.S. economic indicators appearing this week.  A foreign exchange manager at another Japanese bank in New York said: "We have to wait and see how the U.S. GNP numbers come out {today}.  That will determine the yendollar rate to a large extent."  Some economists expect the second-quarter U.S. GNP growth figure to be revised sharply upward, to about 2.5% at an annual rate from 1.7% in the initial report.  Some traders in New York said the upward revision is anticipated and has already been incorporated into the dollar's exchange rates.  Nevertheless, they say the GNP report will make a handy excuse for buying more dollars, perhaps finally pushing the U.S. unit above key resistance at 1.9700 marks.  The Bank of Italy also intervened yesterday, buying 78 million dollars and 11 million marks at the Milan foreign exchange fixing.  William Harrington, an economist who tracks the lira for the WEFA economic consulting group in Bala Cynwyd, Pa., said the Bank of Italy is trying to balance out its foreign currency reserves, which are weighted too heavily toward marks and French francs accumulated during interventions to control the lira's strength within the European Monetary System.  The mark was quoted at 717.52 lire in late trading yesterday.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $360 an ounce, down 70 cents.  Estimated volume was a light 2.2 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at about $359.55 an ounce.  The U.S. Bankruptcy Court here approved $11 million in financing for L.J. Hooker Corp., which filed for Chapter 11 protection from its creditors earlier this month.  Although the original purpose of the hearing was to seek $26 million, a committee of L.J. Hooker creditors co-chaired by Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. and Westpac Banking Corp. requested time to evaluate the documents and L.J. Hooker's need for that sum.  The court earlier had approved $24 million of a $50 million line of credit offered to the U.S. unit of Australia's Hooker Corp. by GE Capital Corp.  L.J. Hooker, represented by Proskauer Rose Goetz & Mendelsohn, agreed to the deal but said it needed $11 million immediately.  The request was accepted by the creditors committee and approved by Judge Tina Brozman.  A hearing before Judge Brozman has been set for Sept. 11 to determine whether L.J. Hooker will get the remaining $15 million that GE Capital has agreed to provide.  A spokesman for L.J. Hooker said the company hasn't officially designated how the $11 million will be spent.  Sanford Sigoloff, chief executive officer of L.J. Hooker, is in Atlanta evaluating its real estate and home development business.  Hooker, now being managed by a court-appointed provisional liquidator, has invested more than $1 billion in the U.S. since Jaunary 1986 in various retail chains, property and shopping malls.  Lackluster U.S. retail sales and a downturn in the Australian economy created cash flow problems, forcing its U.S. subsidiary to seek bankruptcy-law protection.  As of March 31, Hooker had $1.9 billion Australian dollars (US$1.45 billion) in liabilities and A$2.45 billion in assets.  Samuel A. McCullough has learned the importance of tenacity in making unsolicited takeover bids.  Four years ago, the Meridian Bancorp chief executive officer shocked Philadelphia's genteel banking community by aggressively pursuing Commonwealth National Financial Corp.  He lost out to Mellon Bank Corp. of Pittsburgh, the bank where he started his own career, which topped Meridian's bid by $1 a share.  Two years later, he ruffled Meridian shareholders and Wall Street analysts by paying a hefty premium for Delaware Trust Co.  Now Mr. McCullough is at it again, this time trying to capture a much bigger prize: By offering to acquire First Pennsylvania Corp. for $704 million in stock, he hopes to woo the Philadelphia-based institution away from a giant outsider.  On Friday, Meridian, based in Reading, Pa., offered to acquire First Pennsylvania for stock valued at about $18 a share, creating the fourth-largest banking operation in Pennsylvania with combined assets of about $16.5 billion.  But First Pennsylvania already has agreed to be acquired for $15 a share by Marine Midland Banks Inc., a unit of Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Group Ltd. of Hong Kong.  "Our deal is far from done," Mr. McCullough says.  "I'm finding it's a lot easier to merge two manufacturing companies than two bank holding companies."  Some analysts and investment banks see the move as a way for Meridian to stay independent at a time when other major Pennsylvania regional banks have been gobbled up by out-of-state institutions.  But company officials say Mr. McCullough recognizes that Meridian needs to expand its presence in the Philadelphia area, and acquiring First Pennsylvania is an effective way to do it.  Mr. McCullough, who worked a full evening shift in Mellon's operations department while he went to college during the day, is a fierce competitor who loves to win, colleagues say.  Once he sets his sights on a target, he pursues it with zeal and never looks back.  Such traits were evident early in his career, recalls Ezekiel S. Ketchum, Meridian's chief operating officer, who called on prospective customers with Mr. McCullough when both men worked for Mellon in the early 1960s.  Mr. Ketchum remembers walking back to their car after their first, brief visit to West Point-Pepperell Inc. Mr. McCullough vowed in the parking lot that the apparel maker would become a substantial customer for the bank.  After four years of calls and visits, he prevailed.  Although he likes to project a friendly, down-to-earth image, his actions don't always win fans on Wall Street.  The $196 million in stock that Meridian paid for Delaware Trust in Wilmington brought Mr. McCullough some sharp criticism because of the dilution it caused shareholders.  But he believed the bank could bolster earnings by being a more aggressive lender, cutting some expenses and branching into the trust business.  Meridian officials say the dilution was quickly offset by increased earnings.  "He never second-guesses his decisions.  He doesn't fret and worry about things" once they're done, says Richard P. Hoverter, a group executive vice president in charge of Meridian's administrative services.  The offer for First Pennsylvania could also draw some tough criticism.  Meridian has offered to pay Marine Midland $30 million to acquire its 24.9% stake in First Pennsylvania, plus another $100 million for the First Pennsylvania preferred stock it holds.  Besides that, Meridian is proposing to pay about 2.5 times book value for First Pennsylvania, a hefty premium for a regional bank, analysts say.  Even so, the acquisition would build up Meridian's market share in the Philadelphia area.  Since the early 1980s, Meridian's strategy has been to build a substantial presence in eastern Pennsylvania, southern New Jersey and Delaware.  "If he thinks a move is appropriate for the bank, he'll pursue it aggressively," says Mr. Ketchum, Meridian's president.  Some analysts speculate that Hongkong & Shanghai has decided to pursue expansion in Europe rather than boosting its U.S. presence.  Local bankers believe Meridian's bid for First Pennsylvania offers a handsome way for Marine Midland to disengage from its deal with the Philadelphia bank.  Southwest Airlines, Dallas, said it is converting a previously announced option for delivery of 20 Boeing Co. 737 aircraft into firm orders for 20 state-of-the-art 737-500 aircraft.  The airline said 10 of the aircraft will be delivered in 1992, with the remaining 10 slated for delivery in 1993.  Additionally, Southwest Airlines has 33 other 737s on order, plus options on another 30 aircraft, 10 each to be delivered during 1994, 1995 and 1996.  The first of the 737-500's is currently undergoing certification, and the company expects to take delivery of the aircraft by February 1990.  The carrier said it would pay $881.7 million for a package of 84 aircraft, but it didn't give a separate value for the 20-plane option conversion.  Wall Street analysts who have been telling clients to avoid Philadelphia Electric shares are starting to feel like the little boy who cried wolf.  Nobody believes them.  As the company cleared several major hurdles, the stock climbed 25% in six months to a 52-week high of 24 1/2 before settling down a bit in recent weeks to close yesterday at 22 5/8.  Among other good news, the company has restarted one nuclear unit at its formerly troubled Peach Bottom plant.  And last week it was granted a full-power operating license for its Limerick 2 nuclear unit.  Besides its appeal as a turnaround play, Philadelphia Electric has lured investors with a dividend yield now amounting to 9.7%, among the highest for any utility.  The surging stock price "makes it very hard for us, as analysts, to tell shareholders to sell," says Doris A. Kelley-Alston of Merrill Lynch.  Yet even though the company's "black eye is beginning to melt away," she still has a sell recommendation on it.  And few other analysts are willing to put the stock on their buy lists.  What risks do the bears see?  The dividend is a major question.  Philadelphia Electric has applied to the state Public Utilities Commission for a rate increase of $549 million, or 18.1%, phased in over 10 years to help recoup its $2.9 billion investment in Limerick Unit 2.  "This rate filing is critical to our ability to continue paying the dividend," says Joseph Paquette, Philadelphia Electric's chairman and chief executive officer.  In the 12 months ended June 30, pershare earnings fell two cents short of the utility's current annual payout rate of $2.20.  But Mr. Paquette says certain factors that depressed earnings are or will soon be gone, giving the utility more room to cover the dividend.  A first-quarter, one-time charge to settle a tax dispute reduced earnings 13 cents a share.  Replacement-fuel costs and penalties tied to the Peach Bottom closing will shave 20 cents a share from earnings this year.  But if the third Peach Bottom unit is restarted and running at full power by year end, such charges will disappear next year.  The Peach Bottom plant was ordered closed by federal regulators more than two years ago, when reactor-room operators were found sleeping on the job.  The company's top management was ousted and a new team brought in.  The first Peach Bottom unit was restarted this spring.  Mr. Paquette is confident Philadelphia Electric will maintain the dividend through next April, when a decision on the company's rate request is expected.  Yet he acknowledges that the utility needs "substantially" all the rate boost it has requested to maintain the current payout.  "Cutting or eliminating the dividend is our last option," he says adamantly.  He asserts that the company would take other internal actions, such as more cost-cutting and high-debt refinancing, to offset the impact of getting a lower rate increase than requested.  Even if the utility gets the full rate increase it seeks, some analysts see little sizzle in the stock for investors.  Elizabeth Gorman at Janney Montgomery Scott in Philadelphia believes the full rate increase would merely allow the company to maintain earnings around the 1988 level of $2.33 a share.  Per-share estimates for 1989 range from $2.20 to $2.35.  "Where's your growth?" says Mrs. Alston at Merrill Lynch.  Philadelphia Electric does have some some fans.  Dan Scotto at Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette expects the rate increase to stabilize earnings.  But future earnings growth will depend partly on the company's ability to sell power to other utilities.  After the Nuclear Regulatory Commission granted a full-power license for Limerick Unit 2, Mr. Scotto upgraded his opinion on Philadelphia Electric bonds.  John Kellenyi at Drexel Burnham Lambert says that Limerick Unit 2 was completed under budget and that there's plenty of East Coast demand for the electricity it will generate.  Also, unlike a new nuclear unit, some existing oil- and coal-burning plants might have trouble meeting the tougher pollution standards in proposed acid-rain legislation.  He is telling investors to hold on to their Philadelphia Electric shares, but doesn't rate the issue because Drexel does some investment-banking business with the utility.  Although the PUC might not grant the full rate increase requested, Mr. Scotto says, it might allow Philadelphia Electric to improve its cash flow, such as by permitting a higher depreciation rate, which would ultimately support the dividend.  He says regulators handled rate requests from Pennsylvania Power & Light and Duquesne Light in much the same way: "This has been the trademark of the Pennsylvania PUC lately."  ---  Philadelphia Electric  (NYSE; Symbol: PE)  Business: Electric and gas utility  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $3.23 billion  Net income: $566 million; or $2.33 a share  Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 41 cents vs. 43 cents  Average daily trading volume:  385,291 shares  Common shares outstanding: 206.9 million  Meridian Bancorp, which is seeking to acquire First Pennsylvania Corp., disclosed that it has agreed to pay about $30 million for warrants that would give it a 24.9% stake in First Pennsylvania.  Meridian plans to buy the warrants from Marine Midland Banks Inc.  In addition, Meridian said it agreed to buy the $100 million of First Pennsylvania preferred stock that Marine Midland holds.  The stock, which carries a below-market interest rate, would be acquired with proceeds from a new Meridian preferred issue.  Officials of Meridian, which is based in Reading, Pa., outlined terms of their tentative agreement with Marine Midland following a breakfast meeting with securities analysts in New York.  The sale of Marine Midland's stake in Philadelphia-based First Pennsylvania hinges on Meridian's reaching an agreement to acquire the balance of the bank holding company.  The Meridian-Marine Midland agreement also precludes Marine Midland from negotiating a sale of its stake in First Pennsylvania to any other party for what was described as a "brief period."  On Friday, Meridian disclosed its offer to purchase each share outstanding of First Pennsylvannia for about 0.706 share of Meridian.  The transaction is valued at $18 a share, or about $704 million, based on Meridian's closing price of $25.50 a share last Wednesday.  New York-based Marine Midland, a unit of Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Group Ltd., agreed in 1986 to acquire First Pennsylvania for $15 a share, or $600 million, in 1990.  In the meantime, Marine Midland holds warrants giving it 24.9% control of First Pennsylvania.  Analysts speculated that Hongkong & Shanghai, based in Hong Kong, has tabled further expansion in the U.S. in favor of boosting its European presence.  Hongkong & Shanghai also owns a minority stake in Britain's Midland Bank PLC and may want to buy the rest of its shares in the years ahead.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, First Pennsylvania shares closed yesterday at $15.375, down 37.5 cents.  Meridian shares closed at $23, down $2.25 in over-the-counter trading.  Terry Troupe, chief financial officer of Meridian, said the bank would finance the acquisition with 28 million newly-issued common shares; the bank has 40 million shares outstanding.  Mr. Troupe said the impact of the merger on Meridian's per-share earnings would be "minimal" and "potentially non-dilutive for the first year."  The 1973 Volvo screeches around tight curves, slaloming across all five lanes of the road and greatly discomfiting the foreign tourist in the back seat.  In another country it would be a suicide ride, but in North Korea so few cars ply the highways that each can often have the road to itself.  More and more foreign tourists are trickling into this once-forbidden Communist country, with the government's encouragement, and they are discovering many an oddity.  A tourist rest stop in the ruggedly beautiful countryside boasts marble floors, high ceilings and plushly upholstered chairs -- and sells snakes for $100 each.  Department-store "shoppers" sometimes pretend to buy things when a foreigner appears, evidently to help portray the economy as booming.  Some visitors may be put off by the rifle-bearing soldiers along the runway at Pyongyang's airport, a reminder that despite occasional diplomatic flirtations, North and South Korea are still officially at war.  But for those who dream of traveling in Asia, yet dread crowds and smells and dirt, North Korea may be the perfect tourist spot: as exotic, in its own regimented way, as any country anywhere, but as tidy as Switzerland.  Indeed, President Kim Il Sung, known locally as the Great Leader, keeps his country so neat that at times it has an eerie, almost unlived-in quality.  No laundry hangs from apartment windows.  No bicycles clog the streets.  In many parts of North Korea, the visitor who has seen the pedestrian jams of Seoul or Hong Kong may wonder: Where do they keep the 20 million North Koreans?  In its 41 years of existence, the country itself has been hidden from most of the world; only Korean residents of Japan and visitors from Communist-bloc and certain other friendly countries were allowed in, and even their numbers were limited.  Now, officials say they want to encourage foreign tourism.  North Korea needs the hard currency, and it needs to fill thousands of hotel rooms it built in making an unsuccessful bid to be co-host with Seoul of last year's summer Olympics.  Kim Dong Hwa of the Korea International Tourist Bureau expects "several hundred thousand" tourists annually within a few years.  Western Europeans and Japanese already are finding it easier to get permission to visit.  "Imperialist aggressors," as North Korea still regularly calls Americans, are subject to the vagaries of U.S.North Korean diplomacy.  But tourism officials here say Americans are welcome -- all they have to do is contact a North Korean embassy.  Unfortunately, there is no embassy in the U.S.  Nonetheless, more than 100 Americans made their way to a confab of 16,000 mostly left-wing students from 180 countries this summer.  And in recent months, a number of Korean-Americans have been allowed to visit their families in North Korea for the first time in nearly 40 years.  For those who do make it to North Korea, one catch is that tourists must do as the North Koreans do: check their freedom at the border.  Typically, the tourist goes out only with his guide, and sees only what the government wants him to see: factories, cooperative farms and monuments to the Great Leader, leavened by occasional walks in the mountains.  Ask to see the seamier side of the country, and the guide will assure you it doesn't exist.  Like most visitors, the Korean-Americans have mixed reactions.  "Life is better here than I expected it to be," says Chung Kyung Il, a scientist from Long Island City, N.Y. "People look well fed and have nice clothes."  But a Korean-American from Seattle is more guarded.  "I haven't decided what I think of this place yet," he says, speaking in the presence of his guide.  And Hyung Ho Lee, a Baptist minister from Sherman Oaks, Calif., confesses that the few North Korean Christians he met were "a special kind of Christian" -- they put Kim Il Sung and God on about the same level.  An American in Pyongyang gets a warm welcome from North Koreans despite all the anti-American propaganda.  Jim Cullen, a delegate to the student festival from Albany, N.Y., says his only disagreeable experience was his stomach's initial encounter with "kimchi", the highly spiced pickled vegetables that Koreans eat at every meal.  "The people are wonderful," he says.  "I haven't met a hostile person here."  Some North Koreans are even assigned to be friendly to foreigners.  In Nampo, a port city 25 miles from Pyongyang, women stand along the main streets and wave when foreigners pass by in their chauffeured cars.  Waving, it's clear, is their job, at least on this day.  The wavers aren't the only part of North Korea that seems staged.  At a department store, an Italian journalist watched several Koreans milling near the silk counter but not buying anything.  Then a "shopper" who had taken note of the Italian's presence asked the clerk for a yard of silk.  Put on guard by the purchase of such a small quantity of material, the journalist followed the shopper to a different part of the store -- and witnessed her handing the material back to a store official.  For many foreign tourists, catching the North Koreans in such ruses is part of the fun of being here.  Others enjoy the ubiquitous propaganda for its value as camp.  They snap photos of the more colorful of the billboards depicting the Great Leader helping his people.  They buy volumes by and about the Dear Leader Comrade Kim Jong Il, son and heir-apparent to the 77-year-old Great Leader. (Typical titles: "A Great Mind" and "A Great Personality.") They cherish every opportunity to tour another museum containing the Great Leader's and Dear Leader's artifacts.  Most tourists also get a night at the opera -- a revolutionary opera like "A True Daughter of the Party."  The plots are kitschy, but the singing and stagecraft often are excellent.  Few relics of pre-Korean-war days remain in the North; those that American bombs didn't destroy during the war, Communist zealotry has dismantled since.  But the tourist can find an occasional Buddhist or Confucian temple, and the Korean Art Gallery in Pyongyang has some Yi Dynasty and Koryo Dynasty paintings.  Architecture, in particular, shows the influence of four decades under a regime intent on wiping out any remnants of so-called bourgeois mentality.  Almost all citydwellers live in large, neat but essentially drab apartment blocks.  But the many government and monumental buildings of Pyongyang are breathtaking examples of socialist-realism, complete with high ceilings, ornate moldings and chandeliers.  As much as anything, most tourists are interested in the daily life of the North Korean people, and the biggest frustration may be the lack of opportunities to witness it unedited.  Foreigners can visit people in their homes, but the guides make sure tourists don't hear anything at variance with the party line.  Guides also labor mightily to protect their country's image from even the tiniest slights, as one foreigner discovered when his car needed gasoline.  The foreigner was ordered out of the car on the street, and it was only by chasing it on foot that he was able to observe the refueling process, which involved pumping gas from an ancient gray pump into a bucket and then pouring it from the bucket into the car's tank.  But hand in hand with backward technology, it often happens, go prices so low as to constitute a major enticement to tourism.  A night in an adequate if uninspired Pyongyang hotel can be had for as little as $60, and in a Wonsan hotel dining room, $7 buys a lunch for three with two meat courses, a fish course, vegetables and beer.  For about $50 at Mount Kumgang, a tourist can buy 30 yards of silk.  Other enticements suggest that the North Koreans, while new to the world of international tourism, are learning fast.  Just a few hundred miles to the east, in Japan, reside some of the world's richest potential tourists.  Here in the Pyongyang area, recent additions include an excellent Japanese restaurant and a golf course.  Brokers and mutual funds have a new story to tell.  They are trying to convince U.S. investors they can cash in on increased European merger and business activity related to the easing of trade barriers in 1992.  "The unification of Europe is making news.  It can also make you money," says a Merrill Lynch & Co. advertisement for a special report: "1992 -- A United States of Europe."  A mutual fund, G.T. Europe Growth Fund, headlines a recent ad: "Making New Money in the Old World," and asserts that the total return from its fund has climbed 150% since it began in July 1985.  European stock markets have already been heating up in anticipation of 1992.  Over the past year or so, stock markets in France, West Germany, the Netherlands and Belgium are up 25% to 50%.  Takeovers, mergers and restructurings in continental Europe and the United Kingdom have increased sharply.  Many investment advisers think there's still time for U.S. investors.  "It's not too late -- European markets are fairly valued," says Richard Holbrook, director of international research for Bailard Biehl & Kaiser, a San Mateo, Calif., investment management firm.  "I'm positive that 1992 will help markets over the next two to three years.  This is a significant shift with positive long-term implications."  Still, investors shouldn't get swept away in the euphoria, a number of international money managers warn.  "Brokers have jumped on the 1992 bandwagon, but they have glossed over some of the problems," says Simon Fenton, vice president of Kleinwort Benson, a London-based international investment firm.  "Nineteen ninety-two is a mixed bag," says Mr. Fenton.  "Deregulation brought about by the European accords will lead to benefits for some European companies and difficulties for others.  Investors are going to have to look at the individual characteristics of companies and industries carefully before they can take advantage of 1992."  U.S. investors also face some special risks when investing in Europe.  For one thing, the strength of the dollar has dragged down returns they get on European investments about 10% so far this year, says Jon Woronoff, publisher of International Fund Monitor, a Washington, D.C., newsletter.  Many analysts think the dollar is on an uptrend, which would mean that returns to U.S. investors will continue to be diminished by the currency effect.  Others believe the strong dollar is only a temporary phenomenon.  A U.S. recession spreading to Europe would also throw a monkey wrench into big gains for European stocks.  "If the U.S. has a recession, Europe will have a bear market with us," says Mr. Holbrook.  In addition, the costs and taxes involved in investing in European stocks are much higher than for U.S. stocks.  It's more difficult to obtain information about European stocks, and accounting standards differ between countries.  There's also the possibility that 1992 won't come off as envisioned -- that bickering among the various countries will water down the effect.  "The idea that Europeans will agree on everything is doubtful," says Kurt Brouwer, a San Francisco investment adviser.  "The land rush mentality of U.S. investors and the dollar's rise will make 1992 a bust for American investors."  But Mr. Brouwer is definitely in the minority among investment advisers.  Most think that Europeans realize they must make changes to compete against the Japanese and the U.S.  They also think gains in European stocks will outweigh the higher costs of investing there.  "It's just too good a story for U.S. investors to ignore," says David Booth, chairman of Dimensional Fund Advisors, a Santa Monica, Calif., investment firm.  Here's a look at what opportunities international money managers see in these investment vehicles:  INDIVIDUAL STOCKS. U.S. investors can purchase stocks traded on European exchanges through major brokerage firms, but it often isn't easy.  Commissions and transaction fees are generally higher than when buying shares in U.S. companies.  In addition, the investor will have to pay a foreign custodian a fee to hold the shares.  Far easier for individual investors to buy and sell are American depositary receipts, or ADRs.  These are securities traded on U.S. exchanges that represent stock in foreign companies.  The actual shares are held by a custodian outside the U.S.  Some money managers think ADR stocks, which are mostly blue-chip European companies, have less potential than stocks of smaller or medium-sized European companies that don't trade in the U.S. as ADRs.  Nonetheless, many money managers think the European blue chips have plenty of room to grow.  Mr. Woronoff of International Fund Monitor likes BSN, a French food concern; Nestle, a Swiss-based food giant; Asea Brown Boveri, a Swedish-Swiss company that makes heavy electrical equipment, and Unilever, a Dutch food company.  Juliet Cohn, a London-based analyst for Kleinwort Benson, believes infrastructure stocks will be a major theme as European governments spend more money to improve roads, railways and facilities for air travel.  She also likes Asea-Brown Boveri and BSN.  MUTUAL FUNDS. Small investors who don't have expertise in Europe may be better off letting a pro do the picking for them.  "A professional adviser adds a great deal of value," says Don Phillips, editor of Mutual Fund Values, a Chicago publication that tracks mutual fund performance.  While several mutual funds include shares of some European companies among their holdings, at least seven funds invest solely in European stocks.  There is a price to pay for choosing most of these funds: Expense ratios, which reflect money taken out of a fund's earnings to pay expenses, tend to be high -- "ridiculously high" in some cases, says Mr. Brouwer, the San Francisco investment adviser.  A high expense ratio reduces the amount of money that can be passed on to investors even when a fund's stocks do well.  Mutual fund executives attribute high expense ratios to the higher costs of investing in Europe and the small size of the funds, which means they have fewer shareholders to spread the expenses over.  Costs are coming down as more investors buy shares, they say.  John Legat, a London-based portfolio manager for the G.T. Europe Fund, says the most interesting companies are the medium-sized and small European companies that will be acquired by larger companies as the larger concerns get ready to compete Europe-wide.  Mr. Phillips of Mutual Fund Values says one way to play small European companies is to buy DFA Continental Small Company Fund.  This is an index fund that buys shares in European companies with market capitalizations below $200 million.  The fund, which is primarily for institutions, is available to small investors through Charles Schwab's Mutual Fund Marketplace.  For investors who want managers to select individual companies, Mr. Phillips recommends European Emerging Companies fund.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and its Post Horn Global Asset Management unit in London are considering offering a mutual fund to U.S. investors that would invest solely in small European companies that are likely to be takeover targets of larger concerns because of 1992.  Shearson already has set up such a fund for institutional investors.  CLOSED-END FUNDS. Still another approach for investors with more expertise is to buy a basket of several single-country, closed-end funds.  Unlike mutual funds, closed-end funds are traded on stock exchanges.  The price of their shares is typically at a discount to the net asset value of the stocks in their portfolios.  Single country closed-end funds also tend to be volatile.  "They have the highest gains and the largest risks," says Thomas J. Herzfeld, president of a Miami company that trades closed-end funds.  Mr. Herzfeld suggests Germany Fund, selling at a 7% discount from net asset value; Helvetia Fund (Switzerland), selling at a 13% discount; Italy Fund, also selling at a 13% discount; First Iberian Fund (Spain and Portugal), selling at a 2% discount; United Kingdom Fund, selling at a 14% discount; and France Fund, selling at a 2% discount.  ---  @ Betting on a Unified Europe  @ Mutual funds that invest solely in European stocks  @ EXPENSE ASSETS 1989  @ LOAD RATIO (In millions)** RETURN#  @DFA Continental Small Co. Fund  @ None 1.05% $147.0 18.5%  @DFA U.K. Small Co. Fund  @ None 0.71 118.7 2.7  @European Emerging Cos.  @ 4.5% 2.25 13.0 14.3  @Fidelity Europe  @ 2%/1%* 2.66 73.9 19.6  @Financial Strategic-Europe  @ None 1.88 5.8 15.7  @GT Europe Fund  @ 4.75% 3.60 26.0 22.2  @Merrill Lynch EuroFund-B  @ 4%* 2.80 202.5 14.6  @ *Redemption fee  @ **As of 6/30/89  @ #1/1-8/89  @ Source: Morningstar Inc.  Northwest Airlines cut fares to six European cities for flights during the fall and winter, traditionally the slowest seasons for transcontinental travel.  Northwest, a unit of closely held NWA Inc., said it will drop fares to between $288 to $458 for round-trip tickets bought before Sept. 15.  The airline, which is requiring travel between Nov. 1 and March 14 on the discounted tickets, said it wanted to stimulate traffic during the off-peak period.  The move comes on the heels of transcontinental fare cuts introduced two weeks ago by Trans World Airlines.  The Northwest action deepens even further the discounts available to travelers.  For example, Northwest is slashing the round-trip ticket between New York and Paris to $288, effective immediately.  One of the cheapest fares currently offered in that market is $487.  The Northwest fares are heavily restricted.  The tickets are only good to Amsterdam; Copenhagen; Frankfurt, West Germany; Glasgow, Scotland; London; and Paris.  Tickets must be bought on a round-trip basis and scheduled for trips between six and 21 days.  The carrier said seats are limited and aren't available during the Thanksgiving and Christmas holidays.  Also, there is a 50% penalty for canceled reservations.  Fliers can change the return date from Europe for a $100 charge.  Gruene Inc., Venice, Calif., said it signed a definitive merger agreement to acquire Beauty Labs Inc. in a stock exchange.  Under the agreement, each of Beauty Labs' common shares outstanding will be converted into one share of Gruene common, making Gruene the surviving company.  Based on Beauty Labs' 2.4 million shares outstanding, the transaction has an indicated value of about $11.4 million.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Gruene's stock closed at $4.75 bid, down 12.5 cents a share.  The two personal-care products concerns said last month that they were discussing a possible combination.  Gruene had a 1988 net loss of $69,000 on revenue of $3.2 million.  Beauty Labs, of Hauppauge, N.Y., had net income of $164,000, or seven cents a share, on sales of $13.1 million.  The companies' shareholders are expected to vote on the plan by December.  If approved, Gruene's chairman and chief executive officer, Daniel C. Samakow, will continue as chief executive.  Harold Markowitz, Beauty Labs' chairman and chief executive, will serve as chairman.  FILM SALE: Carolco Pictures Inc. sold about 44 feature films to Sky Television, a U.K. satellite TV-channel owned by News Corp.  The films "Rambo: First Blood II," "Angel Heart" and "Field of Dreams" were included.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Financial markets staggered through a listless Monday with stock prices and the dollar posting modest gains while bond prices slipped.  The sluggish pace of trading didn't keep the Dow Jones Industrial Average from setting a record.  The average rose 11 points to 2743.36, beating the 2734.64 record set Thursday.  The continuing takeover fever in the airline industry boosted the Dow Jones Transportation Average 24.90 points to 1492.89, also a record.  Treasury bond prices sank in thin trading.  The dollar posted a solid gain against the yen, despite earlier intervention in Tokyo by the Bank of Japan, but it made only marginal gains against the mark.  The late-August exodus of traders, brokers and money managers to vacation retreats was partly responsible for the moribund markets.  But analysts said concern about a spate of economic reports this week also kept investors on the sidelines.  One important report, the first revision of the second-quarter gross national product, or the total value of the nation's output of goods and services, is due out this morning.  Expectations are that the rate of growth in the second quarter will be raised to 2.5% from a preliminary 1.7%.  Other key measures of the economy's health come Friday when the government reports on August employment and the nation's purchasing managers release their monthly survey of business activity.  While most analysts are looking for modest economic growth to allow interest rates to settle at about current levels and stock prices to continue a modest rise, Charles Lieberman, managing director of financial markets research at Manufacturers Hanover Securities Corp., said he expects consumer spending to be a driving force behind gradually rising inflation and subsequent increases in interest rates.  Mr. Lieberman said better-than-expected auto sales in recent weeks, as well as positive gains in retail sales and record-high consumer confidence, suggest vigorous economic growth in the second half of 1989.  He said interest rates are already reflecting that vigor and he expects rates to rise as much as one half to three-quarters of a percentage point more, probably to the detriment of stock prices.  In major market activity:  Stock prices gained in slow trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 131.2 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners 760 to 692.  Bond prices slid.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond lost about half a point, or about $5 for each $1,000 of face value.  The yield on the issue rose to 8.23%.  The dollar rose.  In late New York trading the U.S. currency was quoted at 1.9633 marks and 144.55 yen, compared with 1.9625 marks and 143.95 yen Friday.  Here's how some of the alleged prearranged trades worked, according to internal Merc documents:  On Oct. 19, 1987, the day of the stock market crash, trading cards show Albert "Bud" Furman III bought 100 S&P contracts from Patrick J. Shannon at a trading price of 262.00.  Cards show Mr. Furman later sold the same contracts to John L. Oberman at a higher price.  Mr. Furman's profit: $77,500.  The three traders stood right next to each other in the pit.  Ideally, Mr. Shannon would have sold directly to Mr. Oberman, saving the $77,500 for their customers.  The Merc's probable-cause committee concluded that Mr. Furman never took part in the trade, and cites Mr. Oberman's trading card as evidence.  It appears Mr. Oberman first wrote down Mr. Shannon's badge, "JOK."  This was crossed out and replaced by "BUD," Mr. Furman's badge.  The committee concluded that Mr. Shannon instructed Mr. Oberman to "submit (the trade) into Furman," giving him the profit.  It isn't clear how the committee decided that Mr. Shannon gave the instruction.  Mr. Oberman didn't recall redirecting any trades, according to a Merc summary of his testimony.  In later testimony, he denied that he knowingly would have changed his card to include someone he hadn't traded with.  Did Mr. Furman return the alleged $77,500 favor?  The panel believes he did later that morning.  In that instance, Mr. Furman lost a combined $50,000 -- half to Mr. Shannon's brother, Peter, and half to another trader, Sidney L. Rabin.  Mr. Rabin and Patrick Shannon had an outstanding trading dispute that could have cost Mr. Shannon thousands of dollars to settle.  Peter Shannon was charged with prearranged trading.  He couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Rabin, who was also charged with prearranged trading, said in an interview last February that on a trade the week before the crash with Patrick Shannon there had been a dispute over price.  The dispute eventually was settled at Mr. Rabin's expense.  "They (Merc investigators) think something happened (Oct. 19) with paying back money through a trade," he said.  "I'm totally innocent.  I never prearranged a trade with Bud Furman or Pat Shannon."  More recently, Mr. Rabin has refused to comment.  Later the afternoon of Oct. 19, Merc records show Mr. Furman made another $24,000 buying from Mr. Shannon and selling to Mr. Oberman, whose trading card was again changed.  Mr. Shannon and Mr. Furman were charged with prearranged trading.  On Thursday, Oct. 22, some panic selling led to an unheard of down-then-up move in prices.  Within 90 seconds, Mr. Furman testfied, according to the Merc, he bought 303 contracts at 196.00 from Mr. Shannon and sold 300 at 202.00 to Mr. Oberman.  Mr. Furman's profit: $900,000.  In Mr. Furman's settlement with the exchange, this trade isn't mentioned, and a prearranged-trading charge against him appears to have been dropped.  Had he been found guilty, he might have had to pay twice his profit, or $1.8 million, in fines and restitution.  Mr. Shannon, however, still faces charges of withholding an order from the market and prearranged trading, as a result of this incident.  On Friday, Oct. 23, Mr. Furman made an additional $40,000 buying from Mr. Shannon and selling to Mr. Oberman, records show.  A trading card was changed -- Mr. Shannon's this time -- to include Mr. Furman in a trade, and at a more favorable price, the committee asserts.  Mr. Furman and Mr. Shannon were charged with another count of prearranged trading.  Mr. Oberman hasn't been charged with any wrongdoing.  (See related story: "Catching Up: Feeling New Pressure, Chicago Merc Stiffens Disciplinary Stance --- After Futures Indictments, It Zeroes In on 2 Members It Accuses of Fixing Trades --- Big Profits on Black Monday" -- WSJ Aug. 29, 1989).  Bel Fuse Inc., Jersey City, N.J., said it rejected a $7.50-a-share takeover proposal from Santa Monica Partners and Initio Inc. and said it has no interest in further negotiations.  The maker of electronic parts declined to give a reason for the rejection.  Bel Fuse previously had received a letter from Lawrence J. Goldstein, a general partner with Santa Monica Partners, stating that the two firms were prepared to buy all its shares for about $36.8 million.  Mr. Goldstein said the two firms would consider raising their offer.  He said his group hadn't directly heard from Bel Fuse officials.  Initio is a mail-order firm based in Carson City, Nev.  Santa Monica Partners is a New York-based investment partnership.  Bel Fuse shares closed in national over-the-counter trading yesterday at $6.25-a-share, unchanged.  For this year's first half the company posted a net loss of $123,000 on sales of $14.3 million.  Air Liquide S.A., a French chemical group and the world's leading producer of industrial gases, said it plans a public tender offer for the 49% of Siossigeno S.p.A. that it doesn't already own.  Siossigeno, an Italian maker of industrial gases, said in Milan that its board has been informed of Air Liquide's intention to take full control of Siossigeno through a tender offer by the French company's wholly owned Italian subsidiary Parital SRL.  Terms of the proposed tender offer weren't announced and a spokesman for Siossigeno declined to elaborate.  Air Liquide couldn't be reached for comment.  A federal judge ruled that NL Industries Inc. can evict PaineWebber Inc. from a midtown Manhattan office building for not paying all its rent.  The judge's decision, which stems from a dispute over PaineWebber's electric bill, also opens the way for NL to double the rent on the space, which the PaineWebber Group Inc. unit rents in the McGraw-Hill Building on Sixth Avenue.  NL claims that the rent PaineWebber currently is paying, about $20 a square foot, is half the market value of the lease.  That difference would amount to $20 million to $30 million additional rent over the remaining 11 years of the lease, said Paul Share, an attorney for NL, a Houston-based chemical company.  The lease covers 110,000 square feet and was to include an additional 9,000 square feet starting in July 1990.  NL also claims that PaineWebber owes it $1 million to $2 million for not paying the market value of the rented space since the lease was terminated in November, according to Mr. Share.  NL sued PaineWebber last year after the financial-services company withheld part of the rent for what it said was an overcharge on its electric bill.  The electricity is billed to NL, which then passes on the charge to PaineWebber.  NL leases the floors from McGraw-Hill and then rents the space out to PaineWebber, which uses part of it for one of its retail offices housing 50 brokers.  PaineWebber subleases much of its space to other tenants.  NL notified PaineWebber that it was terminating the lease last November because PaineWebber hadn't paid the full rent and because it hadn't paid for damage allegedly caused by its air-conditioning system.  When PaineWebber refused to vacate the building, NL filed suit in federal court in Manhattan.  U.S. Judge Michael B. Mukasey said NL had acted properly in terminating the lease.  But he said the dispute over the electric bill, in which PaineWebber claims it overpaid $300,000, will have to be decided in arbitration.  Allen Reiter, an attorney for PaineWebber, said the company will appeal the judge's decision.  "It is our belief that under New York law, PaineWebber's leasehold cannot be terminated by NL under the facts presented" in the case, he said.  Mr. Reiter also challenged NL's estimate of the lease's market value.  "Those number are way out of proportion," he said.  Robert Leidich, general counsel and a vice president at NL, said the company doesn't believe it will be difficult to find a tenant to replace PaineWebber.  "It is very prime space," he said.  "We think the space is readily re-leasable."  Bayer AG, Frankfurt, West Germany, said its pretax profit climbed 19% to 2.22 billion marks ($1.13 billion) in the first half from 1.862 billion marks a year earlier.  A comparison with first-quarter figures shows that in the second period, pretax earnings at the chemical concern rose 18% to 1.26 billion marks from 1.07 billion marks, a mild slowdown from the 21% growth in the first three months.  Group sales climbed 12% in the first half to 22.62 billion marks from 20.23 billion marks a year earlier.  In the second quarter alone, group sales rose 10% to 11.31 billion marks from 10.24 billion marks a year earlier.  Bayer's results fell short of those of BASF AG, which last week reported a 31% jump in second-quarter pretax profit for a 28% gain in the first half.  But the figures were much better than those of Hoechst AG, the third of the three major West German chemical concerns, where pretax earnings slid 2.2% in the second quarter and rose only 8.3% in the first half.  Transcisco Industries Inc. said it agreed to drop a previously threatened proxy fight against PLM International Inc. in exchange for a seat on PLM's board and help in selling its 36% stake in the company.  Transcisco said PLM agreed to name Walter E. Hoadley, a former Bank of America chief economist, to its board and executive committee.  It also said PLM agreed to use its "best efforts" to help Transcisco sell its PLM holdings.  Transcisco said the truce "will benefit both companies through an orderly disposition of its PLM International shareholdings, the avoidance of substantial costs associated with a proxy contest, and improved relations between the two companies."  Transcisco, a rail-car maintenance firm, and PLM International, a transportation leasing company, were formed last year following the breakup of PLM Cos.  Both firms are based in San Francisco.  PLM currently has seven directors.  The company said it believed the pact was "in the best interests of all of PLM International's stockholders, taken as a whole."  Benetton Group S.p.A. is determined to consolidate its presence in the Japanese market by turning its licensing agreement with the Seibu/Saison Group into a joint-venture accord.  The Italian apparel concern hopes to conclude negotiations with the giant Japanese retailer before the end of the year, a spokesman said.  The talks are aimed at setting up a 50-50 joint venture that will oversee production, marketing and wholesaling of Benetton's main product lines in Japan.  "We hope to conclude this operation in a short time because it's very important for us, as Japan is one of the most interesting and currently the fastest growing market for Benetton," the spokesman said.  A joint venture would boost the group's world-wide revenue by no less than 10% because it would enable Benetton to include Japanese sales in its consolidated accounts.  The immediate impact on profits would be much less, however, analysts say, because margins are still thin in Japan's young and highly competitive market.  Bristol-Myers Co. and Squibb Corp. said the waiting period for their merger required under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 expired Sunday.  The antitrust law prevents companies from completing their mergers until federal agencies have time to decide whether a transaction raises antitrust questions.  The two drug companies in July announced agreement for a $12.1 billion merger of Princeton, N.J.-based Squibb into New York-based Bristol-Myers.  The merger, subject to shareholder approval, is expected to occur in October.  Squibb shareholders are to receive 2.4 shares of new Bristol-Myers Squibb Co. stock for each Squibb share.  Club Mediterranee S.A. and Nouvelles Frontieres S.A. are breaking off talks that would have led to the creation of Europe's third-largest tour operator group, officials of the Paris-based travel groups said.  They had reached an accord in April that would have given Club Med a 34% stake in Nouvelles Frontieres.  The decision reflected major discrepancies on plans to form an airline and on a sales agreement between Club Med and the French media and travel group Havas S.A., officials said.  But the chief executive officers of both companies indicated in a joint radio interview that they haven't given up on the idea of collaboration.  Nouvelles Frontieres said it wants to set up its own sales unit, as West German and British rivals have done, while Club Med wanted to strengthen ties with Havas.  Nouvelle Frontieres also said that it wanted to take over an existing charter company but that Club Med preferred setting up a separate airline unit while maintaining Club Med's close relations with Air France's charter company, Air Charter.  Profit-taking trimmed recent advances in copper futures, despite continued production problems in the industry.  The December contract ended with a loss of 0.80 cent a pound at $1.309.  The December price had risen for three consecutive sessions and, in eight out of 10 sessions since Aug. 8, had gained a total of 24.2 cents by Friday's close.  One analyst observed that although closing levels were lower, the tone was strong and encouraging because December posted a recovery from the day's low of $1.295 and ended near the high of the day.  Another analyst, John Gross, president of J.E. Gross Associates, New City, N.Y., industry consultants, noted that New York traders lacked the influence of the London market, which was closed for a bank holiday.  Inventories of copper in warehouses of the London Metal Exchange would have been yesterday, helping set the tone of the market for the day, he said.  The figures will be released today.  Mr. Gross also noted that September and December posted new life-of-contract highs on Friday.  "When you consider there has been a gain of over 30 cents a pound since early July, when the price was below $1 and that production problems continue, there is reason to believe there could be a test of the $1.40 level," Mr. Gross said.  A resumption of the advance would be in keeping with the anticipated seasonal pickup in demand for copper that begins in September, Mr. Gross said.  Also, he added, "Don't forget this is a market that remains in backwardation, with September and December retaining premiums over more deferred months, even though they narrowed slightly {yesterday}.  This indicates a concern or a real tightness of near-term supplies of copper."  Trading in the standard copper futures contract will end on Dec. 27 and the only months remaining are August, September and December, so the backwardation is not visible there.  But the high-grade contract, in which there is some trading now and which will completely supplant the standard contract as of Jan. 1, has trading months ranging from September 1989 to March 1991.  The prices of the nearby months there are higher than for deferred months.  William O'Neill, vice president of research for Elders Futures, Inc., New York, said at least two news services carried reports that Mexican miners at the Cananea mine complex intended to go into the mine and occupy it during all three shifts until negotiations were restarted.  The mine isn't operating currently and on Aug. 20 the Compania Minera Cananea was declared bankrupt by the government.  Troops subsequently were reported to have been stationed at the mine.  Mr. O'Neill said that if the reports of intended occupation by miners were true, it appeared the union wanted to force the government's hand on resuming the labor talks.  "The union doesn't really believe the bankruptcy judgment was legitimate, and it feels that it was a means the company sought to reduce the number of workers and alleviate some of its financial problems," Mr. O'Neill said.  Mr. O'Neill also noted that the Bougainville mine in Papua New Guinea isn't likely to reopen as soon as had been expected according to a recent company announcement.  "It looks like there won't be any production from that mine this year," he said.  Japan will be significantly affected by the Bougainville situation, he said.  "It has contracts with the mine for copper shipments during the third and fourth quarters of this year," Mr. O'Neill said.  "Since it won't be able to obtain the copper from Bougainville, it will have to come out into the market to buy it."  Negotiations between the union and the Highland Valley mine in British Colombia produced minor progress and talks will resume today, analysts said.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COFFEE: Futures rose on renewed optimism that a new international coffee accord may be agreed upon.  The September contract rose 3.19 cents a pound to 82.25 cents.  A Colombian newspaper over the weekend said Colombia and the U.S. agreed on the need for a new coffee agreement because of the impact of low coffee prices on producing countries, analysts said.  This development triggered demand for futures contracts, they said.  The International Coffee Agreement's 74-member council will begin its annual two-week meeting in mid-September.  SUGAR: Futures prices declined.  The October contract was down 0.7 cent a pound to 13.14 cents.  It was the third decline in as many days as demand lagged in the world market for physical sugar, analysts said.  Selling of futures was mostly technical.  When the price of the October delivery contract dropped below 13.5 cents, selling orders that had been placed around that level accelerated the decline.  Pakistan bought 55,000 tons of refined sugar for September arrival, a dealer said.  According to one analyst, the price drop might stimulate renewed demand for sugar because prices now are at more reasonable levels.  COTTON: Futures prices recovered from sharp early declines to end with moderate losses.  The October contract settled at 75.5 cents a pound for a loss of 0.65 cent.  The December contract dropped the daily limit of two cents a pound momentarily, and other months showed near-limit losses.  Selling was largely technical in nature, following recent continued advances to new life-of-contract highs, an analyst said.  The December contract, for example, traded as high as 76.6 cents, the analyst noted, before it began to decline.  Then it fell below levels such as 75.5 cents and 75 cents to as low as 74.73 cents before turning upward to end at 76.25 cents for a loss of only 0.48 cent.  An absence of buyers accelerated the decline, the analyst said.  LIVESTOCK AND MEATS: Cattle futures prices dipped as hot weather doused supermarket demand for beef.  The decline was also fueled by speculation that feedlot operators are holding onto cattle being fattened to slaughter.  Thomas Morgan, president of Sterling Research Corp., Arlington Heights, Ill., said feedlot operators in some major cattle-producing states are postponing sales in anticipation of reaping higher profits this fall, when a shortage of fattened cattle is expected to force meatpackers to bid up prices.  But the move by feedlot operators is increasing the weight of cattle ready for slaughter, which could cushion any price rise.  Cattle prices are expected to rise because an unusually small number of young cattle were placed on feedlots in the spring.  It's those cattle that are being fattened for slaughter this fall.  Usually, cattle prices hit their lows for the year in late September and early October.  The price of most hog futures contracts slipped in trading yesterday at the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  Ideal Basic Industries Inc., Denver, said its major holder, HOFI North America Inc., ended discussions about a possible merger between HOFI and Ideal.  Last week, the cement maker said its directors endorsed the proposal to merge the company with HOFI's other North American holdings, but the sides hadn't been able to agree on a price.  HOFI, a unit of Holderbank Financiere Glaris Ltd., had proposed to exchange its 67% holding in Ideal for a 90% holding by merging Ideal with HOFI's 100%-held Dundee Cement Co. and 60%-held St. Lawrence Cement Inc.  The Swiss company said one purpose of the merger was to "enable Ideal's operating problems to be promptly and more effectively addressed as part of a larger organization."  Ideal had an operating loss of about $10 million in 1988 on revenue of $227.8 million.  Ideal said it scheduled a special meeting of its directors for mid-September to consider "strategic alternatives available to Ideal."  U.S. Shoe Corp., bolstered by a strong performance from its specialty optical Lenscrafters unit, reported fiscal second-quarter net income of $5.9 million, or 13 cents a share, compared with a loss of $9.4 million a year earlier.  Sales for the quarter, ended July 29, rose 9% to $591 million from $544.4 million.  Analysts said the results were a "little" better than expected.  They had been projecting that the Cincinnati-based footwear and specialty retailer would be "slightly" profitable for the quarter.  In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, U.S. Shoe shares closed at $21.125, up 37.5 cents.  Much of the growth came from the Lenscrafters unit, which had operating profit of $10.9 million, up 65% from $6.6 million a year earlier.  The unit's sales climbed 29% to $128.4 million from $99.9 million.  The company attributed the improved results to an "aggressive" expansion strategy that boosted the number of Lenscrafters stores to 305 from 258 a year earlier.  The company's core business, the women's apparel retail group, incurred an operating loss of $174,000 compared with a year-earlier loss of $14 million.  While the company is benefiting from the industrywide turnaround in retailing, its women's apparel business continues to lag competitors.  Sales per square feet for U.S. Shoe's apparel business was about $200, compared with about $400 for Limited Inc.  Nevertheless, U.S. Shoe said it was encouraged by the results of the group's Casual Corner division, which was profitable despite markdowns that usually occur for spring clearance.  "They seem to be making a lot of progress.  They should have a good second half," said Jeffrey Stein, an analyst at McDonald & Co., Cleveland.  Operating earnings for the footwear division slid 5% to $10.8 million from $11.3 million, hurt by disappointing results from its Hahn footwear retailing unit.  Sales were about $195 million for both periods.  For the six months, U.S. Shoe posted net income of $13.6 million compared to a year-earlier loss of $6.3 million.  The prior year's results include a one-time charge of about $3 million for closing six Front Row apparel stores.  Sales rose 8% to $1.16 billion from $1.07 billion.  Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., Tokyo, reported that consolidated profit for its first quarter ended June 30 rose less than 2% to 52.6 billion yen ($365.8 million), or 24.69 yen ($1.72) a share, from the year-earlier 51.8 billion yen, or 24.27 yen a share, as domestic sales weakened.  The company, Japan's largest maker of consumer electric and electronic products, posted a 6% increase in sales to 1.4 trillion yen from 1.31 billion yen.  While domestic consolidated sales were down slightly to 789.6 billion yen, compared with 798.9 billion yen a year earlier, Matsushita said overseas sales rose 17% to 610.6 billion yen from 520.5 billion yen, owing to increasing overseas production.  Matsushita, which markets its products world-wide under the brand names National, Quasar, Panasonic and Technics, said the most rapid sales growth was in "strategic product areas," including communication and industrial equipment, with sales of 309.1 billion yen, up 16%, and electronic parts, such as semiconductors, with sales of 189.5 billion yen, up 11%.  Blue-chip buying led the Dow Jones Industrial Average to another record close, though trading was the slowest in more than seven weeks.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average climbed 11.00 to 2743.36, topping the record of 2734.64 set last Thursday, the first time the average had closed above its 1987 pre-crash high.  On Friday, the industrials fell 2.28.  Just 131,180,000 shares were traded on the New York Stock Exchange, the lightest volume since July 5, when 127,700,000 shares changed hands.  The total would have been even lower if not for heavy dividend-related trading in Texaco and Texas Utilities.  Traders said a number of investors pursued big blue-chip shares, particularly those in the Dow Jones averages.  International Business Machines, one of the most active stocks on the Big Board, led the industrial average, rising 1 7/8 to 118 on 1.7 million shares.  Chevron rose 1 to 56 5/8.  Traders said stocks again shook off a weaker bond market.  They said a number of investors are buying shares in the industrial average in the expectation that the average will outperform the broader market in a march to the 3000 level.  Some investors remain wary, however.  J. David Mills, senior vice president with Boston Co. Advisers, said: "There is new cash coming in, and I am not investing it rapidly.  The attractive list of stocks is shrinking every day.  Every major valuation is diminished as the price of the stock goes up."  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index rose 1.57 to 352.09, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index went up 0.66 to 195.45; both also broke their closing records.  The Dow Jones Equity Market Index rose 1.12 to 330.17.  Trades allowing institutions to capture Texaco's special dividend of cash and preferred valued at $4 a share, due for payment next month, swelled Big Board composite volume in the stock to 6.5 million shares.  By far the most active Big Board issue, Texaco fell 1/4 to 53 1/2.  Texas Utilities, second on the most actives list, closed down 1/4 at 32 5/8 on volume of 3.7 million shares.  The activity reflected interest in the stock's quarterly payout.  The issue carries a dividend yield of 8.9%.  As the broad market rebounded, the Dow Jones Transportation Average recorded its third consecutive all-time high.  The latest round of takeover-related buying among airline stocks and across-the-board gains in the railroad group pushed the average up 24.90 to 1492.89.  UAL, the parent company of United Airlines, rose 3 1/2 to 281 1/2.  Chairman Stephen Wolf told employees to prepare for a possible change in ownership.  AMR, which owns American Airlines, rose 2 1/8 to 81 1/4 on 1.4 million shares; Delta Air Lines jumped 2 3/4 to 80 1/2, and Southwest Airlines firmed 1 1/8 to 27 1/2.  Texas Air gained 1 1/8 to 22 on the American Stock Exchange.  Scandinavian Airline Systems and an unidentified partner are interested in acquiring all or part of Continental Airlines from the company, and talks have reached an advanced stage, sources said.  Among the Dow Jones industry groups that make up the equity index, only railroads outperformed the airlines.  Burlington Northern rose 7/8 to 29 3/4, Consolidated Rail climbed 1 to 42 3/8, CSX gained 1 1/8 to 37 7/8, Santa Fe Pacific went up 1 to 24 3/8, Norfolk Southern advanced 1 1/8 to 40 1/8, and Union Pacific rose 1 3/8 to 79 1/8.  W.R. Grace, often mentioned as a possible takeover target, gained 1 3/8 to 37 1/8.  The newspaper USA Today reported that Montgomery Securities, along with one or two other brokerage firms, has built a 4% to 4.5% stake in the company on behalf of an unidentified client.  International Flavors & Fragrances jumped 2 1/2 to 71 3/4 even though the company reiterated that it hadn't been approached by any suitors.  Rumors of a possible offer from a West German company sent the stock soaring last week.  Ecolab climbed 2 to 32 1/2 as rumors of a foreign buyer for the stock circulated in the market.  There were reports this month that investor Asher B. Edelman owns about 4% of the company's shares.  Market sources cited PaineWebber as a big buyer of Ecolab, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report; a source at the firm acknowledged its buying interest but declined to elaborate.  Other winners among rumored takeover candidates included Motel 6 L.P., which jumped 1 5/8 to 17 1/2; Golden Nugget, which soared 2 5/8 to 33 3/8; Tambrands, which gained 2 7/8 to 75 5/8; and Midway Airlines, which advanced 3/4 to 19 1/8 despite moving to strengthen its takeover defenses through an amendment to a shareholder rights plan.  First Pennsylvania fell 3/8 to 15 3/8 on 2.2 million shares in the wake of Meridian Bancorp's offer to acquire the company in a stock swap valued at $18 a share.  Meridian dropped 2 1/4 to 23 in over-the-counter trading.  Campbell Soup fell 1/2 to 49 3/4 as the prospect of a takeover of the company continued to fade.  Other stocks turning lower as speculative rallies gave out included Phillips Petroleum, which went down 1 1/2 to 28 as 2.1 million shares changed hands; K mart, down 3/8 to 43 3/8; Ferro, down 1/2 to 60 1/4; Maytag, down 1/2 to 24 1/2; and Federal-Mogul, down 3/8 to 25 5/8.  Lomas Financial plunged 2 3/8 to 3 5/8.  The company said it doesn't expect to complete debt-restructuring talks with its lenders by Friday, when about $145 million of senior debt matures, and is considering further asset sales.  American Barrick Resources lost 1 1/2 to 23 7/8.  A Utah court cleared the way for Gold Standard to amend its lawsuit against the company and others over ownership of the Mercur gold mine by filing additional charges.  Mylan Laboratories, a generic-drug maker that has been untouched by the Food and Drug Adminstration's investigation of the industry, climbed 1 7/8 to 13 7/8 as 1.4 million shares changed hands.  Albertson's rose 1 7/8 to 53 3/4 after its earnings for the quarter ended Aug. 3 turned out better than analysts had expected.  The company posted net income of 68 cents a share, compared with 56 cents a share a year earlier.  Green Tree Acceptance rose 1 1/4 to 11 1/4.  The company and Midwest Savings Association submitted to federal regulators a proposed settlement of their dispute over the sale of certain mortgage contracts.  The American Stock Exchange Index rose 0.49 to 381.67.  Volume was 10,550,000 shares, compared with 13,560,000 Friday.  There were 275 issues advancing, 297 declining and 284 unchanged.  Forest Laboratories slid 1 3/4 to 35 1/2.  Its chief executive officer, Howard Solomon, told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report that he and another top official sold a total of 300,000 shares.  Dataram lost 1 1/2 to 9 3/8 after the expiration of Grubstein Holdings' offer, made in a letter of intent, to acquire the company for $13 a share.  Even if Colombia arrests and extradites to the U.S. major cocaine traffickers under indictment in this country, prosecuting some of the drug lords might be difficult, a Justice Department official said.  Since federal grand juries in Miami and other cities have handed down the indictments in recent years, important witnesses and evidence may have disappeared, said David Runkel, chief spokesman for the department.  "There is some concern {among U.S. prosecutors} that some of these cases may have gone stale," he added.  Mr. Runkel declined to discuss which indictments might have been weakened by delays.  "These matters are being reviewed on a case-by-case basis," he said, refusing to elaborate.  U.S. officials have indicted about 80 Colombians alleged to be leaders of that country's main cocaine-exporting cartels.  But extradition proceedings are under way for only one alleged Colombian drug figure, Eduardo Martinez Romero, who U.S. prosecutors charge is a money-laundering expert for the Medellin cocaine cartel.  Mr. Martinez wasn't included in a list of the 12 "most wanted" drug traffickers Attorney General Dick Thornburgh sent to Colombian officials last week.  Carlin Communications Inc., a New York promoter of adult phone services, sold its phone operations to Topaz Telecom Group Ltd. for more than $10 million.  Included in the sale are several so-called dial-a-porn services, including Sapphire, Calaber and Sable.  Samuel Rubenstein, Carlin's chief operating officer, said the company was getting out of the phone-service business to concentrate on its more profitable magazine business.  Magazines the company publishes include Swimsuit International; Playgirl; Revolution, which is a rock-music magazine; and Venture, a monthly for entrepreneurs.  Earlier this year, Carlin's Sable phone service won a landmark Supreme Court ruling that eased a congressional ban on dial-a-porn.  Under the ruling, "obscene" phone messages could be banned but not "indecent" ones.  Hyundai Heavy Industries Co., South Korea's largest shipbuilder, has completed and shipped to Exxon Corp. what it said is the world's biggest steel structure jacket for an offshore oil exploration facility.  A company official said the offshore steel structure, named "Heritage," is 1,099 feet long and weighs 32,000 tons.  It is being shipped to Santa Barbara, Calif., on a 76,000-ton barge pulled by five tug boats during a 50-day journey across the Pacific.  The structure is one of the two that Exxon ordered from Hyundai in July 1985 at a cost of $120 million.  When it is installed under water, it will be capable of pumping 10,000 barrels of crude oil and 70,000-100,000 cubic feet of natural gas a day.  The first of the two jackets, christened "Harmony," was installed off the California coast in July.  Japanese businessman Ginji Yasuda, owner of the Aladdin hotel-casino and the first foreigner to receive a Nevada casino license, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law protection for the resort after months of financial and operating troubles.  In the filing, Ginji Corp. listed debts of $121.2 million and total assets of $82.9 million.  James Patrick Shea, an attorney for Mr. Yasuda, said that the Aladdin's assets were listed at book value and that the Strip resort is worth substantially more.  The Aladdin was set to be auctioned off next week by the holder of a $32.5 million mortgage on the property.  Mr. Yasuda bought the Aladdin out of a bankruptcy-law proceeding for $56 million in January 1986 and spent over $30 million refurbishing it.  Mr. Yasuda, 55 years old, couldn't be reached for comment.  Last week, the Nevada Gaming Commission ordered that the resort hire several new executives, disclose the source of recent loans and meet additional requests to remain open.  John O'Reilly, the commission's chairman, said the filing has no effect on a hearing on those issues scheduled for next week.  The petition lists 10 secured creditors owed $34.1 million and about 800 unsecured creditors, excluding Aladdin employees, owed $86.9 million.  Mr. Shea said no final decision has been made on whether to sell or reorganize the troubled property.  The U.S. International Trade Commission ruled that shipments of subsidized pork from Canada are injuring U.S. pig producers and processors, a decision that clears the way for the U.S. to impose penalty duties on the imports.  Even before the ITC ruling was announced, however, Canada demanded review of the dispute by a binational panel that would be set up under the U.S.-Canada free-trade agreement.  This panel could overturn the duties only if it finds they were based on an incorrect interpretation of U.S. law.  Under the free-trade accord, which took effect just this year, binational panels can be established only after the Commerce Department and the ITC complete their inquiries and issue their final decisions.  With yesterday's ITC ruling, these conditions have been met.  ITC officials said Canada also has decided to request a separate panel to review recent U.S. determinations that imports of new steel rails from Canada have violated the U.S.'s anti-dumping act and countervailing duty law.  The pork ruling arose from a complaint several months ago by U.S. pork producers and several U.S. meat processing companies, which charged that various Canadian government subsidies to pork producers and exporters allow the Canadian companies to compete unfairly in the U.S. market.  The subsidized imports from Canada totaled about $341 million in 1988 and accounted for about 2.9% of the U.S. market for such processed meat.  The Commerce Department determined that the subsidies have averaged eight Canadian cents (6.8 U.S. cents) a kilogram, or about 3.6 Canadian cents a pound, on exports of processed pork products to the U.S. market.  Now that the ITC has ruled the imports are injuring domestic producers, countervailing duties equal to the subsidies will be imposed on the imports, which include fresh, chilled and frozen pork.  The U.S. ordered penalty duties on imports of live swine from Canada in an earlier countervailing duty inquiry in 1985.  The ITC vote in the latest ruling was 32.  One member, Seeley Lodwick, decided against participating in the decision, because he raises pigs on a Midwestern farm.  Triton Group Ltd. said in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing that it boosted its stake in Fuqua Industries Inc. to 19.1% of the common shares outstanding.  Triton, a holding company with interests in turbine-engine overhauling and construction industry products, has gradually increased ownership in Fuqua since January, when it increased its stake to 9.9%.  Triton has said it intends to acquire a controlling stake in the Atlanta-based consumer products and services company.  Both companies have characterized the relationship as friendly.  The House Banking Committee plans to hold hearings on the fast-paced sale of dozens of ailing savings and loans by regulators in December, in which many buyers came away with hefty tax breaks and government guarantees of profits on bad assets.  Chairman Henry Gonzalez (D., Texas) said he intends for the hearings, which will probably be held next month, to air the specifics of the 68 complex transactions between the now-defunct Federal Home Loan Bank Board and buyers of sick thrifts in December.  The savings-and-loan bailout bill, signed into law by President Bush this month, explicitly directs the new S&L regulators to examine those thrift sales to determine if terms might be renegotiated.  However, the new law specifically preserves the $8 billion in tax benefits included in the 1988 transactions.  "We need to comb through the deals, particularly those entered into in the December rush, and to seek renegotiation or outright termination where the arrangements are clearly excessive and detrimental to the public interest," Rep. Gonzalez said.  Mr. Gonzalez also said he would hold hearings on the federal supervision of Lincoln Savings & Loan Association, Los Angeles, now in receivership.  Several U.S. senators met with Bank Board officials on behalf of the ailing S&L last year.  Lincoln has been the subject of lawsuits by some debt holders, who say they thought they were buying government-insured certificates of deposit.  Hearst Magazines and Burda Publications of West Germany said they will jointly publish an "upscale" astrology magazine called Jupiter beginning Dec. 5.  Hearst plans to put about a half-million copies of the magazine on newsstands.  Hearst, a unit of Hearst Corp., expects to start Jupiter as a quarterly, eventually going to monthly frequency.  Burda currently publishes a monthly version of Jupiter in West Germany.  Astrology magazines and booklets are among the best-selling publications at supermarket checkouts and convenience store newsstands.  Jupiter's target audience is "upscale, young career women," according to John Mack Carter, director of magazine development at Hearst.  "Horoscopes are among the most popular items in our magazines."  Hearst publishes horoscope columns in Town & Country, Cosmopolitan and Harper's Bazaar magazines.  Jupiter will be the first full-size, full-color astrology magazine in the U.S.  Jupiter will cost $1.95 and will compete directly with booklet-sized astrology magazines published by New York-based Diamandis Communications Inc., a unit of Hachette S.A. of France.  Hearst said it will consider further joint publishing ventures with Burda.  McDonnell Douglas Helicopter Co. said it completed the first phase of a management restructuring that reduced the number of its vice presidents to seven from 14.  The move is part of an overall corporate move to improve efficiency at the company's parent, McDonnell Douglas Corp., a St. Louis defense contractor and commercial aircraft concern that has experienced problems controlling costs and meeting production schedules.  It said last month that it would review all 800 management positions at its helicopter unit as part of a streamlining.  Keeping vice president posts at the helicopter company, which has annual sales of about $1 billion, were Dean C. Borgman, Stuart D. Dodge, Norman B. Hirsh, Allen C. Haggerty, J. James Schwalm and Paul K. Henney.  Leonard J. Deney, who had been director of contracts and pricing, also was named a vice president.  The restructuring reduced the number of helicopter-company divisions to seven from 14, the unit said.  Louisiana-Pacific Corp. said it was offering shareholders with 99 or fewer shares a chance to sell the shares without paying brokerage fees or commissions.  The forest-products concern said about 535,000 of its 38.9 million shares outstanding are potentially involved, as well as 19,000 of its 33,000 shareholders.  It said shares tendered would be sold in the open market, with stockholders receiving a weighted average price.  The offer, which is being extended to holders of record Aug. 24, expires Oct. 16.  Carolina Power & Light Co. said it is laying off as many as 720 employees in a move designed to save at least $70 million a year.  About 500 employees were given notices and severance packages yesterday, according to the Raleigh, N.C.-based utility.  The additional 220 employees will be offered the choice of leaving or taking other jobs, some of which are demotions.  Jobs filled by an additional 1,000 contract workers in such areas as building maintenance and tree trimming also will be eliminated, the company said.  The layoffs should reduce the company's total work force to about 8,300 from the current 8,900, the utility said.  News of the layoffs had little effect on the company's stock price, which closed at $43, up 37.5 cents in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  The move at Carolina Power is the latest in a wave of layoffs in the electric-power industry.  Gun-shy about building more large plants and more attuned to competition, utilities have been cutting workers as they finish major construction programs.  "All of the companies are trying to become lean and mean and the low-cost producer," said Edward J. Tirello Jr., an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  Carolina Power said its layoffs are linked in part to completion of a major plant.  Neighboring utilities, including Duke Power Co., have undertaken similar cutbacks.  Carolina Power, which has been awarded rate increases totaling about 16% in the past two years, also said it is trying to stay competitive.  "We want to do anything we can to avoid another rate increase anytime soon," a company spokesman said.  Carolina Power said the layoffs are companywide but added that more jobs are being lost in construction and engineering than in other sections.  Among those being idled are accountants, engineers, technicians, linemen and secretaries.  "I think the numbers are reasonable and probably can be easily achieved," said Barry Abramson, an analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  Loews Corp., a hotel operator, and Covia, a partnership of six airlines that owns a computerized travel-reservation system, said they intend to form a joint venture to offer hotel-reservation services.  MITSUI BANK and Taiyo Kobe Bank agreed to merge, creating the world's second-largest bank.  The combined company would have the biggest network of bank branches in Japan, reflecting a desire of the Japanese industry to focus on lending to consumers and small businesses.  ---  Resorts International is halting interest payments on $925 million of secured and unsecured notes.  The firm cited poor cash flow and a delay in selling assets, and plans to unveil a recapitalization next month.  ---  Moody's downgraded Australia's foreign-currency debt, citing the nation's rising obligations, large trade deficit and poor economic prospects.  ---  Unisys named James Unruh to be president and chief operating officer, putting him in line to succeed Blumenthal as company chairman.  ---  The FDA plans to withdraw its approval of one of Bolar's top-selling drugs, citing confusion about the blood-pressure medicine's lab tests.  ---  Stocks and the dollar posted modest gains while bond prices slipped.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 11.00 to 2743.36, a record high.  The transportation index soared 24.90 points on airline takeover fever.  ---  Diamond-Star workers ratified a three-year contract with the Chrysler-Mitsubishi joint venture.  The pact has some of the strongest job-protection provisions in the U.S. auto industry.  ---  Postmaster General Frank predicted an attempt to boost the price of a first-class stamp in 1991 to between 28 and 32 cents from 25 cents.  ---  Agency Rent-A-Car's president and chief financial officer resigned, the second departure by a president of the company in less than a year.  ---  Unusual trading in Honda shares last week is the subject of a review by British market regulators.  --- Record exports helped shrink the U.S. merchandise trade deficit in the second quarter to $27.72 billion, its narrowest in more than four years.  ---  Walt Disney acquired Henson Associates, owner of the Muppets, adding to Disney's cast of marketable characters.  The price is said to be $150 million to $200 million.  ---  Drexel Burnham plans to greatly expand its use of program trading.  The practice has been growing more common after a post-crash decline.  ---  South Korea approved a $1 billion rescue package for three of its biggest shipyards in an attempt to revive the nation's shipbuilding industry.  ---  Carolina Power is laying off as many as 720 employees in an effort to save at least $70 million a year.  An additional 1,000 jobs filled by contract workers also are being eliminated.  ---  A federal trade panel ruled that subsidized Canadian pork is hurting domestic producers and processors, clearing the way for the U.S. to impose penalty duties on the imports.  ---  Hong Kong lowered its 1989 economic growth projection and said inflation would be worse than expected.  But it called the Beijing massacre's impact less severe than feared.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 131,180,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2743.36, up 11.00; transportation 1492.89, up 24.90; utilities 218.94, up 0.57.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3271.65, off 15.25.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 131.09, off 0.39; spot index 130.36, up 0.15.  Dollar: 144.55 yen, up 0.60; 1.9633 marks, up 0.0008.  Geritech Inc. said it signed agreements forming an alliance with Yamanouchi Pharmaceutical Co. to develop biomedical technology to treat health effects of diabetes and aging.  Under the agreements, Geritech will license certain technologies to Tokyo-based Yamanouchi in Japan, South Korea, Taiwan and China, and Yamanouchi acquired an 8% ownership of Geritech.  Closely held Geritech, a pharmaceutical and biotechnology company, declined to discuss terms of the agreements other than to say that it would receive "significant initial payments."  "We all have the hunting instinct in us," says Claude Bebear.  Whenever he can, Mr. Bebear flies off to someplace such as Spain or Zimbabwe to stalk anything from birds to leopards or crocodiles.  But most of the time, the 54-year-old chairman of France's Cie. du Midi and its Axa-Midi insurance unit hunts insurance companies.  "Nothing interests him more than building a big insurance group," says Pierre Barberis, Midi's vice chairman.  So far, Mr. Bebear has kept his sights mostly on Europe.  But now he wants to add a big U.S. hunting trophy to his collection: Farmers Group Inc.  Last week, Axa-Midi agreed to support Sir James Goldsmith in his #13.35 billion ($20.94 billion) takeover bid for Britain's diversified B.A.T Industries PLC by agreeing to invest #600 million in Hoylake Investments Ltd., Sir James's investment vehicle.  If that bid succeeds, Sir James agreed to sell Mr. Bebear B.A.T's U.S. insurance company, Farmers, for $4.5 billion.  It is a characteristically bold and opportunistic move for Mr. Bebear.  More than three decades ago, he was designated heir-apparent to the chairman of a small, provincial insurance company -- before he knew anything about the business.  Since then, through a series of acquisitions and deft maneuvers, he has turned it into Europe's ninth-largest insurance group.  To some, the move on Farmers is a bit too bold.  Only a few months ago, Mr. Bebear said he was willing to put up $1 billion for a U.S. acquisition, and now he's proposing to pay four times more.  "It's a big gamble," says Tim Dawson, an analyst at Barclays de Zoete Wedd in London.  But to others, the move is vintage Bebear, who has become a symbol of the new aggressiveness of French business as it positions itself for a barrier-free European Community after 1992.  He was named France's Manager of the Year for 1988 by Le Nouvel Economiste, a business weekly, and has earned the respect of peers.  "He is a French Rupert Murdoch or Robert Maxwell," says a rival firm's chairman.  For Mr. Bebear, it's necessary to be in the U.S. -- which accounts for 40% to 50% of the world insurance market.  And buying insurers is no different from big-game hunting.  "In hunting as in business, you have to find your prey, follow it, outwit it and pounce at the right moment," he says.  "In business, the equivalent of hitting your target is winning the takeover."  There's no guarantee Sir James and Mr. Bebear will win this takeover, the second-biggest ever attempted, after Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.'s $25 billion buy-out of RJR Nabisco Inc. last year.  The bid faces strong resistance from B.A.T's management and regulatory hurdles in the U.S., where Axa-Midi has to persuade insurance commissioners in nine states to allow it to buy Los Angeles-based Farmers, the U.S.'s 15th-biggest insurer.  It would result in Axa-Midi's annual premiums nearly doubling to about 80 billion French francs and the company leapfrogging to No. 2 among European insurers, behind West Germany's giant Allianz AG.  It would also become one of the top 20 insurance companies world-wide.  Mr. Bebear's career in insurance began in 1958, after graduating from France's elite Ecole Polytechnique.  A friend's father, who ran a small insurance company in Belbeuf, picked Mr. Bebear as his successor.  Mr. Bebear worked his way through Mutuelles Unies before becoming chairman in 1974.  Early on, Mr. Bebear says he concluded "insurance would go through the same phenomenon of globalization as industry."  Thus began a long string of acquisitions and mergers for Mutuelles Unies -- renamed Axa in 1985.  Last year, Mr. Bebear helped Midi Chairman Bernard Pagezy thwart what Mr. Pagezy perceived as a quiet raid by Italy's Assicurazioni Generali S.p.A.  Axa merged with Midi's insurance unit and became Midi's largest holder.  But Mr. Pagezy wanted Midi to be a diversified holding company while Mr. Bebear wanted to focus on insurance and financial services.  Mr. Bebear and Generali formed an alliance to oust Mr. Pagezy, and Mr. Bebear took over as chairman.  Mr. Bebear says 85% of Midi's holders sided with his strategy, which will be pursued this week as Midi is likely to announce the sale of most of its 65% stake in the Clause S.A. grain company to two French groups, sources say.  This same sense of strategy is behind Mr. Bebear's decision to back Sir James, who says he wants B.A.T to concentrate on tobacco.  Some analysts warn Mr. Bebear should be putting his French house in order and clarifying his relationship with Generali before making any costly new moves.  Mr. Bebear says a Farmers purchase could be funded through cash reserves and bank loans, but he doesn't rule out selling part of Midi's 99% stake in Axa-Midi to outside investors.  He maintains the acquisition could help Axa-Midi learn how to better organize its distribution network.  The move fulfills his objective of having a strong presence in the U.S. market and becoming an international powerhouse.  "After this, all I'll have left to do is retire," he says.  Then his face breaks into a grin -- indicating he still has some hunting to do before that happens.  DE KLERK AND KAUNDA MET in Zambia to discuss solutions to apartheid.  South Africa's acting president outlined his plans for racial reconciliation at an unprecedented summit with the president of Zambia, an outspoken opponent of apartheid.  South Africa's previous president resigned Aug. 14 when he couldn't block the meeting.  After the summit, de Klerk said the African National Congress's position on negotiations wasn't discussed, and Kaunda apparently didn't offer to mediate between the ANC and Pretoria, after hinting last week that he would.  But the two leaders did discuss ways to revive the faltering peace process in Angola.  In South Africa, police teargassed hundreds of protesting pupils.  Clashes have increased with the approach of voting next week that excludes blacks.  ---  The Colombian army said it arrested a top financial expert for the drug trade who is wanted in the U.S. Meanwhile, Colombia's justice minister, who has led a crackdown on cocaine traffickers, met with U.S. officials in Washington, and President Barco denied that she had decided to resign because of death threats from cartel leaders.  ---  Baltic Communist Party chiefs tried to avert a crisis with Moscow after a Kremlin warning against growing nationalism in the republics and a phone call from Gorbachev to Lithuania's party chief.  Lithuanian and Estonian leaders held emergency meetings and Latvian officials set one tomorrow.  ---  Astronomers believe they have discovered a galaxy in the making, undermining theories of the evolution of the universe.  The two Cornell University scientists made the discovery in Arecibo, Puerto Rico.  Galaxies are clusters of stars, and according to most theories, all of them were born billions of years ago.  ---  Solidarity's daily paper accused Cardinal Glemp of making statements painful to Jews in a controversy over a Carmelite convent at the former Auschwitz death camp.  Poland's Roman Catholic primate said Saturday that Jews demanding the convent's removal shouldn't speak "from the position of a nation raised above all others."  ---  Former Rep. Swindall was sentenced to one year in prison and fined $30,000 for lying to a federal grand jury about an $850,000 money-laundering scheme.  The judge rejected a prosecution request for a longer sentence, saying that the Georgia Republican may have lied but there was no evidence money-laundering was committed.  ---  Iran's president appeared to have won parliamentary approval of his main ally, Foreign Minister Velayati, but members criticized three other nominees.  Rafsanjani seeks renewed ties with the West.  Hardliners could have rejected Velayati to retaliate for Rafsanjani's failure to keep the antiWestern interior minister in his cabinet.  ---  U.S.-backed guerrillas claimed they have stepped up attacks in eastern Afghanistan and closed part of a highway linking the capital to the Soviet Union.  The guerrillas haven't captured a key Afghan city since the Soviets withdrew Feb. 15.  Meanwhile, a rebel group said feuding by rival groups in northern Afghanistan has killed 300 people.  ---  France's foreign minister appealed for compromise to salvage an accord at the final session of a conference on Cambodia in Paris.  Diplomats said failure would bring new fighting between the pro-Vietnamese government and the Chinese-backed Khmer Rouge and its allies.  The conference opened in late July amid great optimism.  ---  Twelve Sikh militants stormed a train in Punjab, killing at least 22 Hindu passengers and wounding at least 30, police said.  The militants apparently separated the Hindu passengers from the Sikhs and then shot them.  Sikh extremists seek an independent nation in Punjab, complaining of discrimination by Hindus, India's religious majority.  ---  Sinhalese radicals brought nearly all businesses and transportation to a halt in most of Sri Lanka on the first day of a planned weeklong general strike.  The radicals charge the Sinhalese-dominated government has granted too many concessions to ethnic Tamil rebels and hasn't done enough to force Indian troops to pull out.  ---  A bloc of Philippine senators urged President Aquino to serve the U.S. early notice that its military bases agreement won't be renewed after 1991.  Ten senators issued the call, more than enough to block an extension.  But U.S. Rep. John Murtha said he was confident Aquino will keep the bases.  ---  A Chinese student received a nine-year prison term on charges of spreading rumors to the Voice of America during spring democracy protests.  It was the first announced sentencing of a student participant since the government crackdown in June.  At least 12 non-students have been executed.  ---  Died: Joseph Alsop, 78, political columnist, in Washington, from lung cancer, anemia and emphysema.  Raychem Corp. said it sold the South African operations of its recently acquired Sigmaform Corp. subsidiary to Electric Cable Accessories Pty., Johannesburg.  The maker of high-performance industrial products said the selling price was less than $2 million.  It said the action was consistent with corporate policy toward South Africa, and noted that it had divested itself of its own former subsidiary there.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. downgraded Australia's foreign-currency debt, citing concerns about that country's rising international obligations, its large current-account deficit and its poor economic prospects.  The New York-based rating agency, as expected, lowered its ratings on the long-term debt of 20 Australian issuers to double-A-2 from double-A-1.  The downgrade affects $23 billion of Australia's estimated $66 billion of foreign currency obligations, a senior Moody's official said.  In recent years, Australia has proved unable to rein in surging domestic demand and has encouraged imports and discouraged exports by pursuing tight monetary policies that have boosted the value of the Australian dollar.  In consequence, Australia's current-account deficit has grown the past two years, rising to 5.2% of gross domestic product in 1989, according to Moody's.  The resulting rise in the country's foreign-currency debt has led Moody's to conclude there is "a small but significant increase in the likelihood that Australian borrowers could, at some future date, experience difficulty in accessing the foreign currency to service that debt," the rating agency said in a statement.  "Australia's foreign debt will continue to rise," said David H. Levey, an associate director at Moody's and head of its sovereign-risk unit.  Mr. Levey also doesn't expect that Australia's foreign-debt position will stabilize until the mid-1990s.  The downgrading by Moody's places Australia on a level with Spain.  Previously, Australia was ranked with Norway, Belgium and Denmark.  In May, Moody's announced the possibility of a downgrade, which drew strong criticism from Australia.  In Australia, Treasurer Paul Keating called Moody's decision "ill-founded" and said "there is no justification for such a change."  He said that over the past two years, the Australian government hasn't borrowed from abroad and, indeed, has repaid nearly 5 billion Australian dollars (US$3.81 billion) of foreign debt.  The government currently owes foreign creditors a total of about A$9.25 billion, and Mr. Keating said that debt is more than offset by Australia's foreign reserves of around A$20 billion.  The government announced earlier this month that it intends to repay the equivalent of a further A$1.75 billion of foreign debt.  In the year ending June 30, the government expects to post a record budget surplus of A$9 billion, and it is from that surplus that the Australian government will reduce its foreign debt obligations, it said.  In a statement issued in response to Moody's action, Mr. Keating said the government already would have repaid more of its foreign debt "but for difficulties" in getting its debt securities "out of the hands of U.S. and other overseas holders."  He noted that the government also has been reducing its domestic debt.  As of June 30, 1989, Australia owed A$66.5 billion in short-term and long-term debt to both foreign and domestic creditors.  But although the government has been reducing its own foreign debt, that has been more than offset by borrowing abroad by Australian-based companies and others.  That is partly because Australia's economy has been running hot in recent months, causing a surge in imports that has ballooned the current-account deficit.  That, in turn, has swelled the country's foreign debt, which currently stands at a total of about US$98 billion at current exchange rates, including some debt denominated in Australian dollars that is owed to creditors abroad.  Moody's criticizes Australia's capacity to build its exports and generate productivity gains, particularly during the recent past when the world economy has been growing and commodity prices have been relatively buoyant.  The country, which relies on commodities for most of its exports, also is "ill-positioned to weather the next downturn in the global business cycle without further large increases in foreign-currency debt," the rating agency said.  As a result of Moody's action yesterday, the outstanding-rated senior bonds and notes -- denominated in currencies other than Australian dollars -- of the following borrowers have been downgraded to double-A-2: Australian Industry Development Corp.; Australian Resources Development Bank; Australian Wheat Board; Commonwealth of Australia; Commonwealth Bank of Australia; National Australia Bank Ltd.; National Mutual Group Finance Ltd.; New South Wales Treasury Corp.; Qantas Airways Ltd.; Queensland Treasury Corp.; South Australian Government Financing Authority; State Bank of New South Wales; State Bank of South Australia; State Bank of Victoria; State Electricity Commission of Victoria; Sumitomo International Finance Australia Ltd.; Victorian Public Authorities Finance Agency; and Western Australian Treasury Corp.  In addition, the preferred stock of First Australia Prime Income Fund Inc. was downgraded to double-A-2.  And the long-term bank deposit ratings of Westpac Banking Corp. also were downgraded to double-A-2.  Moody's stressed that long-term debt denominated in Australian dollars isn't affected by the downgrade.  ---  S. Karene Witcher contributed to this article.  Furnishings 2000 Inc., San Diego, said it agreed to a restructuring plan that would give Leath Furniture Inc., an Atlanta-based furnishings retailer, a 62% stake in the company's common stock in exchange for a $10 million cash infusion.  As part of the transaction, GF Holdings, parent of Leath Furniture, would gain control of the board of Furnishings 2000 from Brunton Corp., a San Diego holding company owned by William, Fred and John Comrie of Edmonton, Alberta.  Furnishings 2000 is an operator of retail furniture stores in California and Washington.  GF Holdings has obtained a commitment for a new $18.9 million credit line for the company, which will be available to refinance current debt of Furnishings 2000 and to provide as much as $10 million of additional working capital.  Until the transaction is completed, Furnishings 2000 will be managed under a contract with GF Holdings and Leath Furniture.  Greyhound Corp. said its European unit, Greyhound Financial & Leasing Corp., sold its portfolio of Greek shipping loans in a management buy-out headed by the company's shipping director, Theodore Afthonides.  Terms weren't disclosed, but Greyhound said that the sale was for cash, and that the proceeds will be used to reduce debt of the subsidiary.  Greyhound said the sale didn't result in a book gain or loss.  The sale completely removes Greyhound from the ship finance business.  Greyhound is a diversified concern with interests in consumer products, services, transportation manufacturing and financial services.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ MUNICIPALS  Houston -- $114.7 million of water and sewer system revenue bonds, Series 1989A and B, tentatively priced by a PaineWebber Inc. group to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.15% in 2003.  Series A bonds, totaling $34.9 million, consist of current interest bonds due 1990-2003.  They were tentatively priced to yield to 7.15% in 2003.  Series B bonds, totaling $79.8 million, consist of current interest bonds due 1991-1999 and noncallable capital appreciation bonds due 2000-2003.  The current interest bonds were tentatively priced to yield from 6.15% in 1991 to 6.95% in 1999.  The capital appreciation bonds were tentatively priced to yield to maturity from 7% in 2000 to 7.15% in 2003.  All the bonds are insured and rated triple-A by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $550.1 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 15 classes by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The offering, Series 88, is backed by Freddie Mac 9% securities.  For classes on which yields are available from the underwriter, yields range from 9.14%, a spread of 87 basis points over three-year Treasury securities, to 10.30%, a spread of 215 basis points over 20-year Treasurys.  When Margaret Thatcher overhauled her cabinet this summer, few of the British prime minister's senior advisers got off unscathed.  Managing to escape, however, was Mrs. Thatcher's personal economic adviser, Sir Alan Walters, who is emerging as one of the most powerful, and most durable, forces in shaping her government's policies.  The reverberations go well beyond Downing Street.  Britain stands at the vortex of Europe's debate over full economic and monetary union.  And to the great dismay of European Community officials in Brussels, Sir Alan is seen as Mrs. Thatcher's top strategist for staving off a transfer of significant powers to any future EC central banking authority.  The tall, gray-haired economics professor seems an unlikely fellow to wield such power.  Paid only $48,600 a year, Sir Alan lacks a staff, a publicist, a voter constituency and even a full-time job.  He splits his time between London and Washington, where his wife prefers to live and where he remains a senior fellow at the American Enterprise Institute and a consultant to the World Bank.  Generally, he alternates two-week to three-week shifts in each city.  Notwithstanding the unorthodox schedule, Sir Alan boasts an unequaled knack for influence and resilience in a government of limited power-sharing.  Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson "may be running economic policy, but Sir Alan has Thatcher's ear," says Derek Scott, economist with Barclays de Zoete Wedd Securities in London.  Because of Sir Alan's closeness to the prime minister, his movements are carefully watched in the financial community.  Some Tory party members are chafing over Sir Alan's perceived influence since he returned to Downing Street last spring as Mrs. Thatcher's official economic adviser.  "It's causing a good deal of resentment among backbenchers," says Sir Anthony Meyer, vice chairman of a Conservative Party committee on European affairs.  Many see the recent cabinet reshuffle as a move to centralize the control Mrs. Thatcher and her senior adviser exert over European issues, particularly dealings with the European Community.  The Thatcher-Walters axis was cemented during the prime minister's first term, when the straight-talking economist served for three years as an adviser.  "She'd say to him, 'You get the economics right and I'll get the politics right,'" a former Downing Street aide recalls.  The prime minister is reluctant to let Sir Alan slip away to Washington.  Christopher DeMuth, president of the AEI, says that more recently, while Sir Alan was "becoming a fixture" at the conservative think tank, "he was on the phone with Mrs. Thatcher several times a week."  When it seemed he was getting too settled in Washington, "she put her foot down" and insisted that he return, at least part-time, Mr. DeMuth adds.  Sir Alan looks considerably younger than his 63 years, plays tennis and jogs, and often comes across as laid-back and approachable.  But the economist -- a staunch defender of free-market principles and a tight money supply -- can be as forceful as his boss.  Sir Alan once dogged Mrs. Thatcher from room to room in 10 Downing St. while she packed for a visit to the U.S.  Before leaving, though, she ordered up a series of changes Sir Alan had suggested on the coming budget.  Sir Alan's influence with a sometimes impatient prime minister stems partly from his style: He avoids some economists' penchant for long-winded, blurry explanations that leave politicians confused.  "He has a fundamental view of the world, and he doesn't shilly-shally around," says Ian Harwood, economist with S.G. Warburg Securities in London.  Last year, he delivered a withering critique of Mr. Lawson's earlier policy of linking the pound to the West German mark.  Sir Alan said the tactic was "misguided" and that it had had the result of stirring up inflation and widening Britain's trade deficit with the rest of the world-economic problems with which the U.K. is still wrestling.  Like the prime minister, Sir Alan doesn't shy away from controversy and even seems to relish the experience of holding unpopular views.  In 1981, during a severe recession, he defied the popular wisdom and called for the prime minister to loosen the money supply but raise certain taxes and reduce government spending in an effort to cut the budget deficit.  At the time, 364 economists wrote the Times of London contending that the approach "will deepen the depression, erode the industrial base of our economy and threaten its social and political stability."  As it turned out, Sir Alan was right, and the British economy soon began to crawl its way out of recession and into a seven-year expansion.  These days, Sir Alan is bolstering Mrs. Thatcher in fighting another popular cause -- a single currency and central banking authority for all 12 EC nations.  "He's violently anti-European Monetary System," says an aide to European Community Commission President Jacques Delors.  Generally, Sir Alan opposes arrangements, like EMS, that lock the British currency into particular exchange rates.  He believes that the government should keep a tight grip on the money supply, and that the exchange rate will then take care of itself.  Under growing pressure from other EC heads of state and from officials in her own party, Mrs. Thatcher this summer agreed to enter the exchange rate mechanism of the EMS. But, under advice from Sir Alan, she set no date and insisted that two conditions be met first: Britain's inflation rate must drop and the EMS must absorb any shocks caused by a fuller liberalization of capital movements that's slated for July 1990.  While in close rapport with Mrs. Thatcher, Sir Alan keeps a low profile elsewhere.  He has declined repeated requests for interviews from this newspaper and others.  "Whenever I've given interviews before, there's been a bit of a spin," he complains.  Others say that the economist has caused too much of a stir already and that for the time being, his boss wants him away from the limelight. 